NOTEBOOK 3 (1930)
DESCRIPTION OF THE MANUSCRIPT

A ruled school notebook (14.7 X19.8 cm) with hard black covers and a red spine. A label on the front cover carries the imprint of the stationer: Z/Gius. Laterza e figli, Bari/7 Inside the blank space of the label, Gramsci怎 prison number (7047) is written in a blue pencil. (The label is not signed by the prison warden.) After Gramsci's death, Tatiana Schucht glued another label on the upper right-hand corner of the cover； on it she wrote Completo XX da pg. 1 a i6oz, (z/Complete XX from pp. 1 to i6oz,). The Roman numerals indicate the number that Schucht assigned to the notebook according to the cataloging system she had devised when organizing Gramsci's papers soon after his death.

The notebook consists of seventy-nine leaves with twenty-one lines on each side and unlined endpapers in front and back. The recto sides of the leaves are numbered (1-79) in green ink and stamped with the prison seal: "Casa penale speciale di Turi” (Special prison of Turi). The recto side of the endpaper inside the back cover is numbered 〃8o〃 but not stamped with the prison seal； it is otherwise blank. Gramsci wrote on both sides of the lined leaves, filling all of them with his notes； this notebook thus contains 158 manuscript pages. In all, the notebook comprises 166 notes or sections. Of these, 71 notes were crossed out but remain perfectly legible (following V. Gerratana^ denomination these entries are called A texts), and Gramsci incorporated all but two of them in other notebooks. The two exceptions are §126 (〃The formation of the Italian educated classes and their cosmopolitan functionz/( and §152 (〃 Spectator7-Mario Missiroli"). The other 95 notes are B texts, that is, they were neither crossed out nor used again in subsequent notebooks.

Most of the entries in this notebook are directly related to Gramsci's systematic review of the periodicals he was able to receive in prison. The first two notes are based on articles that appeared in Les Nouvelles Littéiaires of October 12 and November 2/1929； most probably, however； the notebook was not started until sometime in April or May 1930. In §13 (on p. 9V of the manuscript), Gramsci^ in the course of discussing Alfredo Panzinizs biography of Cavour, which had been serialized by L'Italia Letteraria in its weekly issues between June 9 and October 13/ 1929, makes the fob lowing observation: 〃As of this date (30 May 1930) it has not been published in book form./, It is also extremely likely that §19, §20, and §21 (pp. 131-13v in the manuscript) were written prior to June 15,工930, since they contain detailed references to publications (Mussolini's Gli accordi del Lateianof a report by the commission of inquiry on the polar expedition of the airship Italiaf and the Nuova Antologia of September i, 1927) that Gramsci himself listed among the "Books Delivered to Tatiana" on that date (see Notebook 2, Description of the Manuscript, 1:528-29), On the other hand, the entries from p. 5yr to the end of the manuscript could not have been written before late August 1930: §101 (p. 571) refers to an article published in LItalia Letteraria of August 24/ 1930. By the time he completed this notebook, Gramsci had already started—and was well into—Notebook 4. (During this same period he was also still writing in Notebook 2.) In fact, in §154 of Notebook 3 (p. 741 in the manuscript) Gramsci refers to an observation he had made in §5 of Notebook 4 (p. 46V in the manuscript).

In Lofficùia gramsciana: Ipotesi sulla struttura dei(eQuaderni del carcere" (Naples: Bibliopolis, 1984), pp. 140-41, Gianni Francioni offers the following chronology of the composition of Notebook 3:

§§ it3: between May 20 and May 30, 1930

14-27: June 1930 (before June 15)

28-56: between June and July 1930

57-60: July 1930

61-62: between July and August 1930

63-104: August 1930

105-42: between August and September 1930 (before October 2) 143-62: between September and October 1930 163-66: October 1930

NOTES TO THE TEXT

§i. The French intellectuals

1. Pierre Mille, “Deux époques littéraires et d'angoisse: 1815-1830 et I9i8-i93o// Les Nouvelles Littéraires 8/ no. 365 (October 12, 1929.

2. Andre Berge, "L'Esprit de la littératuxe moderne," Revue des Deux Mondes (October 1929).

3. Emmanuel Bed, Mort de la pensée bourgeoise (Paris: Grasset, 1929). This book attacks the central point made by Julien Benda in his La trahi-son des clercs (brought up by Gramsci in the next note). Whereas Benda accused the intellectuals of pandering to political passions and popular prejudices, Beri maintained that the political thinking of the intellectuals was too far removed from political reality.

§2. Julien Benda

1. Julien Benda, "Libres opinions: Comment un écrivain sert-il Puni-versel?,/ in Les Nouvelles Littéraires S, no. 368 (November 2,1929). In this note, Gramsci summarizes, and in. some instances reproduces word for word, the contents of this article. He inserts his own comments within parentheses. Benda's best-known book, La trahison des clercs (Paris: Grasses 1927)—of which Gramsci owned a copy in prison—was translated into English by Richard Aldington and published under different titles in Britain and the United States: The Great Betrayal (London: Routledge, 1928), The Treason of the Intellectuals (New York: Morrow, 1928), and The Betrayal of the Intellectuals (Boston: Beacon, 1955).

Julien Benda (1867-1956), a philosopher and novelist, was among the severest critics of the currents of romanticism in French culture. In two of his earliest books, he staged a vigorous attack against Henri Bergson's philosophical espousal of intuìtionism. Charles Maurras and Maurice Barrès were among his most prominent targets in La trahison des clercs. Benda berated many of the intellectuals of his time for abandoning critical integrity and succumbing to racial prejudice, blind nationalism, and political convenience.

2. Eduard Wechssler, Esprit und Geist: Versuch einer Wesenskunde des Deutschen und des Franzosen (Bielefeld: Velhagen and Klasing, 1927).

3. For other comparisons between Benda and Croce, see Notebook ioz II, §41 (iv) and §47.

4. Here and throughout, although 〃cf." almost certainly means "see," Gramsci's usage is ambiguous, so I have chosen to follow his practice without interpreting his meaning.

5. 〃It is the role of the masters to justify the habits and prejudices proper to France, so as to prepare our children. in the best possible way to take their place in the national piocession.〃

6. Benda makes the same point in a note in The Betrayal of the Intellectuals (Boston: Beacon, 1955): Z/What Barres wrote: The part of the masters is to justify the habits and prejudices of France, so as best to prepare our children to take their place in the national procession/ he certainly meant that he and his colleagues were to walk in this procession” (183).

Maurice Barrès (1862-1923), novelist, polemicist, and politician, was a fervent propagandist of intransigent French nationalism, which he combined with a celebration of a peculiar brand of individualism. He shared many of the same views as Charles Maurras, although he was not himself a monarchist. In 1906 he was elected to the Académie Prangaise and to the French parliament.

§3. German intellectuals

1. This note is partly a summary and partly a literal translation of Andre Levinson's article "Jacob Wassermann et le procès de la justice," Les Nouvelles Littéraires 8, no. 366 (October 19, 1929). Gramsci's only comment appears in the form of a parenthetical exclamation point in the penultimate paragraph of the note.

2. Hans Frank, Recht ist Unrecht: Neun Novellen um eine Wahrheit (Leipzig: Haessel, 1928).

3. Leonhard Frank, Die Ursache (Munich, 1916). Leonhard 汩rank (1882-1961), a novelist and playwright, was born. in. Germany but started his writing career in Switzerland, from whence he was compelled to flee because of his pacifist convictions. His works embody an extensive criticism of bourgeois institutions and of many different aspects of bourgeois culture. He was elected to the German Academy of Letters in. 1927 but was forced into exile in 1933, when the Nazis banned his books. Die Ursache, an attack on the educational system, was first published in Switzerland in 1915； it has been translated into English as The Cause of the Crime (London: P. Davies, 1928).

4. Franz Werfel (1890-1945), a German poet, playwright, and novelist born in Prague, became a staunch antimilitarist after his war experience on the front. He achieved his first success as a playwright in 1916/ with an adaptation of Euripides' Trojan Women, His first major novel, Verdi, Roman der Oper, was published in 1924 and translated into English as Verdi: A Novel of the Opera (1925). Werfel, a Jew, fled Nazi Germany and spent some years in France before emigrating to the United States.

"Quincey" is, most probably, a misspelling meant to refer to the lawyer Josiah Quincy (1744-75) who, together with John Adams, successfully defended the British soldiers responsible for the Boston Massacre of 1770.

5. Gerhart Hauptmann (1862-1946), a German playwright who won the Nobel Prize in 1912, wrote Michael Kramer, a play in four acts, in 1900.

6. Gramsci gives the title of Jakob Wassermann's short story as "Un padre/7 a direct translation of "Un pére/7 as it appears in Levinson's article； which gives no indication of the original title of the story in German.

7. Jakob Wassermann, Der Fall Mamizius (Berlin, 1928). Gramsci is referring to the following passage in Levinson's article: Z/Or, VAffaire Mauritzius expose et discute une situation particulière； il ne s'agit pas des mobiles d'un crime, mais des vices d'un verdict； c'est le juge qui est sur la sellette, ouz en Pespèce, Pavocat général, et, avec lui, la justice. De cette situation renversée, k scène des assises dans Resurrection de Tolstoi, où le juré est appelé à juger la fille perdue, déchue par sa fante, est le modèle saisissant/7

Jakob Wassermann (1873-1934), a novelist whose moral intensity has been likened to Dostoyevsky's, reached the height of his popularity in Europe in the 1920s and early 1930s. Der Fall Maurizius, generally regarded as his best novel, has been translated into English； see The Mauiizius Case, trans. C. Newton (New York: Liveright, 1929).

§4. Emmanuel Beri

1. In Moit de la pensée bourgeoise, already cited in the first note of Notebook 3, Beri offers Zola as an example of the ^revolutionary^ writer capable of producing a literature that is in touch with political reality and accessible to the people. These views are reiterated in his speech on Zola, which Gramsci summarizes in this note.

2. Gramsci summarizes and quotes from the text of BerPs speech as it was published (together with an account of the commemoration held at Zola's house in Médan) in Les Nouvelles Littéraires 8/ no. 36 (October 12, 1929). He inserts his own comments in parentheses.

3. Emile Zola died in 1902. On Jean Jaurès, see Notebook 2, §75/ n. 4.

4. Pierre Hamp (1876-1962) is said to "deal with the people" because of the industrial setting of his novels.

5. Victor Margueritte (1866-1942) wrote mostly historical novels, many of them in collaboration with his elder brother, Paul Margueritte (1860-1918), who in 1887 joined four other novelists and signed the "Manifesto of the Five" strongly denouncing Zola's novel La tene and his theories of naturalism.

6. Henri Barbusse (1873-1935) wrote some symbolist poetry and a novel in the naturalist mold before volunteering for the infantry and experiencing combat in World War L In 1916 he published Le feu—in English, Under Fire (London: Dent, 1917)—which won him the Prix Goncourt. An antiwar novel, Le feu poignantly describes the horrors faced by ordinary soldiers in the trenches. Barbusse became a pacifist and then a communist. After the publication of Clarté in 1919 (translated into English by E Wray the same year； see Light [New York: Dutton, 1919]) his writings and activities became more explicitly political and militant. In 1928 he established the periodical Monde with the backing of the French Communist Party. Toward the end of his life he moved to the Soviet Union, where he died. Gramsci met Henri Barbusse in December 1920, when the latter delivered a lecture on the Clarté movement at the Casa del Popolo in Turin.

7. 〃And all around us we sense the growth of this hunger among the people； they question us and we are unable to answer, they press us and we are not able to respond, they call for a justification of their pain and we are unable to give them one. One might say that the giant factories create a zone of silence from which the worker can no longer escape and which the intellectual can no longer enter. The two are so separated that the intellectual who has emerged out of a working-class milieu can no longer find access to that milieu.

8. "Difficult loyalty, Jean Guehenno writes. Perhaps an impossible loyalty. The scholarship student, contrary to what one might hope, contributes nothing at all to the construction of a bridge between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie. He is just one more bourgeois, and that's all. But his brothers cease to recognize him； they no longer see him as one of their own. Since the people do not participate in any way in the discourse of the intellectuals, they must either oppose the intellectuals and construct a sort of nationality with a language of its own or else have no language at all and sink into a sort of barbarism.〃

9. “With Zola, then, or with nothing； fraternity or death. This is our motto. This is our drama. And this is our law."

§5. America

1. Lamberti Sorrentino, Latinità dell'America” (The Latinity of America), Eltalìa Letteraria i, no. 38 (December 22/1929). The rest of this note summarizes and quotes from Sorrentino's article. Gramsci encloses his own observations in parentheses.

2. Emphasis added by Gramsci.

§6. What do the young think}

i. Mario Missiroli, "Filosofia della nvoluzione,/ (Philosophy of revolution), LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 38 (December 22, 1929). In this article, Missiroli discusses the results of the work by Professor Del Vecchio's students, which, as he indicates, were published under the title "Esercitazioni di filosofia del diritto” (Exercises in legal philosophy). Missiroli con-tinned his discussion a week later in another article: "Opinioni di giovani” (The opinions of young people), Ultalia Letteraria 1, no. 39 (December 29, 1929)- On. Mario Missiroli, see Notebook 1, §43, n. 12.

2. On Giorgio Del Vecchio, see Notebook §25, n. 1.

§7. The people (oh!)? the public (oh!)

l In 1923 Mussolini managed to secure enough votes in parliament to pass the hotly contested Acerbo Electoral Law (named after the undersecretary of state, Giacomo Acerbo, who drafted it). The law guaranteed the party that received the largest number of votes (provided it was over 25 percent of the total) in national elections two-thirds of the seats in the Chamber of Deputies the lower house of parliament). On passage of the bill, Mussolini dissolved parliament, and parliamentary elections were held in April 1924. Thanks to the electoral reform the Fascists and their allies secured 374 out of the 535 seats, which effectively enabled them to establish their dictatorship. The law was modified again in. May 1928. This time, the number of parliamentary seats was reduced to 400, and the new law stipulated that a single list of candidates selected by the Fascist Grand Council (from among a thousand names supplied to it by the employers' and workers7 confederations) would be submitted to the electorate for approval in a plebiscite. The complex provisions of the new law also reduced the total number of eligible voters by about three million. A plebiscite under this law was held in March 1929.

2. Gramsci did not have access to Giuseppe Ungaretti's article in II Resto del Carlino^ the quotation is extracted from an unsigned article, "Molti critici/z (Many critics), in the ""Rassegna della stampa” (Review of the press) section of LItalia Letteraria i, no. 31 (November 3, 1929).

Giuseppe Ungaretti (1888-1970), a poet, spent some years studying in France prior to World War I and was attracted to the symbolists and other exponents of the literary and artistic avant-garde. He also established links with the Italian futurists and published some of his early poems in the futurist journal Lacerba. His war experience in the trenches helped shape his first two volumes of poetry. The obscurity and difficulty of his verse led some critics to label him a hermeticist. Gramsci expresses his dislike of Ungaretti in several notes； see especially Notebook 9, §2, and Notebook 17/ §44

3. Il Popolo dltalia was one such newspaper. Founded by Mussolini in 1914, it was in its early years an organ for advocates of intervention. in the World War. Mussolini retained personal control of II Popolo d'Italia until he became prime minister in 工922. Il Popolo dltalia then became the quasi-official newspaper of the Fascist regime. It ceased publication in 1943.

§8. Father Bresciani 's progeny

1. Riccardo Bacchelli, Il diavolo al Pontelungo, 2 vols. (Milan: Ceschina, 1927). Gramsci owned a copy of this novel. It is among the "Books to Be Delivered to Tatiana: 13 March :[930〃 that Gramsci listed in Notebook 1 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:371). In an April 7/1930, letter to Tatiana Schucht, Gramsci discusses this novel in relation to the Italian novelistic tradition:

Il diavolo al Pontelungo is quite "historical" in the sense that the experiment of Baronata and the episode in Bologna in 1874 really took place. Like all historical novels that exist, the general framework is historical, but not the individual characters and events, one by one. What makes this novel interesting, apart from its considerable artistic qualities, is the almost complete absence of sectarian, acerbity on the author's part. In Italian literature, apart from Manzoni's historical novel, there exists an essentially sectarian tradition in this sort of work, which goes back to the period between 1848 and i860； on one side stands the founder Guerrazzi, on the other Bresciani, the Jesuit priest. For Bresciani, all patriots were scoundrels, cowards, assassins, etc., while the defenders of the throne and the altar, as one used to say in those days, were all little angels descended on earth to display miracles. For Guerrazzi, obviously； the roles were reversed； the Papists were all of them dipped in the blackest pitch, while the supporters of national unity and independence were all the purest heroes of legend. This tradition has been preserved until recently by the two traditional opponents in pulp serial novels； in. the so-called artistic and cultivated literature, the Jesviit side has held the monopoly. In II diavolo al Pontelungo, Bacchelli proves to be independent, or almost； his humor rarely becomes partisan, it resides in the things themselves, rather than in the writer's extraartistic partisanship,

For more on Riccardo Bacchelli, see Notebook i, §32/ n. 9.

2. Riccardo Bacchelli, The Devil at Long Bridge, trans, and intro. Orlo Williams (New York: Longmans, 1929). Williams's introductory essay (pp. ix-xvi) was published in Italian translation under the title Bacchelli sul Tamigi” (Bacchelli on the Thames) in La Fiera Letteraria , no. 4 (January 27 户 929).

3. On Bacchelli's Lo sa il tonno (to which Gramsci also alludes in Notebook 1, §32), Orlo Williams writes: "In Lo sa il tonno, in which a young and well-brought-up fish sets out to see the world of fishes, meets adventures, wins a wife, and, in the end returns too wise a fish to rub along comfortably with his congeners, Bacchelli exploits [his] philosophic faculty to the full. The society painted is Italian in type and sentiment, Italian the satirical, pungent/ and rather contemptuous wit with which Bacchelli caricatures it〃(Bacchelli, The Devil at Long Bridge, pp. xiii-xiv).

4. Bacchelli did indeed write for La Voce, but he never edited it. Gramsci may be confusing Bacchelli with. Scipio Sia taper, who twice served as acting editor of La Voce—in March 1910, while the regular editor, Giuseppe Prezzoline was in Paris’ and from December 1911 to March 1912. There was also a short period (April to October 1912) when Giovanni Papini substituted for Giuseppe Prezzolini as editor of La Voce.

5. Carlo Cafiero (1846-92), bom of a wealthy noble family, was groomed for a diplomatic career that he abandoned early in favor of revolutionary politics. He joined the First International, came to know Marx and Engels in London, and helped reorganize the Neapolitan section of the International； he also published an abridged version of Capital—the Compendio del Capitale (1879). Before long, however, Cafiero shifted his allegiance to the anarchist movement, he became one of Mikhail Bakunin's close associates and, together with Errico Malatesta and Andrea Costa, a leading exponent of anarchism in Italy. He played an active role in a number of anarchist ventures, including the insurrection of 1874 in Bologna. In the end, Cafiero went insane, but by then he had left the anarchist movement to make common cause with the parliamentary socialists.

Andrea Costa (1851-1910), one of the most important founders of the socialist movement in Italy, was at first a fervent follower of Bakunin. While still in his twenties he launched two anarchist publications. Fascio Operaio and II Martello. In 1874 he helped plan the uprising in Bologna； two years later he was imprisoned for his revolutionary activities. He moved to Paris in 1876； there lie met Anna Kuliscioff who, it is generally believed, persuaded him to abandon anarchism and pursue the path of socialism. (She herself had broken off with Bakunin's anarchist movement and converted to Marxism.) On his return to Italy in i88oz he started publication of the Rivista Intemazionale del Socialismo, and a year later he founded the weekly Avanti! In 1882 he became the first socialist to be elected to parliament in Italy. In 1892 Costa was responsible for convening the Congress of Genoa that established the Partito dei Lavoratori Italiani, which in its third congress changed its name formally to become the Italian Socialist Party (psi).

6. This parenthetical remark is Gramsci's interpolation. He is referring to Francesco De Sanctis's essay "L'uomo del Guicciardini” (The Guicciardinian man) in his Saggi Critici, ed. P. Arcari (Milan: Treves, 1924), 3:28-49. This three-volume edition of De Sanctis's critical essays was among the books Gramsci had with him in prison.

7. Ettore Zoccoli, Lanarchia: Gli agitatori, le idee, i fatti (Turin: Bocca,

8. Max Nettlau, Mikhail Bakunin, eine Biographie^ 2 vols. (London, 1896-1900).

9. The parenthetical correction is Gramsci's. James Guillaume was one of the most active Swiss anarchists from the French-speaking Jura. Among other things, he was editor of the Bulletin of the Jurassian Federation.

10. James Guillaume, U In tern a tionale: Documents et souvenirs (工860-1878), 4 vols, (Paris, 1905-10).

11. In 1873 Cafiero purchased Baronata—a house and some land in the vicinity of Locarno—for Bakunin and his family to live in. The place was also used as a refuge by the anarchists, and arms were stored there. Because of bad management, however, it proved too expensive to maintain； in 1874 Bakunin had to move out, and he went to live in Lugano, where he spent the last two years of his life.

12. Alexander Herzen, My Past and Thoughts, 6 vols., trans. Constance Garnett (New York: Knopf, 1922-27). Knopf released a revised four-volume edition of this work in 1968.

Alexander Herzen (1812-70) was born in Moscow； the illegitimate son of a wealthy nobleman. A man of great learning and superb literary skills, he is best known as a progenitor of revolutionary socialism in Russia. His early political thought consisted of an amalgam of idealism and Saint、 Simon's utopian sociaEsm. In 1834 he was arrested for his subversive political views’ and he spent the following eight years in internal exile. The experience served to radicalize him even further. His political philosophy had become more left-Hegelian by the time he returned to Moscow in 1842, and in the next few years he drew closer to anarchism and the theories of Proudhon. In 1847 Herzen left Russia and moved to France. Over the years he came to know and befriend many of Europe's leading intellectuals and political revolutionaries, among them Michelet, Mazzini, Garibaldi, and Victor Hugo. He spent the last twenty years of his life in England, where he founded periodicals and newspapers—such as The Polar Star and Kolokol (The bell)—intended for clandestine distribution in czarist Russia. Herzen had a special interest in and very close ties with Italian revolutionaries. Gramsci alludes in passing to Herzen's influence on Mazzini, Pisacane, and others in Notebook 15, §52/ and Notebook 17, §28.

13. Orlo Williams quotes Bacchelli's letter in his introduction to The Devil at Long Bridge (pp. xv-xvi).

§9. The academy of Ten

i. Curzio Malaparte, 〃Una specie d'Accademia” (A sort of academy) in La Piera Letteraria 4, no. 23 (June 3, 1928). The article focuses on the fortunes of a novel entitled Lo zar non è morto (The czar is not dead) that was purportedly coauthored by ten writers.

2. Giacomo Di Giacomo started organizing Fascist trade unions for intellectuals and writers very early in the 1920s, By 1922 he was the secretary-general of the National Federation of Intellectual Unions. Toward the end of the decade all the intellectual unions were absorbed by the Fascist Confederation of Professionals and Artists and Di Giacomo became its president. Il Raduno was the organ of the Artists' and Writers' Union.

3. Gramsci怎 emphasis and parenthetical comments.

4. Pietro Fedele (1873-1953), a professor of medieval and Renaissance history at the University of Rome, was first elected to parliament in 1919 as a Nationalist. He joined the Fascist Party in 1924, and the following year he succeeded Giovanni Gentile as minister of education, a post he held for over four years. Fedele favored a law, passed in 1925, that enabled the dismissal of university professors from their posts for lack of loyalty to the state, as was already possible for all other government employees. He also played a role in the founding of the Royal Academy of Italy. Fedele was made a senator in 1928.

On. Emilio Bodrero, see Notebook 2, §25, n. 1.

5. Curzio Malaparte, “Coda di uiVAccademia" {The tail end of an academy), La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 25 (June 17, 1928).

6. Emilio Salgari (1863-1911), a prolific author of popular fiction, was best known for his stories of pirates and of adventures in exotic jungle settings. His work had no literary pretensions and appealed mostly to children. In 1927 II Raduno proclaimed him one of the greatest Italian writers, overshadowing even the "democrat" Jules Verne. Gramsci makes another reference to this incident in Notebook 3)§36.

§10. Proudhon and the Italian literati (Raimondi, Jahier)

1. Giuseppe Raimondi, "Rione Bolognina^ (A Bologna neighborhood), La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 25 (June 17, 1928). Proudhon's motto—''Poverty is good, and we should regard it as our source of joy〃一is used by Raimondi as an epigraph for his article.

2. The parenthetic comment is Gramsci's.

3. On. the same topic, see Notebook i, §94. For more on Raimondi and Jahieq see Notebook i, §94, n. 1.

§11. Americanism

i. "Pirandello parla della Germania； del cinema sonoro, e di altre cose” (Pirandello discusses Germany, the talkies, and other matters), LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 5 (April 14, 1929)一a report of an interview by the Berlin correspondent, Corrado Alvaro.

Corrado Alvaro (1895-1956), essayist and author of short stories and novels (many of them set in Calabria), spent some years (1930-35) traveling abroad as a special correspondent for several Italian newspapers and periodicals.

§12. David Lazzaretti

1. Domenico Bulferetti, "David Lazzaretti e due milanesi” (David Lazzaretti and two Milanese)； La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 35 (August 26, 1928),

Davide (or David) Lazzaretti (1834-78)was born in Arcidosso? in the Monte Amiata region, a remote area in the southeastern corner of Tuscany. He fought as a volunteer in the national army in i860 and was a carter by trade. In 1868 he experienced religious visions, underwent a spiritual conversion, and adopted the life of a hermit. His visions revealed to him that he was a descendant of a French king and that a prophet would come who would free all peoples from despotism and misery. Lazzaretti found many admirers and followers mostly but not exclusively in his region, and he established a number of colonies, or congregations. Twice； in 1871 and 1873, the authorities brought charges against him, but he was never convicted. Eventually, Lazzarretti convinced himself and his followers that he was the messiah of the new order. In his view, the Kingdom of Grace (i.e.z the pontificate of Pius IX, who died in February 1878) was coming to an end； it would be followed by the Kingdom of Justice, which in turn would give way to the Reform of the Holy Ghost, namely, the millennium. He was shot dead by the carabinieri when he ceremoniously came down from the mountain near Arcidosso to present himself to the crowds as the messiah and to proclaim the establishment of the republic of God. For a discussion of Lazzaretti and the sociopolitical context of his activities, see E. J. Hobsbawm, Primitive Rebels (New York: Norton； 1965b pp. 65-73.

2. These books are all mentioned by Bulferetti in his article.          :

Andrea Verga (1811-95), a psychiatrist and the author of David

Lazzaretti e la pazzia sensoria (David Lazzaretti and sensory madness)/ was the director of the major hospital in Milan. A professor of clinical medicine, he advocated the introduction of the study of psychiatry into all Italian universities. He was made a senator on 1876.

Cesare Lombroso, Pazzi e anormali (The mad and the abnormal), id ed. (Città di Castello: Lapi, 1890). On Lombroso； see Notebook 1, §26, n. 1.

Giacomo Barzellotti, David Lazzaretti (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1885). A'： revised edition of this book was brought out under a different title: Monte Amiata e il suo profeta (Monte Amiata and its prophet) (Milan: Treves, 1909). Giacomo Barzellotti (1844-1917), a scholar of philosophy and literature, became a professor of philosophy at the University of Rome in 1896.

3. The parenthetical comment is Gramsci's.

4. Following unification and the establishment of the secular state in Italy, the Vatican declared in 1871 that it was "not expedient" {non expedit) for Catholics to participate in. national elections. The non expedit was actually a prohibition. It was relaxed somewhat in 1904 and tacitly withdrawn in 1913 (with the Gentiloni Pact)； however, it remained official church policy until 1919.

5. Giuseppe Rovani (1818-74), a Milanese republican who participated in the wax of independence and in the 1848 defense of the Roman republic, wrote historical novels. Some of them were first published in serial form and thus reached a rather wide readership. His best-known work is Cento anni (A hundred years )z serialized in a Milanese newspaper in 1857-58. Manfredo Pallavicino was first published in Milan in 1845.

6. Gramsci is referring to the failed popular uprising in Benevento in 1877 that was led by, among others, the anarchists Carlo Cafiero and Errico Malatesta.

§13. Father Brescianfsprogeny. Alfredo Fanzini: Vita di Cavour

1. Alfredo Panzinizs life of Cavour was published in a single volume the following year: Il conte di Cavour (Milan: Mondadori, 1931). On Panzmi, see Notebook iz §13, n. 1.

2. Panzini's letter to the editor of II Resto del Carlmo, published in LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 13 (June 30, 1929), is a response to an article— signed "Lom."—that appeared in II Resto del Carlino (a Bologna newspaper) on June 23, 1929. 〃Lom.〃 suggested that certain expressions used by Fanzini in his description of Cavour's "dictatorship" were probably a veiled criticism of Mussolini. "It should also be noted that certain barbs against the dictatorship, certain double-edged phrases on how men and people should be governed, certain biting remarks about the present generation of young people—these young people, Mr. Panziniz study hard, much harder than you seem to believe—damage the seriousness and the objectivity of the work. Their exact meaning cannot be pinned down, and they lend themselves to the most diverse interpretations—in any case, they are the kinds of things one would expect to hear from Benedetto Croce rather than from Alfredo Panzini/7

Gramsci returns to this question later in this same notebook (see Notebook 3, §38).

3. On the meaning Gramsci attaches to Stenterello in relation to Machiavelli, see Notebook t, §48/ n. 2.

4. Gramsci is thinking of an article by Luigi Russo, "Io dico seguitando (I follow by saying .. J in La Nuova Italia i, no. 1 (January 20, 1930): 1-12. In his article, Russo criticizes the fashion of writing biographies in the form of novels. Among other things, he points to "the biographies of Machiavelli narrated as if they were the story of Pinocchio or some such hero < . . or, lives of Cavour described with, the same stylistic flourishes that one would use when recounting the exploits of Gelsomino, the king's clown."

§15. Ettore decotti

1. Guido De Ruggiero's review is in La Critica 28, no. 1 (January 20, 1930): 57-59； and Mario De Bernardi's is in La Riforma Sociale 36, nos. 11-12 (November-December 1929): 589-92.

Ettore Ciccotti (1863-1939) started his academic career as a professor of ancient history at an academy in Milan, but he was removed from his post in 1898 because of his involvement in a popular uprising in the same city. Able to resume his teaching some time laterz he taught history and Latin literature at various Italian universities. He was also elected to parliament, where he supported the socialist opposition at a time when Giolitti dominated the political scene. He was also interested in and wrote about the southern question in Italy. Ciccotti edited an Italian translation of the works of Marx’ Engels, and Lassalle that was first brought out in installments (1899-1911) and then published in an eight-volume edition, of which owned a copy (K. Marx, E Engels, and F. Lassalle, Opere, 8 vols., ed. Ettore Ciccotti, id ed., revised [Milan: Società Editrice Avanti, 1922])；: Gradually, Ciccotti distanced himself from the Socialist Party, and in 1915/ supporting Italy's intervention in the war, he broke off from it completely. He was made a senator in 1924. In his numerous scholarly publv cations, the influence of positivism is quite marked, as are his leanings toward historical materialism. Confronti storici is a study in comparativi historiography in which Ciccotti expounds his methodology and princi： pies of interpretation.                                                        \ ：

2. Gramsci makes a slight error in recording the dates of the two-part publication of Ciccotti^ essay: Ettore Ciccotti, "Elementi di ^verità7 e di 'certezza' nella tradizione storica” (Elements of "tnith" and "certainty" in the historical tradition). Rivista d'Italia 30, no. 7 (July 15, 1927): 414-51；； and 3O? no. 8 (August 15, 1927: 585-616.

3. On Guglielmo Ferrero and Corrado Barbagallo, see Notebook i, §25； n. 17.

§16. Political development of the popular class in the medieval commune

1. See Notebook 3, §15, n. 2, above.

2. I.e.z the head of the commune, or city-state.

i. In prison Gramsci owned a book by Arrigo Serpieri on the effects of the war on the rural population一La guerra e le classi rurali Italiane (Bari: Laterza, and New Haven: Yale University Press, 1930)—a publication of the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace. In a note on p. 70 of his book, Serpieri refers to the two works mentioned here by Gramsci. Riccardo Bachi's Lalimentazione e la politica annonaria in Italia (Bari: Laterza, 1926), also a publication of the Carnegie Endowment, discusses the problem of nutrition and food rationing in Italy. Umberto Ricci's II fallimento della politica annonaria is about the failure of food-rationing laws. On Umberto Ricci, Notebook i, §6iz n. 12.

Arrigo Serpieri (1877-1959), a well-known expert in agrarian economy, started his career as a professor of agricultural science and director of an institute for the advanced study of forestry. He served as an undersecretary of agriculture for about a year under Mussolini's regime, and as a member of parliament he drafted the law that came to be known as the Bonificia Integrale (1928). This law established a massive (and very successful) program of land improvement, which included the draining of marshes to reduce malaria and increase agricultural production the reforestation of mountainous areas to prevent soil erosion, and the construction of irrigation systems. Once the law was enacted, Mussolini appointed Serpieri to oversee its implementation.

§18. History of the subaltern classes

1. See Notebook 3, §15, n. 2, above.

2. Tanaquil was the wife of Tarquinius Priscus. Legend has it that the half-Greek and half-Etruscan Tarquinius seized the throne of Rome and held it for almost four decades before being murdered by the sons of his predecessor, Ancus Marcius. Tanaquil, who is said to have encouraged her husband怎 ambition, is also credited with having thwarted the designs of the murderers and securing the succession of Servius Tullius. The latter was subsequently murdered by order of Tarquinius Superbus (the last king of Rome and the son of Tarquinius Priscus) at the instigation of his wife, Tullia (the daughter of Servius Tullius). Many legends are connected with these intrigues一or "personal episodes/7 as Gramsci calls them—among the later kings and the patrician families of Rome； the famous legend of the rape of Lucretia is one of them.

3. The tribunes of the plebs were magistrates of plebeian birth entrusted with the protection of the people. They were elected annually and had the right to call meetings of the plebeians to discuss public affairs and propose changes in the laws.

4. In 1378 the ciompi (wage earners in the wool industry), together with the shopkeepers and artisans from the minor guilds, revolted against the oligarchic rule of the patricians in Florence. The Revolt of the Ciompi, which resulted in the establishment of a radically democratic government, proved to be only a temporary setback for the nobles and the powerful merchants (who were the mainstay of the Guelf party). Within four years oligarchic rule was fully restored in the Florentine republic.

§19. The problem of the young

I. Gramsci had a copy of this book (a collection of Mussolini's parliamentary speeches on the Lateran Pacts signed between the Vatican and the Italian government in 1929)； he lists it in Notebook 2 among the "Books Delivered to Tatiana on 15 June 工930〃 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:529).

§20. Documents of the times

i. See Commissione d'indagine per la spedizione Polare dell'aeronave "Italia" (Rome: Rivista Maiittima, 1930). Gramsci had a copy of this publication in prison； it is included in the list of "Books Delivered to Tatiana on 15 June 工930〃 in Notebook 2 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:528).：

In the summer of 1928； the Italian airship Italia crashed in the Arctic ; after it had already conducted a series of flights over unexplored polar regions. A commission of inquiry was set up by the Italian government to look into the accident. In its report, submitted in February 1929 and pub-： lished in the volume cited by Gramsci, the commission found Umberto < Nobile, the commander of the airship, responsible for the disaster, which： had cost the lives of seventeen crew members, although Nobile himself,： and seven of his companions were rescued. As a result, Umberto Nobile： (1885-1978), an. aeronautical engineer who had already successfully flowii： over the North Pole in 1926, felt constrained to resign from the air force,-； in which he held the rank of general. The findings of the commission of; inquiry may have been politically motivated: Nobile was not considered a supporter of the Fascist regime. After World War II, the commission's report was discredited, and Nobile was reinstated. In 1946 Nobile was elected to the Constituent Assembly on the list of the Communist Party.

2. Gramsci is referring to a battle fought during World War I in which the Italian army, under the command of General Luigi Cadorna, suffered a devastating and humiliating defeat on the Isonzo front near Caporetto (October 1917) at the hands of the Germans and Austrians. "Caporetto" became part of the Italian language, meaning ^catastrophic defeat" or 〃rout.〃

§21. Italian diplomacy before 1914

1. See Alessandro De Bosdari, 〃Lo scoppio della guerra balcanica visto da Sofia” (The outbreak of the Balkan War as seen from Sofia), Nuova Antologia 62/ no. 1331 (September i, 1927): 90-98. The article reproduces a chapter from De Bosdari's book on the Balkan Wars and World War I. Gramsci quotes the opening of the article and inserts his comments in parentheses.

On Alessandro De Bosdari, see Notebook 2/ §33/ n. 1.

2. Gramsci is referring to a passage from Francesco Guicciardini's Ricordi. See Guicciardini, Maxims and Reflections, trans. N. Rubinstein (New York: Harper, 1965^ p. 39:

The pious say that faith can do great things, and, as the gospel tells us, even move mountains. The reason is that faith breeds obstinacy. To have faith means simply to believe firmly—to deem almost a certainty—things that are not reasonable, to believe them more firmly than reason warrants. A man of faith. is stubborn in his beliefs； he goes his way, undaunted and resolute, disdaining hardship and danger, ready to suffer any extremity.

Now, since the affairs of the world are subject to chance and to a thousand and one different accidents, there are many ways in which the passage of time may bring unexpected help to those who preserve in their obstinacy. And since this obstinacy is the product of faith, it is then said that faith can do great things.

This passage from Guicciardini's Ricordi is quoted in one of the books Gramsci owned in prison, to which he refers on a number of occasions in the notebooks； see Francesco De Sanctis, “L'uomo del Guicciardini” (The Guicciardinian man), in his Saggi Critici, ed. P. Arcari (Milan: Treves, 工924), 3：4O・

§22. Lorianism

1. See Notebook i, §32.

2. Giacomo Lumbroso in fact died in 1925. On Alberto and Giacomo Lumbroso/ see Notebook i, §32, n. 1.

3. See Vittorio Scialoja, Giacomo Lumbroso/7 Nuova Antologia 62, no. 1332 (September i6f 1927): 218-22. According to the article, Giacomo Lumbroso "was also a scholar of modern history and literature, with special expertise in the history of the Napoleonic period."

4. Gramsci is referring to Pietro Fedele, already mentioned in Notebook 3, §9.

§23. Loria

i. See Achille Loria, Ricordi di uno studente settuagenario (Memoirs of a septuagenarian student) (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1927). This book was advertised repeatedly in Nuova Antologia and LItalia Che Scrive between August and October 1927； in all probability, this is how Gramsci learned about it.

§24. Risorgimento motifs. Sicilian separatism

I. Gramsci is quoting from an unsigned review of Luigi Natoli's book on Sicilian uprisings between 1848 and i860 and their relation to the Italian unification movement. The review appeared in Nuova Antologia 62, no, 1334 (October i6,1927): 539-40. Another comment by Gramsci on the controversy between Luigi Natoli and Benedetto Croce is in Notebook I, §43； see also the related note (n. 16).

§25. The role of Catholics in Italy (Catholic Action)

1. See Gianforte Suardi, “Quando e come i cattolici poterono partecipare alle elezioni politiche” (When and how Catholics could participate in national political elections). Nuova Antologia 62/ no. 1335 (November if 1927): 118-23. All the information recorded by Gramsci in this note is drawn from Suaidi's article, with his clarifications appearing in parentheses.

2. On Tommaso Tittoni, see Notebook 2, §6/ n. 1.

3. In September 1904 Italy was shaken by a series of strikes that the Giolitti government tried to repress with force, causing many casualties. Unrest spread throughout the country. On October 18 parliament was dissolved and national elections announced for November 6.

4. The non expedit forbade Catholics from voting and from presenting themselves as candidates in national elections, but it did not apply to administrative elections, in which Catholics participated in substantial numbers.

5. Geremia Bonomelli (1831-1914)/ a bishop, wrote and spoke openly about the need for the Catholic Church to abandon its claims of temporal power. In 1906 he issued a pastoral letter advocating the separation of church and state. Some of his publications were officially condemned by the Vatican and placed on the index of forbidden books. Bonomelli always submitted to church discipline, however, and hence retained his position and exercised considerable influence. He strongly urged both Leo XIII and Pius X to revoke the non expedit and allow Catholics to participate fully in the political life of the nation.

6. Antonio Agliardi (1832-1915) spent more than a decade as a parish priest in Bergamo before being made archbishop. Between 1886 and 1889 he was secretary of ecclesiastical affairs at the Vatican. He was elevated to cardinal in 1896. Agliardi was one of the first prominent members of the church hierarchy to promote conciliation between the Vatican and the Italian state and to support the idea of forming a Christian Democratic (i.e., Catholic) party in Italy.

7. As a result of the heavy participation of Catholics in the 1904 elections, the extreme left lost ground, ending up with eight fewer seats than it had in the previous parliament. The reformist socialists obtained about 20 percent of the total vote, a significant improvement on their showing in the 1900 elections. Two Catholic clericalists won parliamentary seats: the lawyer Agostino Càmeroni, from Treviglio (in Bergamo), and Count Ottavio Cornaggia, from Milan.

Carlo Ottavio Cornaggia Medici Castiglioni (1851-1935) belonged to one of the oldest aristocratic families in Milan. In his very active political life he worked hard to bring about the full participation of Catholics in Italian politics, often mediating between moderates and Catholics to form alliances for local administrative elections. As editor-in-chief of the daily Lega Lombarda he was encouraged by Bonomelli to oppose the intransigent clericalists and promote the abrogation of the non expedit on the grounds that Catholic abstentionism favored the advance of the 〃reds.〃 Cornaggia^ views were quite conservative； among other things, he favored limited suffrage.

§26. America and Europe

I. All the information recorded by Gramsci in this note—including the reference to the International Labor Organization publication~~is drawn from an. article signed "Munitor〃：〃Gli albori di un nuovo spirito sociale in America(The dawning of a new social spirit in America), Nuova Antologia 62, no. 1336 (November 16f 1927): 118-23.

§27. Prince Karl Rohan

I. Gramsci extracted this information from an article by A. Rovini: Z/I1 Quarto Congresso internazionale delle Unioni Intelletuali,, (The fourth congress of the Unions of Intellectuals) in Nuova Antologia 62, no. 1335 (November i, 1927): 129-30.

Vittorio Scialoja (1856-1933)^ a professor of Roman law, had a distinguished political career: minister of justice in 1909-10, in Sonnino^ government； foreign minister in 1919-20, during Nitti's prime ministership； and Italian delegate to the League of Nations from 1921 to 1933.

2. The information on Karl Rohan's book was obtained from another article by A. Rovini, 〃Un principe nella Russia bolscevica" (A prince in Bolshevik Russia), in Nuova Antologia 62/ no. 1338 (December tG, 1927)： 538-39-

§28. Types of periodicals

1. On Francesco Coppola, see Notebook i, §35, n. 1； on Alfredo Rocco, see Notebook 2, §25/ n. 1.

2. Gramsci returns to a discussion of the need for a “yearbook" of the kind he describes in Notebook 4/ §49 (final paragraph), and its corresponding C text. Notebook 12, §1. In 1924, while in Vienna, Gramsci conceived of the idea of publishing a "yearbook of the working class/' but what he seems to have had in mind at that time was somewhat different from the kind of yearbook he describes in this note and much more similar to the type of "popular Almanac" he discusses in Notebook 14, §60, Gramsci outlined his idea in a letter he sent from Vienna to the executive committee of the Italian Communist Party on December 20, 1923:

I want to propose to you the compilation of a sort of yearbook of the working class that would contain, in succinct form, everything that can be of interest to a party member or a sympathizer. I have already planned the contents and I have thought about the allotment of the work for the various chapters. It could be published in the second half of 1924 in a volume of six hundred or even seven hundred pages.

In about thirty chapters it is possible to provide: an overview of the political and trade union movement in the world； an analysis of the Italian situation from all points of view (economic, military,, labor, financial, etc.). One section should be devoted to Marxism and its history, with special reference to Italy. One section should focus on Russia, its political organization^ its economic situation, the history of the Bolshevik party, etc. One of the chapters should summarize the position and the tactics of the Comintern as they have been developed in the congresses, the enlarged committees, and the most important public expressions of the executive committee.

I believe that after three years of civil war—which have made it very difficult to keep track systematically of the party newspapers and publications—it would a pleasure； especially for the expatriates, to have available a volume of this sort comprising the materials I have sketched.

For a complete version of Gramsci's letter, see the critical edition of his preprison letters: Lettere: 1908-1926, ed. Antonio Santucci (Turin: Einaudi, 1992), pp. 146-50.

§29. Catalogo dei cataloghi del libro italiano

i. Gramsci's source of information on the Catalogo dei cataloghi del libro italiano (Catalog of catalogs of Italian books) is a note by Aldo Sorani, repertorio della bibliografia italiana” (An inventory of Italian bibliography) in the "Bibliografie” (Bibliographies) section of II Marzocco 32, no. 25 (June 17, 1927). Gramsci may have learned about the subsequent publication of supplements to the Catalogo from advertisements that appeared in Lltalia Che Scnve.

§30. Another bibliographical publication

i. Gramsci found the information on the Catalogo metodico degli scritti contenuti nelle pubblicazioni periodiche italiane e straniere (Systematic catalog of the contents of Italian and foreign periodicals) in a brief note, zzUn repertorio di pubblicazioni periodiche” (An inventory of periodical publications) in II Marzocco 33/ no. 30 (July 22/ 1928).

§3i. Types of periodicals

i. Carlo Cattaneo launched II Politecnico, a monthly review, in Milan in 1839. Most of its articles were concerned with social issues, economics, science, and technology. The contributors were progressive intellectuals interested in the problems of education, labor, banking, and so on that were arising out of the new industrial and economic developments in northern Italy. The journal ceased publication in 1844, but it was restarted in 1859 and lasted until 1868, although Cattaneo relinquished the editorship in 1868. The Archivio triennale delle cose dltalia consisted of three volumes (published between 1850 and 1856) edited by Cattaneo that contained documents pertaining to Italian politics in the turbulent years of 1846-48. On Carlo Cattaneo, see Notebook i, §22, n. 4.

Eugenio Rignano (1870-1930), who studied industrial engineering in Turin, went on to write extensively on. such diverse subjects as political economy, sociology, biology, psychology, philosophy, and education. He was one of the founders of the international journal Scientia, which started publication in. 1907, and became its editor-in-chief in 1915.

2. On Antonio Labriola and his writings, see Notebook i, §44, n. 51.

3. In his autobiography, My Life (London: Thornton Butterworth, 1930), Leon Trotsky writes as follows about Labriola:

It was in my cell [in 1898] that I read with delight two well-known essays by an old Italian Hegelian-Marxist, Antonio Labriola, which reached the prison in a French translation. Unlike most Latin writ-ersz Labriola had mastered the materialist dialectics, if not in politics—in which he was helpless—at least in the philosophy of history. The brilliant dilettantism of his exposition actually concealed a very profound insight. He made short work, and in marvellous style, of the theory of multiple factors which were supposed to dwell on the Olympus of history and rule our fates from there.

Although thirty years have gone by since I read his essays, the general trend of his argument is still firmly entrenched in my memory, together with his continuous refrain of "Ideas do not drop from the sky.〃 After Labriola, all the Russian proponents of the multiplicity of factors, Lavrov, Mikhaylovsky Kareyev, and others, seemed utterly ineffectual to me. (106)

Trotsky continues: "At that time I was still comparatively ignorant of the basic literature of the Marxists. The essays by Labriola were really philosophic pamphlets and presumed a laiowledge that I had not, and for which I had to substitute guesswork. I finished them with a bunch of hypotheses inmy headz, (108).

Gramsci went to great lengths to obtain a copy of the Italian edition of Trotskyzs autobiography: La mìa vita, trans. E. Pocar (Milan: Mondadori/ 1930). On August 25z 1930 he wrote to his brother Carlo, asking him to apply for permission for Gramsci to be allowed to have certain books in prison, among them Trotsky's memoirs. The letter was withheld by the prison censor and never reached Carlo； at Gramsci's insistence, however, the letter was forwarded to the minister of justice, who denied Gramsci's request. In September 1930 Gramsci wrote directly to Mussolini. He drafted the "Petition to H. E. the head of government^ in Notebook 2 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:526-27). On December i, 1930, he wrote to Tatiana Schucht:

As you remember, some time ago, I submitted a request to the Head of Government to be allowed to read certain books that have been withheld, as well as two other books that I did not have but wanted .. permission to buy, namely: Fülop-Miller, Il volto del bolscevismo, with a preface by Curzio Malaparte, Bompiani, Milan； and Leon Trotsky, Mia vita, Mondadori, Milan. (I am not sure whether

Trotsky's book has this title or something similar.) The answer has arrived and it is favorable so I ask you to please write to the bookstore and have them sent to me.

It is unclear, however, how Gramsci knew about Trotsky's comment on Labriola when he composed this note. Presumably, Trotsky's book reached him sometime after December 1, 1930, whereas this note appears to have been written between May 30, 1930 (the date of composition of Notebook 3, §13, as indicated by Gramsci himself) and October 2, 1930 (which is when Gramsci consigned to his brother Carlo the book from which he quotes verbatim in §32—unless, of course, he was quoting from memory).

4. Gramsci owned a copy, in prison, of Georgy V. Plekhanov's Les questions fondamentales du marxism^ (Paris: Editions Sociales Internationales? 1927). For an English translation of this work (first published in Russian in 1908), see Fundamental Problems of Marxism, ed. D. Ryazanov, trans. Eden and Cedar Paul (New York: International Publishers, 1929).

Georgy Valentinovich Plekhanov (1856-1918), who spent most of his life in exile, was one of the most influential Marxist intellectuals of the Social Democratic movement in late-nineteenth-century Russia. In spite of the fact that he sided with the Mensheviks after 1903/ he retained the high esteem of Lenin and the Bolsheviks as a major philosopher of ^dialectical materialism”—a phrase that was first used by him to describe what he took to be Marx's fundamental theory of economic determinism applied in a dialectical way.

5. Gramsci is referring to Otto Bauer's Le socialisme, la religion et l'eglise (Brussels: UEglantine, 1928), a translation of Sozialdemokratie, Religion und Kirche (Vienna: Weinz Volksbuchhandlung, 1927). Gramsci received a copy of this book during his first year in the prison of Turi, In this work, Otto Bauer (1882-1938) tried to reconcile Marxist economics and the philosophy of Thomas Aquinas. Like other leading exponents of the current known as Austro-Marxism, such as Max Adler and Rudolf Hilferding, Bauer regarded Marxism as primarily a scientific system of sociological knowledge. In the Austro-Marxists7 view, Marx怎 fundamental contribution consisted in revealing the objective and causal laws that govern society and its development. They were opposed to the idea of a Bolshevik-style revolution, and their positivist approach to social and historical analysis was accompanied by a search for values in Kantian transcendental ethics. When Gramsci wrote that the Plekhanovian tendency

created its opposite/7 he probably had in mind some of the remarks made by Plekhanov himself in the opening pages of Fundamental Problems of Marxism, including the following: "Hitherto, no one has attempted to "supplement7 Marx by St. Thomas Aquinas. Still, it may well happen that, despite the recent papal encycEcal against the modernists, the Catholic world will produce a thinker capable of such a flight of fancy” (2).

6. On Henri De Man and his psychological treatment of socialism, see Notebook x, §6i, n. 13.

7. Gramsci is referring to Rosa Luxemburg's essay "Stillstand und Fortschritt im Marxismus,,f first published in Vorwärts on March 14, 1903. In all probability, Gramsci read Luxemburg's essay in a collection of writings on Marx edited by D. Ryazanovz Karl Marx homing pensem et révolutionnaire {Paris: Editions Sociales Internationales, 1928). For an English translation, see ^Stagnation and Progress of Marxism,n in D. Ryazanov, edv Karl Marx: Man, Thinker and Revolutionist, trans. Eden and Cedar Paul (New York: International Publishers, 1927), and in Mary-Alice Waters, ed., Rosa Luxemburg Speaks (New York: Pathfinder, 1970). In her essay, Luxemburg writes:

From the scientific standpoint, the third volume of Capital must, no doubt, be primarily regarded as the completion. of Marx's critique of capitalism. Without this third volume, we cannot understand, either the actually dominant law of the rate of profit； or the splitting up of surplus value into profit, interest, and rent； or the working of the law of value within the field of competition. But, and this is the main point, all these problems, however important from the outlook of pure theory, are comparatively unimportant from the practical outlook of class war. As far as the class war is concerned, the fundamental theoretical problem is the origin of surplus value, that is, the scientific explanation of exploitation； together with. the elucidation of the tendency towards the socialization of the process of production, that isz the scientific explanation of the objective groundwork of the socialist revolution.

Both these problems are solved in the first volume of Capita^ which deduces the ^expropriation of the expropriatois,/ as the inevitable and ultimate result of surplus value and of the progressive, concentration of capital. Therewith, as far as theory is concerned, the essential need of the labor movement is satisfied. The workers, being actively engaged in the class war, have no direct interest in the . question how surplus value is distributed among the respective groups of exploiters； or in the question how, in the course of this distribution, competition brings about rearrangements of production.

That is why, for socialists in general, the third volume of Capital remains an unread book....

The working class will not be in a position to create a science and an art of its own until it has been fully emancipated from its present class position.

The utmost it can do today is to safeguard bourgeois culture from the vandalism of the bourgeois reaction, and create the social conditions requisite for a free cultural development....

Only in proportion as our movement progresses, and demands the solution of new practical problems do we dip once more into the treasury of Marx thought, in order to extract therefrom and to utilize new fragments of his doctrine. But since our movement, like all the campaigns of practical life, inclines to go on working in old ruts of thought, and to cling to principles after they have ceased to be valid, the theoretical utilization of the Marxist system proceeds very slowly. (Waters, 109-11.)

8. On. Andrea Costa, see Notebook 3, §8, n. 5, above.

§32. ^Rendre la vie impossible^

1. Eugène D'Ors, La vie de Goya (Paris: Gallimard, 1928). Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison； it is listed in Notebook 2 among the "Books delivered to Carlo on 2 October 工930〃 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:529).

2. See D'OiS/ La vie de Goya, p. 54: “Fuyant ^Inquisition—au moins ^Inquisition diffuse, qui tue elle aussi en Pendant la vie impossible'— Goya a laissé Saragosse pour Madrid."

§34. Past and present

1. See Notebook 1, §127.

2. Gramsci is referring to an article by Benito Mussolini； "Preludio al Machiavelli” (Preface to Machiavelli), Gerarchia 3/ no. 4 (April 1924). It has been published in English as "Prelude" in the edition of Machiavelli^ Prince translated with an introduction by George Bull (London: Folio Society, 1970). Among other things, Mussolini writes:

Well then, what emerges clearly, even from a superficial reading of The Prince, is the acute pessimism of Machiavelli in the face of human nature. Like all those who have occasion for continuous and extensive intercourse with their own. kind, Machiavelli is a despiser of men and likes to present them to us ... in their most negative and humiliating aspects.

...It is also evident that Machiavelli, in judging men as he did, did not refer only to those of his own time, to the Florentines, Tuscans, Italians who actually straddled the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries, but to men irrespective of time and place. Time has passed, but if I were allowed to judge my fellows and contemporaries, I could not in any way attentuate Machiavelli's verdict. I should have, perhaps, to go furtlier still. Machiavelli does not deceive himself and he does not deceive the Prince. The antithesis between Prince and people, between State and individual is, in Machiavelli^ thought, preordained. What was called Machiavellian cynicism, utilitarianism, pragmatism, follows logically from this original position. The word Prince must be understood as State. In the thought of Machiavelli the Prince is the State. While individuals, motivated by their egoism, tend towards social indifference, the State represents organization and restrictions. The individual always tends to evade his public responsibilities. He tends to disobey laws, to avoid paying taxes, to escape war. Few are those~~heroes or saints—who sacrifice their own selves on the altar of the state....

...So, even in regimes that have been concocted from the Encyclopedia—which erred, through Rousseau, from a boundless excess of optimism—there is inherent discord between the organized force of the State and the fragmentation of individuals and groups. Regimes based completely on consent have never existed, do not exist, and probably never will exist.

3. See Giuseppe Rens] "La 'belva bionda' " (The fair-haired beast), Rivista di Milano, March 5, 1920, reprinted in Rensfs book, Principi di politica impopolare (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1920), pp. 162-174. Rensi writes:

The disorder and the deep division of minds that prevail in the moral sphere are mirrored in the economic sphere. It is now clear to everyone that the disorganization in the field of labor is total. Labor unrest, incessant strikes, the continuous escalation of demands (no sooner is one demand met than another one is raised)—this convulsive tumult that makes it obvious that the working class is no longer expressing its desire for economic improvements but rather its will to power— are seriously paralyzing industry and production. It is therefore even more obvious to everyone that either the strikes, unrest, and demands will destroy the social structure, shattering the delicate interdependent web of work, needs, population, and demography, pushing humanity back to a primitive economy； or else an authority is now needed to impose itself and to introduce, by force if necessary, order, reliability, the necessary discipline, and the subordination of the individual to society and its needs: a way must be found to constrain the impulses, the caprices, the explosions of individual interests. Or else； what is needed is (to use a charged term) slavery, in that slavery consists in a pressure that forces the individual not to use his time and his activities entirely according to his own wishes. Let it be known: after the abolition of ancient slavery and servitude, this pressure was the very same one that became automatically a part of the wage-earning system: that is, it was inherent in the fact that since the workers had no other means of subsistence, in order to live they had to perform some kind of rigorously specified work. Suppose the wage-earning system disappears and the workers become the owners of the means of production and of industry with all forms of power in their hands； it will not be possible unless the automatic pressure by which the wage-earning system compelled workers to work regularly were replaced by some other, equally effective form of pressure: in other words, a form of pressure that would compel one to work regularly in spite of the ineluctable inclination we all have to rebel against such work unless coerced, (pp. 164-65)

In another essay, ^Rivoluzione di schiaveria〃 (Revolutions of slavishness), also in Principi di politica impopolare, Rensi writes:

I pose the general question in the following manner: can the worker—the man in so far as he works—be the master? There is no doubt in my mind that no is the answer. The worker—and this applies not only to the manual worker who is taken to be the authentic "proletarian" but also to those who work in the liberal and bourgeois professions, like doctors, engineers, and lawyers—the worker, as I was saying, in so far as he works, is and cannot but be dependent, subservient, a servant in some way or another of whoever requires his services. It is to the latter that the worker, in so far as he works, hands over his activity and his time； in other words, his life. It is the latter who can and must command: he should be able, within the working context, to make the workers do what he wants, and to have the means—at least with the power to fire the workers—to compel the workers to obey him, as far as work is concerned. Aristotle was absolutely right when he asserted that slavery was necessary and that there will always be slavery, (pp. 3-4)

Rensi's book is dedicated to the Socialist Party leader Filippo Turati, and its frontispiece has the following quotation from Machiavelli (The Discourses, book 3, chap. 27): “The Roman Consuls who reconciled the people of Ardea provide us with an example of how to restore union in. a divided city: there is no other cure than to destroy the ringleaders of the disturbances."

Giuseppe Rensi (1871-1941) was a journalist and a lawyer before he turned to philosophy, which he taught at the universities of Messina and Genoa. The author of many books, he was especially interested in the philosophy of skepticism. His anti-idealism made him an opponent of Benedetto Croce and Giovanni Gentile； two of the most prominent Italian philosophers of the time. His skepticism made him suspicious of dogmatism in theory, but politically he was antiliberal and antidemocratic. After 1922, however, he started distancing himself from the Fascist movement； he became a severe critic of the Fascist regime and in 1934 was forced to resign his professorship. Rensi had known Mussolini since 1898 when they met in Como, at a time when they were both socialist political emigres.

§35. Giuseppe Rensi

1. Giuseppe Rensi started writing for the socialist periodical Critica Sociale in 1895. He moved to Switzerland in 1898 and returned to Italy in 1908.

2. Gramsci is referring to two articles by Giuseppe Rensi: "La ragione del male nella storia secondo Seneca e Renouvier?/ (The cause of evil in history according to Seneca and Renouviei), Nuova Rivista Storica 13/ no. 3-4 (May-August 1929)： 255-70； and ^Necessità e razionalità“ (Necessity and rationality)； Nuova Rivista Storica 工4/ no. 1-2 (January-April 1930): 21-28. In the second article, where he argues against the notion that history is rational, Rensi writes:

In order to affirm an ethical principle one must deny the rationality of history. For whoever accepts the rationality of history is forced to admit that rationality is embodied in the unjust, monstrous； and atrocious facts out of which past and present history is woven, and he must recognize such facts as rational. On the other hand； whoever denies the rationality of history does so precisely because his alert and watchful ethical sense would not allow him to justify such facts (not even on the grounds that some alleged good could come of them, because the good could have been realized without those facts for which it is supposed to provide the excuse). In other words, whoever denies the rationality of history does so because his ethical sense cannot be suppressed and because he submits facts to the uncompromising judgment of his ethical sense and does not make his ethical sense bow before the facts or be blunted by them. Only such a watchful ethical sense perceives the irreducible antithesis between historical reality and ethicity, or rather between history and rationality, It alone notices that history does not correspond to morals, that history is not what should be: in other words, that history is not rational. The degree of ethicity of an individual, then, is measured precisely by the degree to which he finds history morally intolerable.

by the number of charges and condemnations that he feels compelled to level against history: that is, by the extent to which he feels history to be irrational. The liveliness of one's awareness of the irrationality of history is the yardstick of one's personal ethicity. (p. 28)

3. Giuseppe Rensi's earliest contributions to II Popolo d'Italia (the daily newspaper founded by Mussolini in 1914) were published in 1915, His articles appeared with greater frequency between 1919 and 1922； in them he expressed nationalistic, antisocialist, and conservative views. By 1923, however, he stopped writing for the newspaper because he had distanced himself from Fascism after the march on Rome. Rensi's articles for Il Popolo dltalia and other writings he published in different newspapers and periodicals have been collected in two volumes: L'orma di Protagora (The mark of Protagoras) (Milan: Treves, 1920), and Teoria e pratica della reazione politica (The theory and practice of political reaction) (Milan: Società Editrice La Stampa Commerciale, 1922).

4. At the Sixth Congress of Philosophy, held in Milan on March 28-30, 1926, there was a public antifascist demonstration following a courageous speech by Francesco De Sarlo on Z/Ualta cultura e la libertà(High culture and freedom). The congress was suspended by the Fascist authorities. Giovanni Gentile wrote an article about the congress in the April 14/1926/ issue of II Popolo d'Italia^ the article was reprinted in Gentile's book on Fascism and culture, Fascismo e cultura (Milan: Treves, 1928), pp、103-9. Gramsci owned a copy of this book in prison. In his article, Gentile attacked Rensi, among others:

that merry philosopher who teaches at Genoa, who leaps and dances and makes faces before the public. Today he demonstrates the truth and tomorrow the falsehood of whatever philosophy he happens to be dealing with； first he was an idealist, then a skeptic, and later a dogmatist； yesterday he was a philosopher of authoritarianism； today he is a philosopher of freedom. He was always a sophist with a vain mind. On this occasion in Milan he too was applauded for his latest farce on "Critical Materialism”—which is like talking about the squared circle.

Rensi responded to Gentile怎 attack with a letter to II Popolo dltalia, which the newspaper published on April 16,1926. Rensi wrote: /zWhatever Senator Gentile may think of me, I am consoled by the thought that the views he expressed the other day cannot be those of II Popolo dltalia. It could not be otherwise, for on November 2/ 1922, the editor of this newspaper wrote to me that 'today more than ever good contributors are needed7 and that he wished he 'could count on me' to continue doing for this paper what I had done during the Bolshevik period, when at least three-fourths of those who now want to collaborate did not deign to write or get involved/7 Rensi also recalled that the previous year Gentile had invited him to write for the Enciclopedia italiana, which Gentile directed.

§36. Cultwal matters

1. On this episode, see Notebook 3, §9.

2. The information on the performance of the farce Un'avventura galante ai bagni di Cernobbio (A gallant adventure at the baths of Cernobbio) is extracted from a letter by Carlo Volpati published under the title 〃Fu Vincenzo Monti Fautore deìlfAvventura galante^' (Did Vincenzo Monti write the Avventura galante^) in the z/Commenti e frammenti” (Comments and fragments) section of II Marzocco 33, no. 45 (November 4,工928).

On Vincenzo Monti, see Notebook i, §147, n. 1.

§37. Father Bresciani's progeny

x. See Notebook i, §93. See also Notebook 1, §93, n. i, for more on Tommaso Gallarati Scotti and his collection of short stories Storie del-Pamor sacro e dell"amor profano (Tales of sacred and profane love).

2. Paolo Ar cari was best known for his studies on such literary and philosophical figures as Vico, Metastasi。，Pascal, and Manzoni, even though he wrote several novels, none of which, however, earned him a reputation as a significant novelist. He also edited (with Alberto Caroncini) LAzioner a liberal and nationalist political review published in Milan. For another note on Arcari, see Notebook 2, §25/ n. 1.

3. Luciano Gennari was awarded a prize by the Académie Fran^aise for one of his novels, LItalie qui vient (Paris, 1929), written in French.

4. The early work of Paul Bourget (1852-1935) was strongly influenced by positivist philosophy； he wrote novels in the naturalistic tradition and literary essays in the mode of Hippolyte Taine. In 1889, however, he changed course radically with the publication of Le disciple, a novel that demonizes positivist thought and enjoins youth to resist the seductions of modern scientific theory and to abide by traditional morality. He converted to Catholicism in 1901, after which he wrote increasingly didactic and moralistic novels extolling nationalism, conservative values, Catholicism, and the monarchy.

René Bazin (1853-1932), a professor of law at the Catholic University of Angers, exalted traditional values in novels that contrasted the corruption of city life with the simplicity and virtuousness of life in the provinces. In one of his novels, Le blé qui lève (1907), corruption is represented by the influence of trade unionism on woodcutters. At one time Bazin was regarded as one of the important members of the group of conservative French Catholic novelists who flourished during the first three decades of the twentieth century.

Francois Mauriac (1885-1970)^ winner of the 1952 Nobel Prize for Literature, had already established himself as a major novelist in France by the middle of the 1920s. Arguably the best of the French group of conservative Catholic novelists, he was certainly the most successful and acclaimed. Mauriac's novels are mostly psychological moral dramas permeated with religious concerns and motifs: sin, grace, personal redemption.

George Bernanos (1888-1948( was still a minor figure when Gramsci wrote this note. He achieved great success in 1936 with the publication of Journal drun cure de campagne [The Diary of a Country Priest]. Like the work of other French Catholic novelists, Bernanos^s fiction, dramatizes the struggle for the soul by the forces of good and evil. Many of his characters are priests. Bernanos also had a keen interest in politics. In 1938 he published Les grands cimitières sous la lime, a severe condemnation of fascist violence in the Spanish Civil War and of the Catholic hierarchy that condoned it.

$. Filippo Crispolti, Un duello (Milan: Treves, 1900). Gramsci discusses (tIl Duello" in Notebook 6, §56. Gramsci also comments on Crispolti in Notebook i, §69； Notebook 5, §101； Notebook 6, §183； and Notebook 7, §50.

Filippo Crispolti (1857-1942), a militant Catholic who participated in the formation of the Popular Party, was a prolific writer on social, political, and cultural topics—almost always from a Catholic perspective. He also held editorial positions at some of the most important Catholic newspapers, including II Momento of Turin and the Vatican's Osservatore Romano. Crispolti served as a member of parliament before becoming senator in 1922.

6. Gramsci is referring to Mario Missiroli^ book, published in Rome by Tipografia del Littorio (with no date, but actually brought out in 1929): Date a Cesare: La politica religiosa di Mussolini con documenti inediti (Give unto Caesar: The religious policy of Mussolini, with hitherto unpublished documents). In this book, Missiroli criticizes the state of Italian Catholic culture in general, and he specifically decries the poverty of religious studies in Italy (see pp. 391-99(. Gramsci had a copy of this book while in prison.

On Mario Missiroli, see Notebook i, §43/ n. 12.

7. Maria Di Borio was the pseudonym of the countess Maria Gauthier Panzoja. Gramsci had once described her as a "Catholic Francophile/7 a "boring novelist“ and a ^sanctimonious preacher of virtuousness." See his article 〃La divina favella(The divine language), in his regular column "Sotto la Mole〃 in the Piedmont edition of Avanti! June 27/ 1916.

§38. Father Bresciani's progeny. A. Fanzini: "Vita di Cavour"

1. Gramsci is quoting the opening sentence of the first installment of Alfredo Panzini's Vita di Cavour (Life of Cavour) in LItalia Letteraria i, no. 10 (June 9, 1929). In the rest of this note Gramsci quotes sentences and phrases from subsequent installments of Panzini's biography of Cavour. It seems that when he was writing this note Gramsci had in front of liim all the installments of Panzini's work published in the weekly issues of LItalia Letteraria from June 9, 1929, to October 13, 1929 (vol. i, no. 10-28).

2. The passage refers to Vittorio Emanuele II, king of Sardinia (1849-61) and, after unification, king of Italy (1861-78).

3. Carlo Emanuele III (1701-73) was renowned for his military skills. He inherited the throne of Sardinia-Piedmont in 1730 on the death of his father, Vittorio Amedeo U.

On Emanuele Filiberto, see Notebook 2, §60, n. 1, 1: 556.

4. "Manly honor" and z/man of honorn are used here to render the Italian 〃galantomismo〃 and /z galantuomo/7 which have no exact equivalents in English. The words have various nuances, such as "honesty, uprightness, gentlemanlinessand "honest man, gentleman, honorable man/7 respectively.

5. Ferdinando Martini, Confessioni e ricordi,工859-1892 (Milan: Treves, 1928), pp. 152-53. Gramsci had this book of memoirs while in prison at Turi. It is among the books that he listed in Notebook 2 and consigned to his relatives in 1932 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:530). See also Gramsci's letter to his brother Carlo, June 13, 1932. Some of the contents of this book are also discussed in. Notebook 6, §114.

On Ferdinando Martini, see Notebook 2, §51, n. 2.

6. Gramsci is referring to (but confuses the published source of) a group of fifty-six letters by Massimo D'Azeglio that formed part of a larger collection of epistolary documents from the Risorgimento that had a very controversial publication history. The first person to propose publication of these documents was Professor Luigi Cesare Bollea in 1912, but he was blocked from doing so by the authorities. Nevertheless, they were published a few years later by Perdinando Gabotto, in the review II Risorgimento Italiano, n.s., 9, no. 1-2 (1916): 1-544, published in Turin by Bocca. The same collection of documents一which primarily concerned the French-Italian alliance, the war of 1859 against Austria, and the expedition of Garibaldi^ Thousand—was then published in a book by Luigi Cesare Bollea himself: Una silloge di lettere del Risorgimento: Di particolare atti-

nenza all'alleanza franco-italiana, alla guerra del 1859 e alla spedizione dei Mille. 1839-1873 (Turin: Bocca, 1919). Bollea discussed the legal obstacles he faced in his efforts to publish the documents in an article, "Come fu compilato l'epistolario di L. C. Farini” (How L. C. Farini's correspondence was collected), in a special supplement on the Risorgimento of the Bollettino Storico-Bibliografico Subalpino 1 (1912): 68-89, published in Turin. The controversy surrounding the publication of these documents is also brought up in Notebook 2, §95/ and Notebook 6, §46.

7. See Notebook 2, §29, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 2.

8. The parenthetic interpolation is Gramsci's.

9. Gramsci is referring to his remarks onp. 10 of the manuscript of this notebook； see Notebook 3/ §13. The source of the quotation from Panzini's letter at the end of this paragraph is the same one that Gramsci cited in §13 above: LItalia Letteraria rf no. 13 (June 30, 1929).

10. See Notebook 1, §24, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 8.

11. See Notebook 1, §24, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 10. On Antonio Bresciani, see Notebook 1, "Notes and Jottings/7 n. 6.

12. Pierre-Alexis Ponson du Terrail (1829-71 ) was the author of the fictional adventures of Rocambole, a very long and popular series.

13. Antoine-Nicolas de Condorcet (1743-94), mathematician and philosopher of the Enlightenment, wrote influential books on, among other things, probability theory and humanity's unlimited potential for progress.

Jacques-Henri Bernardin de Saint-Pierre (1737-1814), a friend and follower of Rousseau, celebrated cultural primitivism in. his writings. His best-known work is Paul et Virginie (1788), a pastoral tale of innocent love that ends in tragedy with the incursion of civilization.

14* Alfonso Ferrero de La Marmora (1804-78)—whose name also appears as Lamarmoragained a strong reputation as a skillful soldier in the 1848 war against Austria, after which he served as minister of war for over a decade. In 1855 he commanded the Sardinian-Piedmontese forces in the Crimean War. La Marmora was prime minister from 1:859 to i860 and again from 1864 to 1866. In 1866 he led the Italian army against the Austrians in. the Battle of Custoza and suffered a heavy defeat.

General Enrico Morozzo della Rocca (1807-97) was chief aide-de-camp to King Vittorio Emanuele II and performed some important diplomatic duties in France； on occasion, he served as a channel of communication between the king and Napoleon HL He served for some time as minister of war and in 1859 became the army chief of staff. In the war of 1866 against Austria he commanded the third corps of the Italian army.

15. On Enrico Cialdinix see Notebook 2, §29, n. 6.

Count Carlo Pellion di Persano (1806-83), minister of the navy in Rattazzi's government was the admiral in charge of the Italian siege of the island of Lissa, in the Adriatic, in 1866. The blockade was broken by an Austrian naval force with fewer and inferior ships； Persano even lost his flagship in the battle. He was court-martialed and stripped of his rank as a result.

16. Antonio Bruers, “Come e perché Alfredo Fanzini ha scritto una Vita di Cavomr, (How and why Alfredo Fanzini has written a life of Cavour), LItalia Letteraria i, no. 9 (June 2, 1929).

On Antonio Bruers； see Notebook i, §99/ n. 1.

17. In his interview with Panzini, Bruers alludes to the biography of Cavour written by Maurice Paléologue. This must have given Gramsci the impression that Bruers had translated the French historian's work into Italian. In fact, someone else was responsible for the translation； see Maurice Paléologue, Cavouif trans. Lyna Pioresi Dondini (Bologna: Cappelli, 1929). Gramsci had a copy with him in prison of the fourth French edition of Paléologue's book: Un grand réaliste: Cavour (Paris: Pion, 1926).

18. Felice Orsini (see Notebook i, §43, n. 29) and some radical accomplices attempted unsuccessfully to assassinate Napoleon III on January 14, 1858. Orsini was guillotined two months later. At first, the assassination attempt threatened to derail the Franco-Piedmontese alliance against Austria； however, relations were solidified soon afterward by an agreement Cavour and Napoleon III reached at a secret meeting in Plombières on July 20, 1858.

§39. Past and present

1. Gramsci owned a copy of the 1929 yearbook published by the cen

tral office of statistics of the Italian government: Annuario statistico italiano: 1929, ser. 3, vol. 3 (Rome: Istituto Poligrafico dello Stato, 1929). He had asked Tatiana Schucht to send it to him in a letter of March 25, 1929. The volume contains (on pp. 163-81 ) the results of the census of industrial operations conducted in Italy on October 15, 1927, but it does not provide data on specific cities or industrial centers.                               :

2. On the "hundred cities," see also Gramsci's comment in Notebook L§43・

§40. Reformation and Renaissance

i. Gramsci first mentions Gobetti^, Missiroli's, and Dorso's interpretations of the Risorgimento as a "royal conquest" in Notebook i, §44. He returns to this topic in Notebook 9, §89 and §111.

On Piero Gobetti, see Notebook i, §44, n. 29； on Mario Missiroli, see Notebook iz §43, n. 12； and on Guido Dorso, see Notebook i, §44, n. 30.

2. See Notebook i, §44, n. 30.

3. Guido Mazzali was a frequent contributor (especially between 1925 and 1926) to Conscientia, a Protestant journal edited by Giuseppe Gangale. In this instance, Gramsci is probably referring to Mazzali's article “Engels e Fanabattismo(Engels and the Anabaptist movement),, Conscientia 4, no. 44 (October 34 1925). In this article Mazzali criticizes Engels for failing to appreciate the importance of the Reformation.

Gramsci had attacked Mazzali in two articles: /Zl/espiazione del Partito Socialista7" (The expiation of the Socialist Party), in L Unità, September 29/ 1926； and ^Concezioni comode” (Convenient ideas), in I/Unità, October if 1926. Gramsci was provoked by a statement made by the socialist Mazzali in a publication sponsored by Conscientia: Tesi ed amici del nuovo protestantismo (Rome: Bilychnis, 1926): "I believe I can place Marxist praxis within the framework of an austere conception of life that descends from God and rises toward God" (p. 38). (A copy of this publication is preserved among Gramsci's books.) In the first of his two articles, Gramsci wrote, among other things: 〃This gentleman [Mazzali] voted in favor of the communist motion at the congress of Livorno, but at the last moment he decided to remain a member of the Socialist Party, because our party did not guarantee him a stipend. That was when he started meditating on the Religious' conception of socialism and on Marxism as a means of ascent [to God].”

4. Thomas G. Masaryk, La Russia e VEuropa: Studi sulle correnti spirituali in Russia (Russia and Europe: Studies on religious currents in Russia), trans. Ettore Lo Gatto, 2 vols. (Naples: Ricciardi, 1922； Rome: Istituto Romane Editoriale, 1925).

Tomas Garrigue Masaryk (1850-1937), a leading Czech nationalist, was interested in and wrote about the Slavic religious heritage. After 1889 he increasingly devoted his energies to the cause of Slavic liberation and during the First World War championed Czech independence. He was president of the Czech nation from its founding in 1918 until 1935.

§41. Father Biesciani's progeny

1. Gramsci is referring to the classic Italian novel Ipromessi sposi [The Betrothed), by Alessandro Manzoni, first published in 1827/ and to Ugo Foscolo's poem Dei sepolcri {On tombs), first published in 1807. In Dei sepolcri, the patriotic poet Foscolo (1778-1827) celebrates the historic national glories of Italy through a series of reflections inspired by the tombs of illustrious Italians.

2. Gramsci owned a copy of Henry Ford's Ma vie et mon oeuvre (Paris: Payot, 1926), the French translation of Ford's autobiography, My Life and My Work (Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1922). In the preface to the French edition, Victor Cambon writes:

Les Américains du Nord, qui ont sur bien des points des conceptions originales, soutiennent volontiers que la supériorité des intelligences est moins variée qu'on ne le croit et quzelles s'adaptent généralement aux objets qui, de leur temps, conférent la puissance ou la célébrìté,

Voici quelle est leur thèse:

〃Le travail le plus en honneur à chaque epoque a toujours attire les plus hautes intelligences de cette époque. Lorsque, sous les Médicis, czétaient la peinture et la sculpture, les cerveaux les plus vastes s'y adonnaient. Léonard de Vinci, Michel Ange embrassaient toutes les connaissances, meme techniques, de leurs temps, mais ils étaient avant tout peintres et sculpteurs. Les grands navigateurs du règne dTlisabeth, les har dis pionniers comme le Francis Lassalle seraient aujourd'hui des hommes de chemins de fer/z

Cette idée revient souvent sous la plume des Américains. (pp. vii-viii)

Gramsci discusses this point further in Notebook 15, §53.

§42. Past and present

1. Gramsci is concerned here with the failure of the Italian left, and specifically the Socialists, to resist the rise of fascism successfully. In the rest of the note he reflects on the "history 〃 of the Socialist movement, on the events, internal struggles, and policies that rendered both the maximalist and reformist wings ineffectual.

2. In November 1917 the maximalist or "intransigent" faction of the Italian Socialist Party held a secret meeting in Florence, at the house of Mario Trozzi. At the meeting/ Trozzi accused Gramsci (who was partici-: pating as a representative of the Turin socialists) of being a Bergsonian voluntarist (Gramsci alludes to this episode in Notebook nz §12). The charge of Bergsonianism was leveled against Gramsci and the Ordine Nuovo group on other occasions as well. Gramsci responded to one such accusation in an editorial in LOrdine Nuovo 2/ no. 18 (October 16-23,1920): 137:

At the congress of the Italian reformists held in Reggio Emilia, the Hon. Claudio Treves—the most cultured man in the parliamentary group, the most brilliant journalist of Italian socialism, the authentic Marxist in our poor country of idiots and Bolshevik sycophants— revealed that those who write for LOrdine Nuovo are followers of Bergson and that Lévolution créatrice is our group's bible. This is not the first, nor will it be the last, of the Hon. Claudio Treves's discoveries in the field of culture. .. . Did he not discover recently that the Moscow congress had decided to save parliaments and universal suffrage and put forward a constitutional system in which parliament and the Soviets would coexist? Did he not discover that Lenin, Bukharin, and Radek have appropriated the theses of Kautsky, Adler, and Hilferding?

Yet the Hon. Claudio Treves, who does not read or study or think ... and who certainly has not even read the Comumnist Manifesto ...or Bergson, acts like the teacher of wisdom and of life, and he scolds the revolutionaries for their ignorance and the working class for its immaturity. . . . We, the young, are entitled to ask Italian reformists such as Treves, Turati, Prampolini, and Zibordi: 〃What have you done to elucidate socialist thought? Where are your books? Where are your analyses of the economic conditions of Italy?…. Have you examined the mode of existence of the Italian proletariat? Can you tell us how the agrarian question manifests itself in Italy?

...Doesn't the anger of reformists who are in danger of being expelled from the party mirror the anger of capitalists who are in danger of being expelled from the factories? The party is ours, we are the ones who organized it； down with Bergson who wants to take it away from us.

relations. ^Bombacci is satisfied with the form/7 Togliatti writes. "And revolution for him becomes merely a word, a shadow； the revolutionary organs he wants to create are the shadow of a shadow/7 True revolutionary activity, Togliatti maintains, starts in the working place, where workers become conscious of their own roles and of their adversarial relation to the owners of the means of production. Togliatti concludes: ^BombaccVs project assumes that this consciousness already exists among such a large number of producers and so powerfully that it is capable of giving birth to a vast network of state organs. The activity of establishing [factory] councils is based on the recognition that until this consciousness is universally affirmed in the working place, it is futile to talk about the founding of a new state” (315).

4, The first chamber of labor ( Camera del Lavoro] was founded in 1891, in Milan, by the printersz union of that city and by the Italian Workers Party (the precursor of the Italian Socialist Party). Within a few years many such chambers, representing tens of thousands of workers, were established throughout Italy. Each chamber was autonomous, bringing together and coordinating the activities of various urban and rural labor groups and organizations in a specific area. Many chambers had very close ties with the Italian Socialist Party, but others more closely reflected the politics and policies of the revolutionary syndicalists, the anarchists, or even the Republican Party. In 1906 the chambers of labor joined with the federated trade unions to form the Confederazione Generale del Lavoro (general confederation of labor), which was dominated by reformist socialists. The more radical or revolutionary chambers helped establish the Unione Sindacale Italiana (Italian syndicalist union) six years later. The influence and power of the chambers of labor grew even greater after World War Iz thanks to a soaring membership. In the early 1920s, however, they became the frequent targets of violent attacks by organized Fascist squads. Members were intimidated by the destruction of facilities and the physical assaults on their leaders and representatives. The chambers were finally abolished in 1:926, by the ^Exceptional Decreesof the Fascist regime.

5. Claudio Treves delivered what came to be known as the z/expiation speech" in parliament on March 30, 1920, The full text of the speech is published in Claudio Treves, Come ho veduto la guerra, 2d ed. (Milan: Edizioni della Rassegna Internazionale, 1925), pp. 233-56.

In the opening part of the speech he said, addressing the liberal deputies: Z/The crisis and its tragedy consist precisely in the fact that you are unable to impose your order and we cannot yet impose ours/7 He concluded the speech as follows:

The crisis of the regime. See! The speech comes full circle to the point where it started. The crisis, the fever, the restlessness, the agi-tated masses, the impotence of economic measures to feed the people and of governments to make peace: things fall apart! You would like it to be over with, and you say to us: "Make the revolution or leave us in peace/7 Neither one thing nor the other! Revolution is an agez not a day； it has the characteristics of a natural phenomenon: slow erosions, abrupt landslides. We are in the middle of it, and we will be for a good number of years.... But, of course, you would like it to be over and done with. It is not dying that scares you； it is this state of nonliving that exasperates you. But it is not in our power to cut short the forward movement of God's plan. That is terribly long and painful. Though long and painful, it is also necessary because it is the ineluctable outcome of what has been done； and no one can undo what has already been done. This is the inexorable corollary of the crime. Yes； gentleman, this is the expiation.

Gramsci makes additional observations on this speech in Notebook 3, §44z and Notebook ri, §12 (in the concluding paragraph of the note).

Claudio Treves (1869-1933), together with his close friend Filippo Turati, was the most prominent leader of the reformist wing of the Italian Socialist Party. He became editor of Avanti! in 1910, a position he held until 1912/ when Mussolini's faction prevailed over the reformists in the Socialist Party. During his editorship Treves strenuously opposed the Libyan War, and later he campaigned vigorously against Italian intervention in World War L After the devastating defeat suffered by the Italian army at Caporetto, Treves and other reformists, stung by the accusations of being unpatriotic leveled against them by nationalists, supported the war policies of the government. Treves, like Turati and other reformists, was expelled from the party in 1922； they almost immediately established a new party, the Partito Socialista Unitario, that was more of a labor party than a socialist one. In 1926 Fascist repression compelled Treves to seek refuge in Paris； he was never able to return to his native country. He had been a member of parliament for twenty years—he had first been elected in 1906. In Paris he was one of the most prominent leaders of the exiled anti-Fascist movement, but even then his moderate positions brought him into open conflict with more radical opponents of the regime, such as Carlo Rosselli.

6. The phrase "with a ridiculous sense of self-importance/, is a very loose rendering of Gramsci's virtually untranslatable description of the petty bourgeois as people who act like ,/mosche cocchiere." "Mosche cocchieref/ literally means "coachmen flies." The phrase—which Gramsci also uses elsewhere—is an allusion to the fly in La Fontaine's fable, Le coche et la monche, who believes that only thanks to his efforts was a coach drawn by six horses able to make it up a steep hill. Giosuè Carducci entitled one of his essays "Mosche cocchiere〃： see Edizione nazionale delle opere di Giosuè Carducci (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1939), 25:362-82.

7. The point that Gramsci is making here—namely, that the widespread popular uprisings of 1919 and 1920 produced a reactionary backlash because of the inept leadership of the Socialist Party and its separation from the people一is reiterated in Notebook 3, §44, and Notebook 14, §10.

8. On September 29, 1918/ the Socialist Party and the General Confederation of Labor reached an agreement (the "pact of alliance") concerning their respective spheres of activity: the party would be responsible for proclaiming and directing all political strikes and protests； the cgl would oversee all actions (including strikes) of an economic nature. They also agreed to collaborate without obstructing each other.

Two weeks after the agreement was reached, Gramsci wrote an article about it: "Il patto d'alleanza” (The pact of alliance), published in II Grido del Popolo on October 12, 1918, and in Avanti! on October 17, 1918. In this article, Gramsci characterizes the pact as a "juridical" solution to the quarrel between the party and the confederation, and he warns against the illusion "that we have now entered an idyllic era of perfect harmony." The party, Gramsci argues, is still too distant from the workers； its leadership makes agreements on behalf of the workers' movement but has done little to foster a genuinely mass-based revolutionary consciousness. 〃The leaders acquire an authority and an importance that they should not have in view of the egalitarian and essentially democratic spirit of the organizations. Instead of being executives and administrators, the leaders often—all too often—decide on their own." Gramsci also wrote an editorial on the question of relations between party and trade unions in LOrdine Nuovo 2, no. 13 (August 12, 1920), which he concludes by saying "the Italian movement has not only failed to resolve, in practice, the problem of the relations between the party and the trade unions, but it has not even raised the question for discussion. The Italian proletarian movement finds itself in a situation in which it is the field of activity of two political parties: the official one and the de facto one constituted by the trade union leaders/,

Gramsci's remarks in this note echo the assertion made in paragraph 37 of the "Lyons Thesesn drafted by Gramsci and Palmiro Togliatti and approved by the third congress of the Italian Communist Party/which was held in that French city from January 21 through January 26/ 1926:

The party leads the class, penetrating all the organizations in which the working masses are assembled； within them and through them it carries out a systematic mobilization of energies in line with the program of the class struggle and an activity aimed at gaining majority support for communist directives.

The organizations in which the party works—which tend, by their very nature； to incorporate the whole working mass一can never be a substitute for the Communist Party, which is the political organization of revolutionaries, that is, the vanguard of the proletariat. This excludes any relationship of subordination or of "equality" between mass organizations and the party (the Stuttgart trade union pact； the pact of alliance between the Italian Socialist Party and the General Confederation of Labor).

For a translation of the complete text of the "Lyons Theses/7 see Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Political Writings: 1921-1926, ed. and trans. Quintin Hoare (New York: International Publishers, 1978), pp. 340-75.

9. Gramsci is alluding to the events surrounding the popular insurrection known as the "red week" of June 1914. On June 7 the police fired on a crowd attending an antimilitary meeting in Ancona, killing three people and wounding about twenty others. The incident triggered widespread protests, demonstrations, confrontations with the police, and strikes. On June 10 there was a general strike, supported by both the Socialist Party and the General Confederation of Labor. Without informing the Socialist leaders, however, the executive secretary of the confederation issued an order to stop the strike by midnight, June 11一in effect, sabotaging it. The strike fizzled out by June 14 while officials of the party and the confederation were still discussing what to do next,

§43. Past and present

I. Bemporad was a major publishing house in Italy, best known for its children's literature——for example, it published Collodio Pinocchio—— and its widely adopted textbooks. It also published many other important works, including the writings of Giovanni Verga, scholarly books on Dante, and translations of foreign masterpieces. Filippo Turati was the general editor of a book series "I problemi del lavoro(Labor problems) published by Bemporad. In 1922 Bemporad published two books by Francesco Nitti: Decadenza dell7Europa (The decline of Europe) and Europa senza pace (Europe without peace). In 1928, however, the publishing house—which at that time was directed by Enrico Bemporad {1868-1944)—suffered a very severe financial setback: the government set up a state-owned publishing house to produce textbooks, thus depriving Bemporad of its main source of income. As a result, the publishing company had to seek loans and new investors； before long, the Bemporad family lost control of the firm (hence Gramsci's reference to the Banca Commerciale as the de facto administrator of the Bemporad publishing house).

On Francesco Saverio Nittiz see Notebook if §2$, n. 12.

2. On June 26/ 1920, when Giolitti presented his fifth (and, as it turned out, last) government to parliament, Filippo Turati gave a speech in the Chamber of Deputies that was then published as a pamphlet entitled Rifare VItalia (Rebuilding Italy). A detailed account of the speech was also published in an article, 〃Un programma di azione socialista” (A socialist program for action), in Critica Sociale 30, no. 13 (July 1-15, 1920): 195-206. The complete text of the speech is now collected in Filippo Turati, Discorsi parlamentari (Rome: Tipografia della Camera dei Deputati, 1950), 3:1737-76. In his speech. Turati acknowledged that he had drawn his technical and economic data from a study written by the Milanese engineer Angelo Omodeo, I nuovi onizonti delPidraulica italiana (The new horizons of Italian hydraulics). Turati described Omodeo as "a famous engineer of world stature ... who has the passionate idealism of a true socialist, even though he is not a member of the party.〃 In Omodeo's bookz Turati asserted, there is by far more socialism than in the entire series of our party congresses" [Discorsi parlamentari, p. 1768).

Omodeo's role in the preparation of Turati's speech is documented in a May i8z 1920, letter from Anna Kuliscioff to Turati:

Do you know what you could do to really stimulate parliament and the party? Give a speech at the opening of parliament on the statements issued by the government—a speech in which you would expound in general terms the way in which the riches of Italy can be developed, along the lines explained to you by Omodeo and that you liked very much. It would be an eminently socialist speech and, at the same time, a program for the reconstruction and renewal of the whole country. When he returns from Rome in the next few days, Omodeo will come to see me, and he will put me in a position to act as an intermediary and collaborator of this plan for your parliamentary reprise. It is unimportant whether or not the parliamentary group allows you to speak on its behalf. You would speak for yourself, and this will be the fundamental program for a democratic-socialist government一which in my view is not as remote a possibility as you seem to think. In any case, this could also better define the direction of the party as well as the nation and thus become the platform for the next national elections, which certainly are not far away. These are the grounds on which I would like to see the party divide itself and have the better elements of the bourgeoisie align themselves with a democratic-socialist government party. (F. Turati and A. Kuliscioff, Carteggio,

vol. 5, Dopoguerra e fascismo: 1919-1922 [Turin: Einaudi, 1953],

p. 345)

The Turati-Kuliscioff correspondence of this period makes frequent reference to the personal friendship and collaboration between Turati and Omodeo.

§44. Past and present

1. On Francesco Ciccotti (who legally changed his surname to Scozzese decotti but always signed his writings "Francesco Ciccotti"), see Notebook I, §ii6； and the corresponding note to the text, n. 4.

Leonardo Gatto Roissard, who held the rank of major in the Alpine corps, wrote on military affairs (under the pseudonym Anando) for both Avanti! and LOrdine Nuovo between 1919 and 1922. In 1922 he joined the reformist socialists and contributed articles on military affairs to their publication, Giustizia. Gramsci owned a copy of Leonardo Gatto Roissard^ book Disarmo e difesa (Disarmament and defense) (Milan: Corbaccio, 1925) but did not have it with. him in prison. An article on "Gatto Roissard (Anando)z, that appeared in the July 25, 1925/ issue of 1/Unità has been attributed to Gramsci: see Antonio Gramsci, Per la verità: Scritti, 1913-1926, ed. Renzo Martinelli (Rome: Editori Riuniti, 1974), pp< 321-23.

2. Pietro Nenni (1891-1980) was a member of the Republican Party, campaigned in favor of Italian intervention. in World War I, and wrote for Mussolini's II Popolo d'Italia before joining the Socialist Party in 1921. By the end of 1922 he had become the editor-in-chief of Avanti! a position that enabled him to assume a leading role in opposing the fusion of his party with the Communists* In an effort to combat the Fascist dictatorship, Nenni worked for the reconciliation of the Socialist Party with the reformist Unitary Socialist Party, and in 1934/ while in exile, he advocated the Pact of Unity with the Communist Party. After the war, Nenni had very prominent roles in both the Socialist Party and the Italian government.

3. Francesco Rèpaci was the brother of the more widely known Leonida Rèpaci, who is mentioned several times in the notebooks. Gramsci is especially severe in his criticism of the Rèpaci brothers in Notebook 9/ §48 (and in the corresponding C text: Notebook 23, §26).

4. See Notebook 3, §42, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially nn. 5 and 6.

5. Italo Toscani怎 article ^Carabinieri reali” (Royal carabinieri) has not been traced. Gramsci discusses Toscani at some length in Notebook 3, §165.

§45. Past and present

i. On Pietro Abbo and his speech at the Congress of Livorno, see Notebook i, §2, and n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§46. Past and present

1. Signore (plural, signori), as Gramsci explains in this paragraph, is a word with many nuances. Within the feudal context, the signore was the lord. In the narrowest literal sense, the term means ''gentleman" or "miste"

2. “Starveling" is used here to render the figurative phrase morto di fame, which connotes a miserable, wretched, poverty-stricken person.

3. See Notebook 2, §25.

4. Carlo Cipolla (1854-1917), a medieval scholar who was a professor at the University of Turin from 1882 to 1906/ published many essays in the Atti deirAcadßmia delle Scienze di Tonno, but Gramsci appears to be referring to the text of a lecture on the ethnic composition of Italy delivered by Cipolla on November 19, 1900, to mark the formal opening of the academic year at the university； see Carlo Cipolla, Intorno alla costituzione etnogiafica della nazione italiana (Turin: Paravia, 1900).

5. In Notebook 9, §142 (and in the corresponding C text, Notebook 13, §29), Gramsci describes the political positions of the Action Party and of Amadeo Bordiga as gypsylike and nomadic.

§47. Political science and the positivists

1. Scipio Sighele's book on private morals and the morals of politics comprised a revised version of his book on sectarian criminality and a reprint of his pamphlet Contro il parlamentarismo (Against parliamentar-ianism). Although no copy of this volume by Sighele is conserved among the books Gramsci owned in prison, though apparently he had perused it.

On Scipio Sighele, see Notebook 2, §25, n. 1.

2. On Cesare Lombroso, see Notebook i, §26, n. 1.

3. Guglielmo Ferrero, "Morale individuale e morale politica” (Personal morals and political morals). La Riforma Sociale 1, no. 21-22 (1894).

On. Guglielmo Ferrero, see Notebook i, §25, n. 17.

4. Enrico Ferri, Socialismo e criminalità (Socialism and criminality) (Milan-Turin-Rome: Bocca, 1883)； Filippo Turati, Il delitto e la questione sociale: Appunti sulla questione penale (Crime and the problem of society: Notes on the penal question), 3d ed. (Bologna: Casa Editrice "La contro-corrente/, 1913).

On Enrico Ferri and Filippo Turati, see Notebook 1, §25,11. 15.

5. On Raffaele Garofalo, see Notebook i7 §126, n. 1.

6. Scipio Sighele resigned from the Italian Nationalist Association in 1912 in protest against its antidemocratic positions.

§48. Past and present. Spontaneity and conscious leadership

l Gramsci is referring to the arguments set forth by Henri De Man in his book The Psychology of Socialism. See Notebook 1, §6i? n. 13.

2. Maurice Maeterlinck (1862-1949), the Belgian writer who won the Nobel Prize for literature in 1911, wrote in French and spent most of his life in France, where he was closely associated with avant-garde currents in the arts and especially with the symbolist movement. Although best known as a playwright, he was also a poet and essayist； in addition, he wrote a number of books in which he expounded his philosophical and mystical speculations. He developed an interest in medieval mystics and turned to the study of the occult and metapsychology.

3. Le. Lenin's.

4. Gramsci is referring to the struggles of the organized labor movement in Barcelona after the First World War.

5. On the charge leveled against the Ordine Nuovo group that it was Bergsonian and voluntarist, see Notebook 3, §42 (and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 2)z and Notebook nz §12.

6. See Notebook iz §44/ n. 38.

7. On Easter Monday, March 30, 1282/ at the hour of vespers, the mistreatment of a Sicilian woman by French soldiers near a church close to Palermo sparked a riot against the oppressive rule of Charles I of Anjou, the king of Naples-Sicily. The uprising spread rapidly throughout Sicily； two thousand French soldiers were massacred in. Palermo alone. Members of the island's nobility—prominent among them, Giovanni da Procida―were also displeased with the Angevin monarchy and had been conspiring with the Aragonese to displace it. Within six months of the rebellion, the Angevins (who had the support of the papacy and the Italian Guelfs) were forced to abandon Sicily when the forces of Peter III of Aragon (favored by the Ghibellines) landed on the island and quickly established control over it.

§49. Cultural topics. Ideological material

1. Spirit of cleavage" (spirito di scissione] is a phrase that recurs frequently in Gramsci怎 writings. It is an adaptation of a concept found in Georges Sorel, who in the first section of chapter 6 of Reflections on Violence discusses "that cleavage between the classes which is the basis of all Socialism” (Georges Sorel, Reflections on Violence, trans. T. E. Hulme and J. Roth [Glencoe, I1L: Free Press, 1950], p. 204). According to Sorel: "When the governing classes, no longer daring to govern, are ashamed of their privileged situation, are eager to make advances to their enemies, and proclaim their horror of all cleavage in society, it becomes much more difficult to maintain in the minds of the proletariat this idea of cleavage which without Socialism cannot fulfill its historical role" (pp. 208-209).

§50. Concordat

i. It is most unlikely that Gramsci had access to Luigi Taparelli D'Azeglio's two-volume work Esame critico degli ordini rappresentativi nella società moderna (Critical study of the representative orders in modern society) (Rome, 1854)； probably he extracted this quotation from a secondary source, which, however, has not been traced.

On Luigi Taparelli D'Azeglio and his political views, see Notebook 2, §13.

§51. Past and present

1. See Karl Marx, The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte (1852), in K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1979), 11:103: "Hegel remarks somewhere that all facts and personages of great importance in world history occur, as it were, twice. He forgot to add: the first time as tragedy, the second as farce/7 In prison, Gramsci had a copy of the French translation of this text: Le dix-huit Brumaire de Louis Bonaparte, in Karl Marx, Oeuvres completes, trans. J. Molitor, vol. 3 (Paris: Costesz 1928).

2. Karl Marx's introduction to his Contribution to the Critique of Hegel's Philosophy of £0^(1843-44), in K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 3:179. Gramsci translates this passage from the French edition of Marx's works that he had in prison: Oeuvres philosophiques, trans. J. Molitor (Paris: Costes, 1927)/ 1:90-91.

§52. The pillories of virtue

1. Eugène Sue's novel Les Mystères de Pans was published in serial form in 1842-43. For an English translation, see The Mysteries of Pans (New York: Fertig, 1987).

2. Gramsci quotes these sentences in French from La Sainte Familie, in Karl Marx, Oeuvres philosophiques, trans. J. Molitor (Paris: Costes; 1928), 3:88. For the English translation, see The Holy Family； or, Critique： of Critical Criticism, in K. Marx and F. Engelsz Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1:975)/ 4：工89. Marx's comment occurs in the context of an extensive critique of Sue's work. Furthermore, Gramsci's comment on Sue's criminological theories is a paraphrase of Marx's observation: "For each point of the present penal code, which he retains, Monsieur Sue projects the addition of a counterpart in a reward code copied from it to the last detail(4:188).

§53. Past and present. Influence of the romanticism of

French serials

l Gramsci is referring to Mario Gioda (1883-1924}, an anarchist who wrote for Mussolini's newspaper II Popolo d"Italia in support of Italian intervention in the war and subsequently was very active in the nascent Fascist movement in Turin. Gioda also wrote a series of articles on the Turin underworld for the periodical La Folia under the Balzacian pseudonym "I/amico di Vautrin/, (Vautrin怎 friend)； the articles were subsequently collected in a volume, Torino sotterranea illustrata (Turin: Righini, 1914). Gioda's name (Gramsci also called him, disparagingly, Marco Sbroda) appears frequently in Gramsci's journalistic writings； see especially 〃I1 porcellino di terra/, (The sow bug), in the column "Sotto la Mole" of the Piedmont edition of Avanti!, February t, 1916； porcellino grugnisce(The sow bug gruntsin the column Sotto la Mole" of the Piedmont edition of Avanti!, February 8/ 1916； and "Caratteri italiani: Gioda o del romanticismo(Italian characters: Gioda； orz On romanticism), in LUnità, February 28, 1924.

In /ZI1 porcellino di terran Gramsci opens his attack on Gioda thus:

The war has created a situation that resembles the sort of thing that happens in the fields when. a large rock is turned over: one sees certain whitish little creatures dashing with great speed in all direc-tions/ as if they have gone mad. The war has brought forth a large number of those new types of persons, who are now running around restlessly while they face less competition, knowing that their monopoly cannot last long. We know one of these sow bugs. Before the war he spent his life cataloging English lavatories and toilet covers, arid in the midst of doing this he would find the time to produce dreadful rabble-rousing articles that every week were supposed to terrify the king greatly—for our sow bug did not mince words. With his visage of a musketeer of English toilets, with his eyes rolling in their sockets, he must have been a source of constant fear among his colleagues working on English lavatories and toilet covers.

In his later article, "Caratteri italiani: Gioda o del romanticismo/7 Gramsci draws attention to the parallels between the romantic fantasies fostered by French serial novels and the mentality exhibited by Fascists like Gioda: It is said ... that fascism is a romantic movement, that it actually is Italian romanticism. Although I am convinced that fascism is a social, that is, a political-economic, movement that came into existence in Italy and was victorious because of an extraordinary historical conjuncture, I am disinclined to dismiss this deep-rooted synthetic view of fascism. The milieu in which individual fascists were formed, the ideology they have abundantly imbibed can be said to be romanticism. I am talking of fascists like Mario Gioda and Massimo Rocca, not like Cesare Maria De Vecchi and Cesare Forni； I am talking about the fascists of old Mussolinism, fascists who until August 1914 were anarchists, syndicalists, revolutionary socialists and then advocated intervention in the revolutionary war and became the earliest fascists, etcv etc. . . . Massimo Rocca was an employee at the Sonzogno publishing house； he translated and contributed to the dissemination of tens of thousands of copies of novels by Ponson du Terrail, Hector-Henri Malot, Henzi Richebourg, Eugène Sue. Mario Gioda was 〃Vautrin's friend/, in Paolo Valeral Folia； he was Valera's brightest and most promising disciple. In his drawer he must still have a long novel on the Turin underworld, a novel like E. Sue's Les Mystères de Paris, a novel in the expansive mode of Carolina Invernizio, in which a peaceful provincial city of honest working people, of peaceful petty bourgeois state pensioners, becomes a sink of iniquity, an aquanum of sea serpents, a refuge for every social monster. This is the romanticism, the romantic milieu, in which the fascist mind was formed. Why was the serial novel, of the kind published by Sonzogno, so popular in Italy before the war? Why was II Secolo the most widely circulated newspaper? Why was Carolina Invernizio the most widely read novelist? Why are Dario Niccodeini's plays still so popular? Why was subversiveness in Italy before the war primarily “criminalist”? And why did the goal of revolution seem to be the reform of prisons and mental hospitals? Because of the great popularity of Paolo Valera? Because Filippo Turati's greatest theoretical and rhetorical effort was aimed at obtaining for prostitutes (elegantly called the "wage earners of love/,) the right to vote? The serial novel, the ideology for which the serial novel is known and because of which it has been enormously successful, is romanticism. Victor Hugo was a great romantic and the greatest writer of serial novels. . . . Mario Gioda and Massimo Rocca became anarchists reading about Jean Valjean's struggles against Javert.... Mario Gioda and Massimo Rocca have solidified their ideas through the novels of Eugene Sue, they became anticlerical reading Le Juif errant, they have assimilated Sue's theory on delinquency. Eugène Sue: the most complete representative and the greatest imbecile of the whole romantic movement~indeed, romantic, profoundly romantic, extensively romantic, and socially romantic. The French romanticism of 1848 also left a segment of the petty bourgeoisie at the barricades, alongside the working class； but the working class was still weak, it was unable to seize power； power was seized by Louis Bonaparte, the petty bourgeoisie became Caesarist. This is the romantic side of the fascist movement, of fascists like Mario Gioda, Massimo Rocca, Curzio Suckert? Roberto Farinacci, etc., etc. An unbalanced imagination/ a shudder of heroic fury, a psychological restlessness that contain no ideas but only the sentiments that pervade the serial novels of the French romanticism of 1848. The anarchists thought of the revolution as if it were a chapter of Les Miserables, with its Grantaire, Aigle de Meaux and Cov and a dash of Gavroche and Jean Valjean. The fascists want to be the "Prince Rodolphes,? of the good Italian people. The historical conjuncture has made it possible for this romanticism to become a ^ruling class" and for all of Italy to become a serial novel.

2. Louis Blanc (1811-82), the French socialist who proposed that the state should guarantee employment by setting up workshops that would be controlled by the workers themselves, was strongly influenced by the ideas of Saint-Simon. He was not always in agreement with the Saint-Simonians, however； for example, whereas the latter maintained that workers ought to be compensated according to their productivity, Blanc insisted on the principle /zfrom each according to his ability, to each according to his needs/7

3. Section 7 of The Holy Family is entitled "Revelation of Political Economic Mysteriesand comprises three sections: "Theoretical Revelation of Political Economic Mysteries/7 "'The Bank for the Poor/ and "Model Farm at Bouqueval// See The Holy Family, in K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 4:196-200.

4. In Les Mystères de Paris, Prince Rodolphe wanders through the underworld dispensing justice. As Marx puts it: 〃He goes forth into the world to sever the wicked from among the just, to punish the wicked and reward the good. The conception of good and evil has sunk so deep into his weak brain that he really believes in a corporeal Satan and wants to catch the devil alive.... On the other hand, he tries to copy on a small scale the opposite of the devil, God. He likes 'de jouer un peu le role de la providence/ ...Rodolphe regards himself as a good man and thinks that the wicked exist to afford him the self-satisfaction of his own excellence” The Holy Family, 4:203).

§54. Emilio Bodrero

i. On Emilio Bodrero, see Notebook 2, §5, n. 1.

2. Roberto Ardigò (1828-1920), an ex-priest and professor for many years at the University of Padua, was one of the best-known and most influential positivist philosophers in Italy. He wrote numerous books, including one on the science of education: La scienza dell'educazione (1893). Gramsci discusses Ardigò at some length in Notebook 4, §6.

3. Bodrero was undersecretary of education from 1925 to 1928, when Pietro Fedele was minister of education. On Fedele, see Notebook 3, §9, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

4. Gramsci is referring to a polemical booldet on the Fascist state, the church, and education by the pseudonymous Ignotus, Stato fascista, Chiesa, e scuola (Rome: Libreria del Littorio, 1929). Gramsci comments more extensively on this pamphlet in Notebook 5, §70.

5. See Emilio Bodrero? ”Itaca Italia” (Ithaca Italy), Gerarchia io, no. 6 (June 1930): 452-65.

6. Bertoldo is a fictional figure who typifies the astute blockhead, the coarse individual who is not quite the fool he appears to be.

7. "Fighting spirit" is used here to translate combattentismo, a word that refers to the rebellious, nationalistic movement that gave rise to the Fasci di Combattimento that Mussolini started to organize in 1919 with the support of war veterans and former socialists.

8. Gramsci touches on many of the same thoughts expressed in this note in an April 7, 1931 letter to Tatiana Schucht:

Fm not surprised that Professor Bodrerozs lectures on Greek philosophy did not seem very interesting to you. He is a professor of the history of philosophy in I donzt know right now which university (at one time he was in Padua), but he is neither a philosopher nor a historian: he is an erudite philologist who knows how to make speeches in a rhetorical-humanistic manner. I recently read an article of his about Homer's Odyssey that has shaken my belief that Bodrero is even a good philologist because in it he discovers that to have fought in a war is an experience that enables one to understand the Odyssey^ I doubt that a Senegalese can understand Homer better after having fought in a war. On the other hand, Bodrero forgets that Ulysses, according to legend, was a draft dodger and a sort of malingerer because when facing the military commission that had gone to Ithaca to get him, he feigned madness (not a malingerer, I correct myself, but a simulator whose aim was to have himself declared unfit for service).

§55. Past and present. Otto Kahn

i. Gramsci's source of information on Otto Kahn's visit to Europe and ： on the statements made by Kahn and other United States financiers is a booklet by Samuel Gompers: Ligue de Nations ou ligue de financiers (Paris: Payot, 1924), a copy of which Gramsci had in prison. Note especially::

A vrai dire, c'est toute la psychologic et toute la politique de la finance internationale qui se révèlent à plein dans les discours de ce chef américain d'une des plus grandes entreprises internationales； tout comme Paul Warburg, de la mème firme et également dirigine allemande, Kahn a rapportò de son voyage en Europe la plus haute admiration pour les chefs du parti travailliste anglais, affiliò à Plnternationale Socialiste. Warburg proclamait que le salut de PEurope était entre les mains de ce parti révolutionnaire et international. Mais des sympathies tout aussi vives n^mpéchent pas M. Kahn de chérir également M. Mussolini. Tout comme Judge Gary, d'autres gros financiers et les délégués de la Chambre de Commerce américaine après leur voyage d'études en Italie, Kahn ne tarit pas d?éloges sur le compte du fascisme. Dzapres luiz aux zzvices d'un régime uniquement parlementaire,,f Mussolini aurait substitué "des méthodes de gouvernement effectives, énergiques, progressives. (pp. 86-87)

2. On Giuseppe Volpi, who as finance minister was responsible for arranging the Morgan loan, see Notebook 2, §6, n. 3. Information on the Morgan loan is recorded in Notebook 2, §6 (see especially 1:250-51).

Prior to his imprisonment, Gramsci had commented on the Morgan loan in a report he wrote for the August 2-3, 1926, meeting of the Italian Communist Party's executive committee. In the first section of his report, which was subsequently published in Stato Operaio 2/ no. 3 (March 1928): 82-88/ Gramsci wrote:

One element that must be kept in mind is the fact that the fascist government has completely enslaved Italy to America. In liquidating the war debt to both America and England, the fascist government made no effort to obtain any guarantees concerning the negotiability of Italian bonds. The Italian stock market and Italian finance are exposed at all times to the political blackmail of the American and English governments, who can at any moment inundate the world market with enormous quantities of Italian currency. The Morgan loan, moreover, has been incurred under even worse conditions. Out of the hundred million dollars that have been borrowed, the Italian government has only thirty-three million at its disposal. The Italian government can make use of the other sixty-seven million only with the personal consent of Morgan, which means that Morgan is the real head of the Italian government.

3. Gramsci did not have a copy in prison of Joseph Caillaux?s Où va la France^ Où va VEuropei (Paris: Aux Editions de la Sirène, 1922], but it seems likely that he had read this book at an earlier time.

On Joseph Caillaux, see Notebook i, §48/ n. 6.

4. Gramsci may be referring to what he had written in Notebook i, §135.

§56. The concept of organic centralism and the priestly caste

i. Gramsci may be referring to the debates on the composition and organizational character of the party that raged within the Italian Communist Party during the period leading to the Third Party Congress, held in Lyons in January 1926. At the time, Amadeo Bordiga, who maintained that the party had to adhere faithfully and consistently to firmly established strategic principles, proposed that the party's organization should be characterized as organic centralism^ rather than ^democratic centralism." Gramsci discusses the character and organization of the party in many places throughout the notebooks, but in conjunction with this note see especially Notebook 9, §68, and its corresponding C text in Notebook 13, §36.

§57. Father Bresciani's progeny. Papini

1. In La Civiltà Cattolica 81 (July 19,1930): 152-58, an unsigned essay, ^Intorno alla vita e agli scritti di S. Agostino” (On the life and writings of Saint Augustine), that reviewed recent publications on Saint Augustine eulogized Giovanni Papini's book Sant'Agostino, 2d ed. (Florence: Vallecchi； 1930). Gramsci comments on this review-essay once again in Notebook 6, §182.

On Giovanni Papini, see Notebook i, §8/ n. 1.

2. These phrases are quoted in the review-essay ^Intorno alla vita e agli scritti di S. AgostinoZ7

§58. Types of periodicals. The Voce-Leonardo type

i. Gramsci is referring to the Rassegna Settimanale della Stampa Estera, a weekly review of the foreign press that he received in prison and. used as the source for a number of entries in the notebooks.

§59. Past and present. The intellectual influence of Fiance

i. Georges Sorel made these observations in an August 28, 1917, letter to Roberto Michels. This and other letters from Sorel to Michels were published in Italian translation in "Lettere di Georges Sorel a Robert Michels/ Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica i, no. 5 (September-October

1929) : 288-93. The relevant passage from SorePs letter is quoted verbatim by Gramsci in Notebook 2, §45； see also the corresponding note to the text, n. 2.

§60. Past and present

1. "Starvelings" is used here to translate morti di fam^ see Notebook 3, §46, and n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

2. Scapigliatura, an avant-garde movement in the artsbut primarily literature—in the 1870s and i88osz was closely associated with the bohemian scene in Milan, although it found adherents throughout Italy. Writers of the scapigliatura movement were strongly influenced by the writings of Baudelaire, the French symbolist poets, the German romantics, and Edgar Allan. Poe； many of which they translated into Italian. The iconoclasm of the scapigliati (literally, "the disheveled") was directed against bourgeois morality, classicism, and Arcadian literature. The name of the movement was coined by eletto Arrighi, whose real name was Carlo Righetti (1830-1906). Other major figures included the novelists Giuseppe Rovani (1818-74), Emilio Praga (1839-75), and Iginio Ugo Tarchetti (1841-69)； Verdi's librettist Arrigo Boito {1842-1918)； and the poet and painter Giovanni Camerana (1845-1905).

3. The bibliographical details as well as some of the other information used in this note are drawn from a review of Madini's book by Francesco Cazzamini Mussi, which appeared in Ultalia Che Scrive 13, no. 7 (July

1930) : 247.

The Compagnia della Teppa was an. underground organization of hoodlums and criminals that came into existence in Milan around 1817 and indulged in revelry and bullied people until it was suppressed by the police in 1821. In his review of Madini's book； Mussi writes that the Compagnia della Teppa was squashed "when Austria became fearful of the patriotic activity of Bichinkommer, whose name was foreign but not the spirit."

4. In modern Italian usage, teppisti (i.e., members of the Teppa) has come to mean "hooligans," "hoodlums/ ,,zruffians/z etc.

5. See Victor Hugo, LHomme qui rit (1869), book r, part 2/ chap. 4.

6. The Vehmgericht, also known as the Holy Vehme, was a secret tribunal that exercised great power in Westphalia between the twelfth and sixteenth centuries.

7. Gaetano Salvemini (using the pseudonym Rerum Scriptor) wrote an article, /zPer gli incidenti di Terlizzi,, (On the incidents in Terlizzi), LUnità 2, no. 39 (September 26, 1913), in. which he described how he and his entourage were physically abused and injured by reactionary thugs when he visited a peasants' association in Terlizzi as part of his electoral campaign in Apulia. The episode was an instance of the government's use of criminal elements in electoral politics, a topic that Salvemini treated in other articles in LUnità and Avanti!

On Gaetano Salvemini, see Notebook i, §25, n. 19.

§62. Past and present

1. Leon Daudet, Le stupide dix-neuvième siede (Paris: Librairie A1 Action Fran^aise, 1922). Gramsci also alludes to the reactionary use of the formula, or slogan, 〃the stupid nineteenth century" in his discussion of Daudet's fellow ideologue of the Action Fran^aise, Charles Maunas, in Notebook 1, §48.

2. Gramsci is echoing a line from Giosuè Carducci^ ode on Shelley, "Presso Puma di Percy Bysshe Shelley〃： “sol nel passato è il bello, sol ne la morte è il vero” (in the past alone is beauty, in death alone is truth).

§63. Father Bresciani 's progeny

1. Gramsci is quoting from a short unsigned article, ^Fallimento del romanzo77 (Failure of the novel), in the "Dogana” (Customs house) section of Critica Fascista 8Z no. 15/ (August 1, 1930): 291. The quoted passage is also partially reproduced in "Romanzi d/appendice,? (Serial novels), in the "Rassegna della stampa” (Review of the press) section of LItalia Letteraria I, no. 32 (August io, 1930).

2. In their edition of Selections from Cultural Writings (Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1985), David Forgacs and Geoffrey NowellSmith make the following observation about the relation between ideas of “national" and "popular" sovereignty in the French tradition: /zThe linking of these two concepts in French political thought can be traced from Rousseau's concept of the sovereignty of the general will, inalienable and thus not delegable to representatives, through the 1789 Declaration of the Rights of Man (Sovereignty resides essentially in the nation') and the unimplemented Jacobin constitution of 1793 (Sovereignty resides in the people'). They re-emerged among the republicans in 1848" (p. 208 n. 14).

3. Gramsci is referring to a protracted controversy that arose when Umberto Fracchia, in an open letter, 〃A S.E. Volpe" (To H[is]. Excellency]. Volpe) in LItaha Letteraria 2, no. 25, (June 22, 1930), criticized a speech given by Gioacchino Volpe in his capacity as secretary of the Italian Academy. Volpe's speech was published as an article, /ZI1 primo anno delPAccademia d,Italia,, (The first year of the Italian Academy) in Nuova Antologia 65, no. 1398 (June 16,1930): 490-96. Gramsci refers again to this speech and the polemic it generated in Notebook 6, §16 and §38； he also quotes a brief extract from Volpe's speech in Notebook 7, §66. The controversy generated numerous articles in LItalia Letteraria as well as in other newspapers and periodicals. Among those who intervened was Ugo Ojetti, who published his ^Lettera a Umberto Fracchia sulla critica” (A letter on criticism to Umberto Fracchia) in Pègaso 2, no. 8 (August 1930): 207-11. Gramsci discusses Ojetti's intervention at some length in Notebook 6, §16. Fracchia responded to Ojetti with, "Ojetti e la critica” (Ojetti and criticism), LItalia Letteraria 2, no. 32 (August 10, 1930).

On Umberto Fracchia, see Notebook 1, §24, n. 18； on Gioacchino Volpe, see Notebook 2, §100, n. 3； and on Ugo Ojetti, see Notebook 1, §24, n. 4.

4. The connection between Fracchia's public campaign against the widespread dissemination of foreign literature and the measures taken by the Ministry of the Interior (and specifically by Bianchi, the undersecretary) concerning the translation and publication of foreign works is brought up again by Gramsci in Notebook 6/ §38. One of Giamsci's sources of information on this topic may have been an article, Z/Trop de zele/z (Too much zeal) in the "Rassegna della stampa” (Review of the press) section of LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 21 (August 25/ 1929), which reported that Bianchi had just issued a circular "to remove, insofar as it was lawfully permissible, certain excessive restrictions imposed on some publishers and booksellers by the police authorities against the sale of works by Russian authors such as Gorky, Gogol, Dostoyevsky, Tolstoy, Turgenev, and also of works by Jack London such as The Iron

Michele Bianchi (1883-1930) started his political career as a socialist and labor activist, much like Mussolini, with whom he worked very closely in the establishment of the Fascist movement. One of the principal organizers of the March on Rome in 1922, Bianchi played a leading role in the transformation of the Fascist movement into a political party, which he served as its first general secretary. He was appointed undersecretary at the Ministry of Public Works in. 1925, undersecretary at the Ministry of the Interior in 1928, and minister of public works in 1929.

5. Camille Flammarion (1842-1925), founder of the French Astronomical Society, was best known for his popular books on science.

6. Gramsci is referring to Ruggero Bonghi^ book Perchè la letteratura italiana non sia popolare (Milan, 1859), which addresses the failure of Italian literature to attract many readers from among the general public.

On Ruggero Bonghi, see Notebook §8, n. 1.

7. On Manzoni and the language question, see, among others. Notebook I, §73/ and the accompanying Notes to the Text, especially n. 2.

8. Ferdinando Martini examined the state of Italian drama in a short study Del teatro drammatico in Italia (1862) that he developed some years later in La fisima del teatro nazionale (i888)z which is incorporated in. his book on the theater. Al teatro (Florence: Bemporad, 1895)/ pp. 113-72. Gramsci alluded to Martini's writings on the Italian theater in one of his regular columns of theater criticism in the Turin edition of Avanti!, February 以 1916: “If Ferdinando Martini were still writing about these trivialities, and if he were to raise the question once again of why there is no Italian national theater, one could respond ... that the root problem is the insincerity of the playwrights, especially the young ones. The absence of genius might explain why no masterpieces spring forth. The theater, however, does not derive its sustenance exclusively from masterpieces； besides, masterpieces do not seem to be cropping up with great frequency in other countries, either."

Gramsci refers to the question raised by Martini about the lack of an Italian national tradition in drama elsewhere in the notebooks； see in particular Notebook 14/ §14, and Notebook 21, §i-

Ferdinando Martini wrote many books of criticism, essays, narrative fiction, and memoirs, in addition to holding many important political offices； see Notebook 2, §51, n. 2.

9. As can be seen from the C text version of this note (Notebook 21, §5), what Gramsci means here is that there have been no poets in. Italy like Pierre-Jean Béranger (1780*1857), whose satires had great popular appeal.

10. On Francesco Domenico Guerrazzi, see Notebook i, §44, n. 37.

11. Carolina Invernizio (1858-1916) wrote numerous sentimental and sensationalist novels that enjoyed tremendous popular success. Her writings were influenced by and bear many resemblances to the popular fiction produced in France by Xavier Aymonde Montépin and Ponson du Terrail (on whom see Notebook 3/ §38, n. 12, and §78, n. 3).

12. Francesco Mastriani (1819-91) wrote more than a hundred serial novels, most of them depicting the miserable lives and experiences of the poor in Naples. He was considered the Italian counterpart of Eugene Sue, whom he obviously imitated.

13. Giovanni Papini's article on Carolina Invernizio, originally published in II Resto del Carlino of December 4, 1916, was later included in his book of essays, Testimonianze: Saggi non critici (Milan: Studio Editoriale Lombardo, 1918), pp. 4i~53-

On Giovanni Papini, see Notebook 1, §8, n. 1.

14. Gramsci is referring to the Papini bibliography (covering the years 1902-27) in Enzo Palmieri's work on his contemporaries. Interpretazioni del mio tempo, vol. i, Giovanni Papini, ed. Tito Casini--(Florence: Vallecchi? 1927).

15. Guerrin meschino (The humble guerino) and I reali di Plancia (The monarchs of France) are the best-known and most popular chivalric romances by Andrea da Barberino (ca. 1370-ca. 1431). Guerrùi meschino is discussed at some length in Notebook 6, §207. During his incarceration in Milan, Gramsci read Guerrin ineschino and mentioned it in a May 2/ 1927, letter to his wife, Julia: "You know, when I received your letter in which you speak of the famous Atlas, I had only a few days earlier returned Gueirin meschino to the library, a very popular Italian knightly romance, much read by the peasants etc., especially southerners； I would have liked to transcribe a few geographic passages contained in it, some of the most amusing (Sicily, for example, is set among the Polar regions)/7

16. In certain parts of Italy, especially in Tuscany, peasants celebrated May Day with singing and dancing festivals (known as maggi] at which they acted out the stories of fabled figures derived from history, the Bible, chivalric romances, and other popular sources.

According to legend, Pia dei Tolomei was a lady from Siena murdered by her husband in the Sienese Maremma. She appears in the last seven lines of canto 5 of the Purgatorioin Dante's Divine Comedy, where she utters the famous words: "Siena made me, Maremma unmade me,/ (1.134).

17. Ugo Mioni (1870-1935), a Catholic priest who rose to the rank of monsignor, wrote numerous works of popular fiction and many others on religious topics, such as the liturgy, Catholic missionary activity, and so on.

Guglielmo Massaja (1809-89), an Italian Capuchin friar, missionary, and explorer, wrote a twelve-volume work, I miei trentacinque anni di missione nell"Alta Etiopia (1885-95), that recounts his experiences during the thirty-five years he spent in Abyssinia. He was made a cardinal by Pope Leo XIII.

18. The Jesuit Angelo Secchi (1818-78) was one of the earliest scientists with a specific interest in astrophysics. He wrote many books on. astronomy and philosophical approaches to physics, several of which were translated into French. Preserved among the books that Gramsci owned during his prison years is a slim volume on Secchi怎 pioneering work in astrophysics: Giorgio Abetti, Padre Angelo Secchi: Il pionere dell'astrofisica (Milan: Casa Editrice Giacomo Agnelli, 1928). Since this booklet is not stamped with the prison seal, it is likely that Gramsci received it after his transfer to the Cusumano clinic in Formia.

19. See, especially, Notebook iz §89.

§64. Father Bresciani^ progeny

i. Gramsci is quoting from an unsigned review of Mario Puccini's book (which through the portrayal of a character named Cola purports to represent the typical Italian) that appeared in the z/Rassegna bibliografica” (Bibliographical review) section of Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1344 (March 16, 1928): 270.

Mario Puccini (1887-1957) wrote a number of books describing the lives and feelings of people of humble birth, in a style meant to contrast with that of Gabriele D'Annunzio. He also produced some travel books about South America and a critical study of Miguel de Unamuno.

§65. Massimo Lelj, Il Risorgimento dello spirito italiano: 1725-1861

i. Gramsci probably extracted this bibliographical reference to Massimo Lelj's book (on. the revival of the Italian spirit during the one hundred and thirty-six years leading to the Risorgimento) from the list in "Libri rice-vuti〃 (Books received) in Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1344 (March 16, 1928).

§66. Lorianism and the baroque style

i. Gramsci is quoting from an article by Paolo Orano, "Ibsen,〃 in Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1345 (April 1, 1928): 289-97, The exclamation points and other insertions within parentheses are Gramsci's. Orano is first labeled a Lorian in Notebook i, §30.

On Paolo Orano, see Notebook i, §30, n. 1.

§67. Gerrymandering

I. In 1812 the administration of the state of Massachusetts, under the leadership of the governor of the time, Elbridge Gerry, enacted a law that divided the state into new senatorial districts so as to enhance the electoral chances of the Democratic-Republicans and hamper the Federalists. One of the newly drawn districts, Essex County, resembled a salamander in shape―hence the coining of the term ^gerrymander/7

In all likelihood, this note was prompted by an allusion. to the practice of gerrymandering in an article by Veracissimus (a pseudonym used by Tommaso Tittoni)z "Per la verità storica77 (For the historical truth), in Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1344 (April iz 1928): 360. Gramsci also refers to this article in Notebook 2, §59.

§68. Americanism

i. Guglielmo Ferrero, Fra i due mondi (Milan: Treves,.工913). Ferrerò^ book, which discusses what the author calls "the two worlds" (i.e., Europe and America), is mentioned in the article by Etienne Fournol cited by Gramsci in the next paragraph. It is quite likely that Gramsci had firsthand knowledge of this book, as he did of other writings by Ferrero, whom he had criticized several times in the pages of Avanti! For example, in a "Sotto la Mole" column entitled "Prete Pero" in the Turin edition of Avanti! July 19, 1918, Gramsci wrote:

The Hon. Nitti promotes the accord among the banks, the Ansaldo company raises its capital to five hundred million lire, a decree issued by the deputies nominates a commission of six hundred experts (!) to study the aftermath of the war ... and performances of Dario Niccodemi^ play Prete Pero [an antiwar play in which the main character is a country priest] are banned. Guglielmo Ferrero has reason to be happy. The government has chosen the right path: the reign of quality has been installed, and it should replace the reign of abhorred quantity. The state (!) takes upon itself the tutelage of the citizens, of the citizens7 activities, of the citizens' wealth, of the citizens, aesthetic pleasures.

The banks will only lend money to the aristocrats of national production. You will see what quality, what lovely things, what beautiful machines, what wonderful railroads, what great commerce. But the poor consumers might prefer to have goods that are low priced and abundant. That is impossible, my dears: we have all become aristocrats, we must all have our house rich in beauty. You are unable to buy things? Who says that you should buy things? And who says that you should live? The minister Nitti is a democrat, my dears: he desires little, but what he desires is good and beautiful.

Another "Sotto la Mole" column in the Turin edition of Avanti! (August 22, 1918) in which Gramsci attacks Ferrero is entitled "Consulta araldica” (The heralds7 college):

That's the nature of Italian democracy. Guglielmo Ferrero wrote a book to promote quality as opposed to quantity: that is, to promote the return to the artisan mode of production as opposed to capitalist production, the return to the closed aristocracy of production as opposed to the system of open competition that supplies the markets with large quantities of goods at low prices for the poor. The reformists ... announce the prizes of war； the industrialists want to double the import tax. Italian democracy does not break loose from the confines of the reactionary ideology that typifies the French monarchists, the ideology peculiar to a form of society that has not yet been revolutionized by capitalist industry, a society that is not yet permeated by the valiant ideals associated with economic individualism, a society whose old customs have not been transformed, a petty bourgeois society, servile like sheep, lacking the thrill of initiative and independence. Italian democracy is essentially “Catholic" and its anticlericalism is nothing more that the peevishness of a child who believes that his mother gives larger bowls of soup to his eldest brother.

On Guglielmo Ferrerò/ see Notebook i, §25, n. 17.

2. Etienne Fournol, "L'America nella letteratura francese del 1:927〃 (America in French writings of 1927), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1344 (Aprii I, 1928): 370-81.

3. André Siegfried, Les Etats-Unis d'aujourd'hui (Paris: Colin 1928), translated into English as America Comes of Age (New York: Harcourt Brace, 1928)； and Lucien Roniier, Qui sera le maitre, Europe ou Ameiique^ (Paris: Hachette, 1927), already cited by Gramsci in Notebook 1, §61. Both of these books are mentioned in a footnote in FournoFs article, but Gramsci had direct knowledge of them since they were among the books he received in prison； he also refers to them in a March 25, 1929, letter to Tatiana Schucht.

Andre Siegfried (1875-1959) wrote numerous books on French as well as international politics and economics, including studies of the United States, Canada, Britain, New Zealand, and South Africa. His writings on the United States were quite extensive.

On Lucien Romier and the English translation of his book, see Notebook 1, §6iz n. 7.

4. André Tardieu, Devant Fobstacle: LAmerique et nous (Paris: Librairie Emil Paul, 1927), translated into English as France and America: Some Experiences in Cooperation (Boston: Houghton Mifflin, 1927)； Luc Durtain (pseudonym of Andre Nepven), Hollywood dépassé (Paris: Editions de la Nouvelle Revue Frangaise, 1927)； and Durtain, Quarantìème étage (Paris: Editions de la Nouvelle Revue Frangaise, 1927). All three books are mentioned in FournoPs article； there is nothing to indicate that Gramsci had firsthand knowledge of them.

André Tardieu (1876-1945) was initially a follower of Georges Clemenceau. A staunch supporter of the Versailles Treaty after the war, he had three brief stints as prime minister of France, in 1929,1930, and 1932.

5. See Siegfried, Les Etats-Unis d'aujourd'hui: 〃Par là Fabsence de ces institutions intermédiaires, dont la collaboration sociale se tempere d'autonomie, le milieu américain tend à prendre Paspect d'un collectivisme de fait, voulu des élites et allègrement accepté de la masse, qui subreptice-ment mine la liberté de Phomme et canalise si étroitement son action que, sans en souffrir et sans mème le savoir, il confirme lui-mème son abdica-tion〃(pp. 349-5。、

6. See Siegfried's preface to André Philip, Le problème ouviier aux Etats-Unìs (Paris: Alcan, 1927), pp. viì-xix. On André Philip's book—of which Gramsci had a copy while in prison—see Notebook 1, §51, n. 4.

§69. Utopias and philosophical novels

i. Gramsci is referring to Fénelon?s The Adventures of Telemachus. Two different editions of this work in the French original are preserved among Gramsci's books: Francois de Salignac Fénelon, Les aventures de Télémaque, fils d'Ulysse (Paris: Bossange Masson et Bessor, 1804), and Les aventures de Télémaque (Paris: Hachette, 1898).

§70. Fière Vedremo

1. 〃 Vedremo" can mean quite simply 〃we will see,〃 but it may also signal an inclination to defer actions or decisions, as in "we'll think about it” or 〃we'll wait and see."

2. Gramsci extracts this quotation from an article by Niccolò Rodolico； “Guelfismo e nazionalismo di Giuseppe De Maistre” (Joseph De Maistre's Guelfism and nationalism), in Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1346 (April i6, 1928): 506-15 (see especially p. 511). Gramsci uses information derived from this same article in Notebook 2/ §62.

On Joseph De Maistre, see Notebook i, §71, n. 1； on Niccolò Rodolico, see Notebook 2, §6勾 n. 1.

§71. Utopias and philosophical novels

1. Giuseppe Gabrieli, “Federico Cesi linceo" (Federico Cesi of the Lincei Academy), Nuova Antologia 65, no. 1401 (August 1,1930): 352-69.

Giuseppe Gabrieli (1872-1942), in addition to being a distinguished orientalist, wrote on the history of scientific societies and institutes, including the Accademia dei Lincei.

2. The Accademia dei Lincei, founded in Rome in 1603 by Federico Cesi (1585-1630), a botanist, was the first—and remains to this day the most prestigious—scientific academy in Italy.

3. Tommaso Campanella's Città del sole (City of the sun) was first published in Latin in 1623 with the title Civitas soils. Francis Bacon's New Atlantis appeared in 1624.

On. Campanella and his Città del sole, see Notebook i, §62, n. 1.

§72. Science columns

1. Attilio Cablati (1872-1950), a professor at the Università Commerciale Bocconi, a very prestigious business school in Milan, was a prolific writer of books, pamphlets, and articles on Italian and international finance, monetary policy, and general economic topics. In the early 1920s his commentaries on business and economics appeared frequently in the daily newspapers II Secolo and La Stampa.

On. Luigi Einaudi, see Notebook i, §11, n. 1.

2. Emilio Cecchi (1884-1966), an essayist, travel writer, art critic, and literary scholar with a special interest in English literature, published his work in many different journals and periodicals, including Leonardo, La Voce, Il Marzocco, Nuova Antologia, and La Ronda. From 1919 to 1925 he was an Italian correspondent for the Manchester Guardian, and during the same period he contributed a regular book column for La Tribuna. In 1924 he became the literary editor of the daily II Secolo, and in 1927 his articles started appearing regularly in the Corriere della Sera. In 1930 he spent a year teaching Italian culture at the University of California―Berkeley.

On Giuseppe Antonio Borgese see Notebook 1, n. §93, 11. 2； on Ugo Ojetti, see Notebook i, §24, n. 4； and on Goffredo Bellonci, see Notebook I, §7, n. i.

3. Ernesto Bertarelli (1878-1957) studied medicine and held many important academic positions in the field both in Italy and abroad. The author of many technical and scientific publications, he also wrote extensively for a wider audience of nonspecialists. Bertarelli was the editor of several periodicals devoted to medical and health issues, including the Rivista di Igiene, LIngegnere Igienista, Pensiero Medico, and Salute.

4. L'Arduo appeared for the first time in Bologna in January 1914 and was brought out regularly until December of the same year. It was revived several years later, again in Bologna, and came out regularly from the beginning of 1921 until the end of 1923. Sebastiano Timpanaro, who founded the journal, shared his editorial duties with Bruno Biancoli and Orazio Specchia, both of them physicists, like Timpanaro himself. LArduo published articles by some of the most interesting thinkers of the time, among them, Piero Gobetti, Guido De Ruggiero, Adriano Tilgher, Rodolfo Mondolfo, Luigi Russo, Federico Enriquez, Luigi Donati, and Orso Mario Corbino.

Sebastiano Timpanaro, Sr. (1888-1949), a distinguished professor of mathematics and physics, had a special interest in the philosophy and history of science, on which he published many books, essays, and articles in various literary and cultural periodicals. His publications include a multivolume edition of Galileo Galilei's writings. Most probably, Gramsci knew of Timpanaro^s work primarily through La Fiera Letteraria, where Timpanaro published, among other things, a series of short articles under the title "Pretesti” (Pretexts) that he signed with the pseudonym Mario Pant. The journal founded by Timpanaro, L'Arduo, is also mentioned in a book that Gramsci cites a number of times in the notebooks； see Giuseppe Prezzolini, La coltura italiana (Florence: Società Anonima Editrice Lä Voce, 1923), p. 339. In prison, Gramsci had a copy of the second revised edition of Prezzolini's book； see Notebook i, §43, n. 13.

§73. Father Bresciani's progeny. Luigi Capuana

i. See Luigi Tonelli, "Il carattere e l'opera di Luigi Capuana” (The character and work of Luigi Capuana), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1347 (May i； 1928): 5-18. The quoted passage appears on pp. 16-17； the comments in parentheses are Gramsci怎.

Luigi Tonelli (1890-1939), a literary critic who taught at the Catholic University of Milan, published books on the history of Italian drama, modern literary criticism, Manzoni, and Tasso.

On Luigi Capuana, see Notebook i, §45, n. 4.

2. In the articles on the theater that he published regularly in Avanti! between 1916 and 1920, Gramsci wrote only once on Capuana: a short review of a performance of Quacquarà, one of Capuana's minor plays. Gramsci concludes his review with the following remarks: "This is a work that Luigi Capuana, a man of great ability and good taste, left unpublished for his heirs, who certainly did not pay homage to his memory by presenting it to the public. 〃 Gramsci's review appeared in the Turin edition of Avanti! on April 27, 1916.

3. Il fu Mattia Pascal, generally considered Luigi Pirandello's most successful novel, was first serialized in Nuova Antologia from April to June 1904 and brought out in book form the following year by the Treves publishing house of Milan. For an English translation, see Luigi Pirandello, The Late Mattia Pascal, trans. William Weaver (New York: Doubleday, 1964).

The first performance of Pirandello's Liolà took place in Rome in November 1916. (The play was written and performed in the dialect of Agrigento [Sicily], but a version. of it in standard Italian was published in Florence in 1928.) On April 3,1917, the play opened in Turin, at the Teatro Alfieri； Gramsci was present. In his review, ''Liolà di Pirandello// which appeared in the Turin edition of Avanti! the following day, Gramsci stressed the significance of Pirandello's use of dialect and dwelt at some length on the fact that the plot of the play was drawn from II fu Mattia Pascal. Among other things, Gramsci wrote:

Luigi Pirandello's new three-act play was not a success at the Alfieri. It did not have the kind of success that is necessary for a play to be profitable. Nevertheless, Liolà is a fine play, perhaps the best that has been produced by the Sicilian dialect theater....

Liolà is the best product of Luigi Pirandello's literary energy. In it Pirandello has successfully rid himself of his rhetorical habits. Pirandello is deliberately a humorist, which means that all too often the initial intuition of his works is submerged in a rhetorical swamp of unconsciously sermonizing morality and pointless verbosity. Liolà, too, has passed through this phase； at the time he was called Mattia Pascal, and he was the central character of a long ironic novel entitled, precisely, Il fu Mattia Pascal.... Subsequently Pirandello reconceived his creation, and Liolà is the result. The plot is the same, but the artistic conception has been completely renewed； it has become whole, it has become pure representation, totally rid of all that moralizing and artificial humoristic baggage that had weighed it down. Liolà is a farce, but in the best sense of the term, a farce that is related to the satyr dramas of ancient Greece and has its pictorial equivalent in the figurative art of the Hellenistic world seen on vases. There is reason to think that dialectal art as expressed in this play by Pirandello is linked to the ancient popular artistic tradition of Magna Graecia, with its buffoons, its pastoral idylls, its country life full of Dionysian frenzy, much of which has survived in the present Sicilian rural tradition, which is where it has been preserved most vitally and sincerely....

Mattia Pascal, the melancholic modem creature, cross-eyed, the observer of hfe, at times cynical, bitter, sad, sentimental, becomes Liolà, the man of pagan life, full of moral and physical robustness, because he is himself simple vigorous humanity.

4. Ina polemical article entitled "La lingua unica e PEsperanto^ (A single language and Esperanto) in II Grido del Popolo, February i6, 1918, Gramsci compared the efforts to establish and impose the use of a uniform, or standard, or correct Italian with the drive to promote Esperanto. Part of his earlier argument is germane to the issue he touches on here:

The promoters of a single language are worried by the fact that while there are a number of people in the world who would like to communicate directly with one another, there is a countless number of different languages which restrict the possibility of communication.... This anxiety for a single language has manifested itself in various ways at different times. ... In Italy this has become a national anxiety； it was expressed in the Accademia della Crusca, among the purists, and in the ideas of Manzoni. The purists posited the ideal of a definitive language: the language of certain fourteenth and sixteenthcentury writers which should be perpetuated because it was the only beautiful language, the only genuine Italian, But the beauty of a language is not fixed in space and time； it does not even exist. It is not the language that is beautiful, but poetic masterpieces, and their beauty consists in their adequately expressing the artist's inner world.

Another passage from this same article by Gramsci is quoted in Notebook §2, n. 2.

§74. Giulio Bertoni and linguistics

i. The correct title of the neolinguistics primer by Giulio Bertoni and Matteo G. Bartoli to which Gramsci refers (as ^Manualetto di linguistica")

is Breviario di neolinguistica (Modena: Tipografia Editrice Modenese, 1925). The book is divided into two parts. Bertoni wrote the first part, "Principi generali” (General principles)； the second part； by Bartolix is entitled "Criteri tecnici” (Technical criteria). Gramsci owned a copy of this book prior to his arrest, and he repeatedly asked that it be sent to him— unsuccessfully, it seems. Soon. after his arrest, Gramsci wrote a letter (which, though undated, is definitely from mid-November 1926 and almost certainly his very first letter from prison) from the Regina Coeli prison in Rome to his landlady, Clara Passarge, asking her "to send me the following books: (1) the German grammar that was in the bookshelf next to the entryway； (2) the Breviario dì linguistica, by Bertoni and Bartoli, which was in the cabinet in front of the bed； (3)... an inexpensive copy of the Divine Comedy.The letter was confiscated by the police and never reached its destination. The Breviario was among the books Gramsci requested in an October 3, 1927/ letter to Tatiana Schucht. Two months later he still had not received the book, as he communicated to Tatiana Schucht in a December 12/ 1927, letter in which he also informed her of his decision to abandon 〃the plan of writing a dissertation dealing with and entitled This Round Table is Square7 〃 (see Notebook iz "Notes and Jottings，n. 5, i：374).

The second work to which Gramsci refers is a pamphlet on language and poetry by Giulio Bertoni, Linguaggio e poesia (Rieti: Bibliotheca Editrice, 1930), that was published in the series "Quaderni critici raccolti da Domenico Petrini,? (Critical notebooks collected by Domenico Petrini). La Nuova Italia x, no. 8 (August 20z 1930), does not contain any passages from Bertoni?s pamphlet, only a bibliographical reference to it on p. 348. Gramsci may have been thinking of a review of Bertoni7s pamphlet by Ferrucio Blasi in La Nuova Italia i, no. 10 (October io, 1930): 428-29.

Giulio Bertoni ( 1878-1942)z a linguist and Romance philologist, taught at the University of Turin from 1921 until 1928, when he moved to Rome. His approaches to the study of literature and language were eclectic； while he held on. to certain positivistic premises, at the same time many of the views he expressed and the rhetoric he employed betrayed an affinity with the brand of idealism advanced by Croce and even more with the actual idealism of Giovanni Gentile. (Gramsci remarks in a September 20, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht: ^Bertoni alone thinks he is a Crocean by dusting off the old theory of beautiful words and ugly words as a linguistic novelty derived from Croce's aesthetics/7) The Accademia d'Italia appointed Bertoni to direct one of its major projects: namely, the production of a dictionary of the Italian language. Gramsci extends his critique of Bertoni in other parts of the notebooks； see especially Notebook 6, §20.

2. Matteo Giulio Battoli (1873-1946) became a professor of linguistics at the University of Turin in 1907, and Gramsci studied with him when he was attending the university. Bartoli was especially interested in examining the processes of linguistic change, tracing their geographic spread, and studying their relation to history and culture. In 1911 he drew up plans for a linguistic atlas of Italy. An opponent of the neogrammarians and their positivist orientation, Bartoli characterized himself as a neolinguist, as can be seen from the title of the book he coauthored with Giulio Bertoni and of another he published the same year. Introduzione alla neolinguistica (Geneva: Olschki, 1925). Later he described his specific field of inquiry as ''spatial (or areal) linguistics% his final book, in fact, consists of a collection of essays expounding his theories on areal linguistics. Saggi di linguistica spaziale (Turin: Bona, 1945). Bartoli also made scholarly contributions to the study of proto-Indo-European languages.

Gramsci alludes to his relationship with BartoE in a March 19/ 1927/ letter to Tatiana Schucht: "A major intellectual 'remorse' of my life is the deep sorrow that I caused my good professor Bartoli at the University of Turin, who was convinced that I was the archangel destined to put to definitive rout the neogrammarians, since he, belonging to the same generation and bound by a million academic ties to this mob of most infamous men, did not wish, in his pronouncements, to go beyond a certain, limit set by convention and by deference to the old funerary monuments of erudition/7

3. See Giulio Bertoni, “Nuovi orientamenti linguistici,, (New trends in linguistics), Leonardo 2, no. 2 (February 20, 1926): 31-34.

4. See Mario Casella, Z/Ueredità delFAscoli e Fodierna glottologia ital-iana〃 (The legacy of Ascoli and Italian linguistics today), Il Marzocco 35, no. 27 (July 6, 1930).

5. Giovanni Campus (1875-1919), a linguist born in the province of Sassari (Sardinia), wrote his first scholarly work on a major Sardinian dialect； Fonetica del dialetto logudurese (Turin: Bona, 1901) was favorably-reviewed by Matteo Bartoli. Campus's expertise in phonetics enabled him to produce valuable studies on Latin and Aryo-European velars.

6. Benedetto Croce wrote a brief but favorable review of Bertoni and Bartoli/s Breviario di neolmguistica in La Critica 24/ no. 3 (May 20, 1926): 181-82. In 1941, however, Croce criticized Bertoni's work and sought to refute the notion that Bertoni 〃has advanced in any way the theory I elaborated/7 is clear to m.e,/, Croce wrote, "that Bertoni has contaminated my thought with the anesthetic and antiaesthetic thought of so-called actual idealism [i.e.z Gentile's philosophy] and he remains embarrassingly trapped in the middle" ("La filosofia del hnguaggio e le sue condizioni presenti in Italia" [The philosophy of language and its present state in Italy], reprinted in Benedetto Croce, Discorsi di varia filosofia (Bari: Laterza, 1959)/ 1:235-5。).

7. Among many other things, the German philologist Karl Vossler (1872-1949) wrote two linguistic studies, Positivismus und Idealismus in der Sprachwissenschaft (1904) and Sprache als Schöpfung und Entwicklung (1905)—translated into Italian and published in a single volume: Positivismo e idealismo nella scienza del linguaggio (Bari: Laterza, 1908)—in which his ideas are consonant with (and indebted to) Croce's early theories of language and aesthetics.

8. See Benedetto Croce's short essay "Questa tavola rotonda è quadrata(This round table is square), originally published in 1905 and later included in one of Crocei book on aesthetics: Problemi di estetica e contributi alla storia della estetica italiana (Bari: Laterza, 1923), pp. 169-173. (Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison.) Croce's essay is the first topic treated by Gramsci in his final notebook, which is entirely devoted to the study of grammar (see Notebook 29, §1). On the phrase “this round table is square/' see also Notebook 1, “Notes and Jottings/7 n. 5, i：374・

§7 5. Utopias and philosophical novels

1. Ezio Chiòrboli, "Anton Francesco Doni// Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1347 (May iz 1928): 43-48.

Anton Francesco Doni (1513-74) spent most of his life in Florence and Venice. Having set up a printing press, he published the works of other writers as well as his own. (Among other things, he published the translation of Thomas More's Utopia by Ortensio Lando (1512-ca. 1553) mentioned in the next paragraph of Gramsci's note.) His better-known works include the two-volume Librerie, which comprises information and critical comments on the writings of his contemporaries and is one of the earliest examples of the art of bibliography； La zucca (The gourd), a miscellany of proverbs, fables, jokes, conundrums, stories, and so on； Mondi celesti, terrestri ed infernali (Celestial, terrestrial, and infernal worlds), a series of satires published between 1552 and 1553； and Imarmi (The mar-bles)y a sequence of dialogues, also published in 1552-5 3, in which various characters from diverse social backgrounds converse on moral, social, and other issues on the marble steps of the cathedral of Florence.

2. Petrus Camper (1722-89), a Dutch anatomist and naturalist, was the first to attempt to establish a correlation between a person's intelligence and the width of his or her "facial angle.

3. Johann Kaspar Lavater (1741-1801), a Swiss Protestant pastor, became widely known for his studies of physiognomy. His profound interest in religious experience and the nonrational also led him to study the phenomenon of trances.

Franz Joseph Gall (1758-1828), a German physiologist and anatomist, is credited with having established phrenology as a systematic discipline. He was one of the first scientists to look for and to examine the specific functions of the different areas of the brain.

4. Mondo pazzo o savio (A mad or wise world) is one of the satires in the sequence Mondi celesti, terrestri ed infernali,

5. Chiòrboli,Anton Francesco Doni/7 p. 46.

6. Ibid., p. 47.

7. The edition of Anton Francesco Doni's I Marmi edited by E. Chiòrboli (Bari: Laterza, 1928) is cited in a footnote on p. 43 of Chiòrboli's article.

§76. The question of the language and the Italian intellectual classes

i. According to legend, the Chinese philosopher Lao-tzu (ca. 604-531 b.cJ, who is considered the fovmder of Taoism, was born with white hair, having remained in his mother^ womb for more than sixty (and in other versions more than seventy or eighty) years. Gramsci refers to this legend of Lao-tzu several times in his preprison writings as well as in. the notebooks and the letters from prison. In one of his early articles, "Vecchiezze” (Oldness), in the "Sotto la Mole" column of the Turin edition of Avanti!, July 13,1916, he compares the young socialists (including himself) to Lao-tzu: "They accuse us of being old. ... At times . . . we feel decrepit ourselves. ...But a brief reflection suffices to dispel this pessimism. We feel old because by perverse destiny we were born in an old age. It is the air we breathe, the institutions that govern usz the men against whom we struggle: they are old. . . . Like Lao-tzu in the Chinese legend, we are old children, people born at the age of eighty. A mass of traditions weighs heavily on us, and we have to strain doubly hard to bear it； centuries-old laws shackle our current activities."

For Gramsci, the legend of Lao-tzu was associated with his memories of the University of Turin, as can be seen from an anecdote he recounts toward the end of an article entitled "Cultura e lotta di classe” (Culture and class struggle) in the May 25, 1918/ issue of II Grido del Popolo:

We recall an old university professor who for forty years was supposedly teaching a course of theoretical philosophy on the "Final Evolutionary Being." Every year he opened with a "review" of the precursors of the system, and he talked about Lao-tzu, the old manchild of Chinese philosophy, the man bom at the age of eighty. And every year he started talking about Lao-tzu again, because new students arrived, and they too had to learn about Lao-tzu from the mouth of the professor. And so the "Final Evolutionary Being” became a legend, an evanescent chimera, and for many generations of students the only living reality was Lao-tzu, the old man-child, the baby born at eighty.

Gramsci mentions this anecdote again in Notebook 6, §noz where he identifies the professor as Pasquale DTrcole (1831-1917), who taught philosophy at the University of Turin.

Gramsci refers to Lao-tzu in the course of discussing the development of his sons and reminiscing about his own childhood in a July 1, 1929, letter to his wife, Giulia: Z/Indeedz I think that a child's life like that of thirty years ago is impossible today: children today are already eighty years old when they are born., like the Chinese Lao-tzu/7 One more allusion to Lao-tzu occurs in another letter to Giulia, dated May 18, 1931, and here too Gramsci's train of thought leads him to an implicit comparison between his childhood and that of his sons: "In conclusion: the world is vast and terrible and complicated, and we are acquiring a wisdom that will become proverbial. At least I think that Uve become wiser than Lao-tzu, who at the moment of his birth already had the knowledge and composure of a man of eighty； I believe I've completely forgotten how to throw stones and how to catch lizards. Do Delio and Giuliano know how to throw stones far, make them whistle, make them skip four or five times on the water? I'm sorry that I wasn't able to teach them all these skills as well as others./z

2. See Filippo Ermini, 〃H Mediolatino” (Middle Latin}, Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1348 (May 16/ 1928): 228-36.

Filippo Ermini (1868-1935) is the author of a valuable history of medieval Latin literature from its origins to the seventh century: Storla della letteratura latina medievale dalle origini alla fine del secolo VII (Spoleto: Centro Italiano di Studi sull7Alto Medioevo, i960). He also wrote a book on St. Benedict of Norcia and produced a critical edition of tenthcentury epic poetry in Latin.

3. In a November 17, 1930, letter to Tatiana Schucht, Gramsci men^ tions that he had done some research on Middle Latin (probably when he was studying linguistics at the University of Turin):

Ten years ago I wrote an essay on the language question according to Manzoni, and that required a certain amount of research into the organization of Italian culture from the time when the written language (the so-called Middle Latin: that is, the Latin written from 400 a.d. until 1300) became completely detached from the language spoken by the people, which, Roman centralization having come to an end, was fragmented into numberless dialects. This Middle Latin was followed by the vernacular, which was again submerged by humanistic Latin giving rise to an. erudite language, vernacular in its lexicon but not in its phonology and even less in its syntax, which was reproduced from Latin: thus there continued to exist a double language, the popular or dialectal one and the erudite, that is, the language of intellectuals and the cultured classes.

During the early months of 1918 Gramsci was engaged in a rather heated polemic with some socialists from Milan and Turin who wanted actively to promote the dissemination and use of Esperanto in the name of ''internationalism.Gramsci strongly opposed the idea on both linguistic and ideological grounds. In a letter一undated, but certainly written sometime in February 1918—to Leo Gaietto (who, with Gramsci and Ottavio Pastore, was a member of the editorial staff of the Turin edition of Avanti!], Gramsci argued: "Purism is a rigidified and mechanistic form of linguistics, and therefore the mentality of the purist resembles the mentality of the advocate of Esperanto, I am a revolutionary, a historicist, and I maintain that the only useful and rational forms of social (linguistic, economic, political) activity are those that emerge spontaneously and are realized through the free activities of the energies of society. Therefore: down with Esperanto, for the same reason that we say down with all privileges, all mechanizations, all determined and rigidified forms of life—cadavers that infect and assail the process of life/7

In his article 〃La lingua unica e fEsperanto” (A single language and Esperanto) in II Grido del Popolo, February 16, 1918, Gramsci described the drive to promote Esperanto as

a cosmopolitan not an international preoccupation； the preoccupation of the bourgeois who travels for business or pleasure, of nomads rather than of stable productive citizens. They want to bring about arbitrarily results for which the necessary conditions do not yet exist； and since their activity is purely arbitrary, they succeed only in wasting the time and energy of those who take them seriously. They would like to give rise, artificially, to an utterly rigid language that is immune to change in space and time. By doing this they collide head on with the science of language which teaches that in and for itself language is an expression of beauty more than an instrument of communication, and that the history of the fortunes and the dissemination of a given language depends strictly on the complex social activity of the people who speak it.

... Esperanto, the single language, is nothing but a whimsy, an illusion of cosmopolitan., humanitarian, democratic mentalities that have not yet been shaken and made fertile by historical criticism.

... Each new social stratum that emerges in history, that organizes itself for the good fight, introduces new currents and new usages into the language, and it explodes the fixed schemes established by grammarians for the immediate convenience of teaching. In history, in social life, nothing is fixed, rigid, or definitive, and nothing ever will be. New truths augment the patrimony of knowledge； new and increasingly greater needs are created by new living conditions； new intellectual and moral curiosities spur the spirit, compelling it to renew itself, to improve itself, to change linguistic forms of expression by drawing on foreign languages, reviving dead forms, changing meanings and grammatical functions. In this constant striving for perfection, in this flow of liquefied volcanic matter, utopias, arbitrary acts, vain illusions―like the current one of a single language and Esperanto—bum up and are annihilated.

4. In 842, in Strasbourg, Charles the Bald (king of the West Franks) and Louis the German (king of the East Franks) and their followers took an oath of alliance, known as the Serment de Strasbourg； its text is the oldest written document in Old French.

5. Gramsci is referring to a set of documents dating from 960 to 963 that are known as the placiti cassinosi. They are notarial acts certifying sworn testimony, recorded in the vernacular, concerning the property rights and claims of the Benedictine monastery of Montecassino. These documents, preserved in the archives of the monastery, contain the earliest-known transcriptions of the Italian vernacular.

6. In his unfinished treatise (written in Latin) on language, rhetoric, and style. De vulgati eloquentia, Dante sought to identify and define a common Italian literary language that, unlike the volgari municipali (as he calls the local dialects )z was appropriate for dealing with the most elevated themes: love7 arms, and virtue. This "high" literary language he characterized as the volgare illustre (illustrious vernacular), which was exemplified in the works of the poets of the Sicilian and Bolognese schools and in the Florentine stil novo (new style). The volgare illustre, as conceived by Dante, was a regularized form of Florentine stripped of its most idiosyncratic dialectal features.

7. For about five years leading up to 1848, a wave of nationalism and liberalism swept across Italy. Secular and clerical intellectuals were, for the most part, united in their calls for liberation from foreign rule and the unification of the country and in their demands for political reform. Vincenzo Gioberti articulated this sense of common purpose when he proposed a neo-Guelf solution to the problem of Italian unification—ix., a federal Italy, with the pope as president, a concept that theoretically reconciled liberal aspirations and clerical demands (see Notebook 1, §46/ n. i). The actions of Pius IX during the first year of his papacy gave every indication that Gioberti's was an attainable vision- In 1848, however, the pope's position changed: he decided not to declare war on Austria. Gioberti became disillusioned and before long was advocating a different course of action in which the church would play no role； instead, Piedmont would lead Italy to nationhood. Following the events of 1848, the unification of Italy and the political ideas that inspired it were bitterly opposed by the Vatican and the intellectuals affiliated with it.

8. Ferdinand Brunot (1860-1938), a French linguist who taught at the Sorbonne, wrote the ten-volume Histoire de la langue fran^aise des orig-ines à 1900 (Paris: Colin, 1905-30).

Emile Littré (1801-81), a philologist and positivist philosopher with close ties to Auguste Comte, was a member of the Académie Fran^aise as well as a senator in the National Assembly. He made a major contribution French lexicography with his monumental Dictionnaixe de la langue fran^aise, 4 vols. (Paris: Hachette, 1863-72). His scholarly work includes important writings on literature, sociology, and philosophy, as well as on the history of the French language.

9. See Concetto Marchesi, Storia della letteratura latina, 2 vols. (Messina: Principato, 1925-27). Gramsci seems to have been familiar with this history of Latin literature, even though it is not among those books of his that have been preserved.

Concetto Marchesi (1878-1957), a philologist born in Sicily, was a professor at the universities of Messina and Pisa before becoming rector of the University of Padua. In addition to the history of Latin literature mentioned by Gramsci and books on Seneca and Tacitus, he published numerous critical editions as well as translations of Latin texts. Marchesi was also active in politics, first as a socialist and later as a communist. In 1943-44, he played an important role in organizing the Committee of National Liberation in Padua. A member of the Constituent Assembly in 1946, Marchesi was subsequently elected to parliament,

§78. Father Bresciani's progeny. Popular serial novels

i. During the time he spent at the prison in Milan awaiting trial, Gramsci read a large number of popular novels. He described his approach to these novels in a letter to Tatiana Schucht, dated April 22,1929 (see 1:15-16).

Some of Gramsci's views on Victor Hugo's popular novels can be gleaned from one of his early articles: ^Pregiudicati^ (Convicted), in the "Sotto la Mole" column of the Turin edition of Avanti!, August 2, 1916:

We do not have a great liking for French romanticism. Victor Hugo's bombast, his social preachings, leave us quite cold. Sterile diatribes, they are destructive； they do not even contribute constructively to art. They are the product of a sentimental fetishism of the ^people/7 and they leave one's conscience undisturbed； they provide no stimulus for the creative imagination* Yet finding ourselves by chance in a courtroom has made us think again about the French romantic writer's grand, titanic tirades against the system of justice of his time. We would like to have his robust lungs so that we could bellow against the mountains of stamped papers that imprint on the foreheads of the victims, who are headed behind bars, the brand that will send them forever to the Henna of the underworld: convicted!

Half an hour's worth of discussion, four trials at express speed, four guilty verdicts, four more convicted persons. The judges do not even know their names, except at the final decisive moment. The main anxiety is to finish off quickly in order to get out of the fetid courtroom to breathe. No sense of responsibility....

We do not like French romanticism. Yet we would like to see one of its great rhetoricians, one of those "people" fetishists, pillory—in a book that passes through everyone's hands—these types of know-it-all jurists, these irresponsible persons who are appointed to the bench with the presumption that they can really protect the community. For we do not think that we are able, any time soon, to impose a penalty on such frivolous behavior. For we would like—but it would be expecting too much—the fury of the people to sweep away these mountains of stamped papers and these clowns in legal robes who are no less despicable than the well-remembered inquisitors of melodramas.

And therefore we would be satisfied if, thanks to a romantic novel, they were hounded, bawled out in the streets.

Gramsci also makes a brief observation on Hugo's politics in Notebook 2, §112.

Karl Marx's critique of Sue's Les mystères de Paris is brought up earlier in this notebook； see Notebook 3, §52 and §53. Gramsci directly associates Eugène Sue with 〃the late romanticism of 1848“ in Notebook i, §27,

2. Emile-Jules Richebourg (1833-98), a popular writer whose sentimental novels were serialized in La Revue Fian^aise and Le Petit Journal.

Pierre Decourcelle (1856-1926), who wrote sequels, acquired some measure of popularity as a playwright.

3. Xavier Aymonde de Montépin (1823-1902) wrote numerous serial novels as well as plays based on them.

4. On Pierre-Alexis Ponson du Terrail, see Notebook 3, §38, n. 12.

5. Monsieur Lecocq was the creation of Emile Gaboriau (1832-73), and Arsène Lupin was invented by Maurice Leblanc (1864-1941).

Gramsci returns to a discussion of the detective novel in Notebook 3, §i53・

6. Ann Radcliffe (1764-1823), whose famous novels include The Mysteries of Udolpho and The Italians, was one of the most successful and widely admired writers of Gothic fiction in. England.

7. Gramsci sketches some of his ideas on Jules Verne and the adventure novel in Notebook 3, §149.

Louis-Henri Boussenard (1847-1910) wrote numerous adventure novels.

8. Mario Mazzucchelli (b. 1876) wrote a number of biographical works’ several of them on French historical figures, including André Chénier, Saint-Just, Robespierre, and Napoleon HL His book on Manzoni and the nun of Monza has been translated into English: The Nun of Monza, trans. E. Gendel (New York: Simon and Schuster, 1963).

9. Tommaso Aniello (1620-47), known as Masaniello, led a popular insurrection against the nobility and Spanish rule in Naples in 1647. The revolt was triggered by the imposition of a new tax on fruit. Assassins hired by the nobles murdered Masaniello, who had urged his followers to slaughter the oppressive aristocrats. An opera based on his life, La muette de Portici (1828), also known as Masaniello^ by the French composer Daniel Auber and the librettist Eugene Scribe, was a sensational popular success when first performed in France and elsewhere.

Cola di Rienzo (1313-54), a man of humble birth, had the grandiose vision of restoring the Roman republic and its ancient glory. In 1347, at a time when Rome was dominated by a few patrician families and the papacy had its seat in Avignon, Cola di Rienzo gathered the people on the Capitoline Hill, where he declared that he was abrogating many of the rights and privileges of the nobility. Taking the title of tribune of the people/7 he set about reforming the laws, taxation system, and governmental structure of the city. Within a few months he was devising a plan to establish Rome as the capital of all Italy and had invited the city-states and the most powerful rulers of the peninsula to send representatives to a national parliament that he had set up. He also demanded that Louis the Bavarian (Emperor Louis IV) and Charles IV (also known as Charles of Luxembourg) come to Rome so that he could arbitrate their rival claims to the Holy Roman Empire； at the same time, he was making preparations for the election of a Roman emperor of Italy. The pope； the emperor, and especially the Roman nobles, alarmed by Rienzo's rapid accumulation of power, sought to topple him. Although he successfully resisted their first attempt to remove him, he could not muster popular support for long, and before the end of the year he was forced to flee the city. In 1354 Rienzo returned to govern Rome with the title of senator, conferred on him by Pope Innocent VI, who was hoping to use him in order to reestablish papal authority over the city. He was killed that same year by a rioting mob.

10. Bianca Capello (1548-87), a Venetian noblewoman (whose last name： is sometimes spelled "Cappello") married to a Florentine gentleman； became the mistress of Francesco I de' Medici, who was married to ： Johanna, the archduchess of Austria. After the death of their respective； spouses, Bianca and Francesco married in 1578, a union that displeased the Florentine court and greatly angered Francesco's powerful brother, Cardinal Ferdinando I de' Medici. Many legends surround the death of the two lovers, who expired within a day of each other. One story has it that Ferdinando (who renounced his cardinalship in order to succeed his brother Francesco as sovereign ruler of Tuscany) had arranged for them to be poisoned. According to another story, it was Bianca who intended to poison Ferdinando, but her husband mistakenly ate some of the deadly food she had prepared； since she could not bear the thought of living without her beloved Francesco, she accompanied him to the grave by consuming some of the poisoned food herself. The tragedy of Bianca and Francesco inspired the composition of many literary works.

Gramsci may have been thinking of a specific biographical account of Bianca Capello in French: Pierre Gauthier, Vie de Bianca Cappello (Paris: Bibliothèque Historia—Tallaudier, 1928). Gauthierzs book is discussed in an article by Nello Tarchiani, "Il romanzo di Bianca Cappello” (The extraordinary story of Bianca Cappello), in II Marzocco 34, no. 30 (July 28,1929),

11. La monaca di Monza, a very popular novel by Giovanni Rosini (1776-1855), was first published in three volumes in 1829 and reprinted numerous times in the nineteenth century and in the early decades of the twentieth century. It is a continuation of the story of Gertrude, the nun of Monza, one of the most memorable characters in Alessandro Manzoni's I promessi sposi (The Betrothed). Manzoni based his fictional creation on a historical figure, Marianna de Leyva.

12. Dario Niccodemi (1874-1934) spent some years studying in Argentina and wrote his first two plays in Spanish. At the turn. of the century he moved back to Europe in the company of a French actress for whom he wrote some plays in French. He returned to his native Italy during the First World War, and by the early 1920s he had become one of the most popular and successful playwrights in the country. Scampolo (Remnant) was first performed in 1915, Laigrette (The egret) in 1912, and La volata (The flight) in 1918.

Gramsci had reviewed the performances in Turin of the following plays by Niccodemi: Scampolo, in the Turin edition of Avanti! February 6,1916； Il titano (The titan), in the Turin edition of Avanti! May 18/1916； La nemica (The enemy), in the Turin edition of Avanti! November 9, 1916； La maestrina (The schoolmistress), in the Turin edition of Avanti! February 28, 1918； Acidalia, in the Piedmont edition of Avanti! April 8, 1919； and La volata, in the Piedmont edition of Avanti! April 24, 1919.

More than once in his reviews, Gramsci criticizes Niccodemi for using his skills not to produce good drama but rather to play on the cheap emotions of his audiences, generate applause, and increase ticket sales. He concludes the review of La maestrina with the remark, "Great theatrical skill: no trace of art, and therefore great applause." Most of Gramsci's objections to Niccodemi's work are expressed in his review of La volata:

The factory invades the palace. The old aristocratic palace, where feelings, affections, habits, and family relations have become a mold that is multicolored on the surface but laced with putrefaction at the core, is besieged by the fervent activity of modem work, which makes it crumble, causing many parts of it to break down. Work conquers the palace； the watertight compartment of the caste collapses under the blows of the hammer of the proletariat. The young countess Dora rebels against the tyranny of ancestral conventions and marries Mario Gaddi, an unpretentious worker who makes headway in the world by dint of his tenacious will and innate intelligence.

This motif recurs frequently in Dario Niccodemi's plays. Nicco-demi's intellectual preparation, his social and historical experience, are derived directly from the French romanticists of 1848. He is a spiritual epigone of those bourgeois writers who in their novels, plays； and poetry continued fighting the idealistic battle for the rights of man and for equality in matters of the heart and of sentiment, a battle that their ancestors of 1789 had won for the rights of man and for equality before the law.

Niccodemi is a belated Georges Ohnet, and Georges Ohnet was already a latecomer after Eugène Sue, after Victor Hugo, and after countless writers of serial novels. But the motif still has the power of suggestion: it never fails to fascinate and to touch people—which goes to show that in the sphere of sentiment and reason, the modification and enrichment of customs have not proceeded at the same pace as the written law and technological progress. Class struggle is seen from the point of view of tender feelings and warmheartedness: what is established does not even amount to class distinction but rather to a conventional caricature of human beings based on the moral categories of good and evil, on the literary categories of angel and villain, and on the oleographic categories of work and rotten blood. Petty bourgeois soppiness that would have made Octave Mirbeau vomit and would have elicited an ironic smile from Maxim Gorky； the product of a mean envy inherent in. the mentality of the pathetic French bourgeois who cannot forgive himself for feeling second-rate in his great admiration for the aristocrat, to whom he hopes to become related by marriage. Niccodemi does not raise himself one iota above the intellectual and artistic level of Carolina Invernizio. La volata is constructed along dramatic lines that are habitual to the "wizard" of Italian theater: big clashes, spicy situations, exasperating conflicts that generate the desired applause with its promise of many repeat performances.

Gramsci also comments on the relation between NiccodemFs plays and popular serial fiction (and specifically the French romanticists) in a later article, ^Caratteri italiani: Gioda o del romanticismo” (Italian characters: Gioda； or, On romanticism), LUnità, February 28, 1924 (quoted above in Notebook 3, §53/ n. 1). On the same point, see Gramsci's April 22/ 1929, letter to Tatiana Schucht, quoted on 1:15-16.

13. Giovacchino Forzano (1884-1970), who wrote many historical dramas, as well as some plays in dialect, is best known as the librettist for two of PuccinVs operas, Suor Angelica and Gianni Schicchi. He also wrote libretti for operas by Ruggiero Leoncavallo, Pietro Mascagni, and others.

Gramsci had written an unfavorable review of one of Forzano's plays, Madonna Oretta, in the Piedmont edition of Avanti! February 5, 1919.

14, Gramsci had articulated some of his views on Henrik Ibsen's A Doll's House in one of his theater reviews, 〃La morale e il costume" (Morals and customs) in the Turin edition of Avanti! March 22/ 1917. His review-essay is as much about the moral state of Italian society as it is about the performance of Ibsen's play that he attended:

Although the majority of the audience warmly applauded the first two acts, it was dumbfounded and unresponsive after the third act, and the applause was muted: only one curtain call, more for the famous actress than for the superior creature brought into the world by Ibsen's imagination. Why was the audience unresponsive? Why did it fail to experience a flutter of sympathy when witnessing the profoundly moral act of Nora Helmar, who gives up her home, her husband, and her children to look for herself on her own, to dig down and find m the depths of her own self the strong roots of her moral being, to fulfill the obligations that one has, first of all, toward oneself?

Drama, if it is to be truly drama and not a pointless iridescence of words, must have a moral content； it must be a representation of a necessary clash between two inner worlds, two viewpoints, two moral lives. If the clash is necessary； the play immediately grips the minds of the spectators； they will relive it in all its wholeness, in all its elementary as well as its most subtle historical motivations. By reliving the inner world of the play, the spectators also relive its art, the artistic form that has given concrete life to that world, that has concretized that world in a living and reliable representation of human individuals who suffer, rejoice, and struggle continuously to go beyond themselves, to improve the moral fiber of their own current historical personalities immersed in worldly life. Why then, at a certain point, did the spectators―the gentlemen and ladies who yesterday evening witnessed the steady, necessary, humanly necessary, unfolding of Nora Helmar's spiritual drama一fail to sympathize with her? Why were they dumbfounded and almost disgusted by the ending? Are these gentlemen and these ladies immoral? Or is the humanity of Henrik Ibsen immoral?

Neither the one nor the other. What happened was simply that our customs rebelled against more spiritually human morals. It was simply a rebellion of our customs (I mean the customs that constitute the life of the Italian public), which are the traditional moral garb of our high and petty bourgeoisie, made up for the most part of servility, of submission to the milieu, of the hypocritical disguising of man the animal, a bundle of nerves and muscles sheathed in voluptuously attractive skin. Our customs rebelled against another custom, against a different, superior, more spiritual, less animalistic tradition. Another custom whereby woman and man are no longer just muscles, nerves, and skin but are essentially spirit； whereby the family is no longer just an economic institution but is, above all, a moral world in the making that is made whole by the intimate fusion of two souls that find in one another what each lacks individually； whereby the woman is no longer just the female who nurses her babies and feels for them a love made up of spasms of the flesh and throbbing of the heart but is a human creature in herself, has a consciousness of her own, her own inner needs, a human personality that is all hers, and the dignity of an independent being.

The customs of the Latin high and petty bourgeoisie rebel； they cannot understand this kind of world. The only form of women's liberation that our customs allow us to comprehend is that of the woman who becomes a cocotte. The pochade is really the only dramatic female action that our customs can comprehend: the attainment of physiological and sexual freedom. There is no escape from the dull circuit of nerves, muscles, and sensitive skin.

The rest of the review-essay is very important for understanding Gramsci's views on the situation of women in Italian society at the time.

§79. The question of the language

1. Ettore Veoz "Roma nei suoi fogli dialettali” (Rome in its dialect writings), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1350 (June 16, 1928): 515-25.

2. Ibid., p. 515.

3. The ''liberal period of Pius IX〃 lasted for the two years after his accession to the papal throne in 1846. The Roman republic was established in 1849 and destroyed that same year by French military intervention,

§80. The particular chauvinism of the Italians

I. Francesco Savorgnan di Brazzà wrote a series of articles on Italian inventors and discoverers that were subsequently collected in a book； see Francesco Savorgnan di Brazzà, Da Leonardo a Marconi (Milan: Hoepli? 1933). Gramsci comments briefly on this book in Notebook 17, §19, where he echoes the observations he makes in this note.

§81. Federico Confalonieri

1. Gramsci's interest in the puzzling questions surrounding Confalon-ieri's behavior after his release from the Spielberg prison is evident from his observation in Notebook i, §44: 〃The noteworthy fact about the Confalonieri question is this: that unlike other patriots who had been pardoned by Austria, Confalonieri, though he was a remarkable statesman, retired from active political life and after his liberation maintained a very reserved demeanour^ (1:149).

On Count Federico Confalonieri, see Notebook i7 §44, n. 42.

2. Ugo Da Corno, ^Lettera inedita di Giuseppe Mazzini” (Unpublished letter by Giuseppe Mazzini), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1350 (June 16, 1928):425-433. The passage quoted by Gramsci appears on p. 433.

3. Ibid., p. 429,

Gabriele Rosa (1812-97), who shared many of Confaloiiieri's political views, was arrested by the Austrians for his patriotic activities and spent three years in the Spielberg prison. He wrote several books on various aspects of Italian and European history. His posthumously published Autobiografia (1912) is a valuable document for the study of the Risorgimento.

Farinata degli Uberti, who figures prominently in canto 10 of Dante's Inferno (discussed in detail by Gramsci in Notebook 4, §78—§88), was an important leader of the Ghibellines, who expelled the Guelfs from Florence in 1248. In 1258, however, the Guelfs triumphed over the Ghibellines, and Farinata was compelled to go into exile in Siena. He returned to Florence two years later, following the Ghibellines' decisive victory over their rivals.

§82. French and Italian historical culture

i. On Charles Maurras, see Notebook §14, n. 1； §18； and §48.

On Jacques Bainville and his writings on the history of France, with which Gramsci was familiar, see Notebook if §44, n. 36.

2. Francesco Ferrucci (1489-1530), the military commissioner of the Florentine republic, was captured and then murdered by Fabrizio Maramaldo, commander of the combined armies of Pope Clement VII (Giulio dei Medici) and the Holy Roman emperor Charles V Florence had suffered a long siege (1528-30), but it fell a few days after Ferrucci^ death； Florentine republicanism was permanently crushed, and the despotic rule of the Medicis restored.

Milan, Venice, Mantua, Padua, and other northern Italian cities formed the first Lombard League in 1167 in order to protect their freedoms and jurisdictional autonomy from being subordinated to the imperial authority of Frederick I Barbarossa. The city-state of Como sided with the emperor Frederick in his conflict with the cities of the league.

In 1508 Pope Julius II joined a powerful anti-Venetian alliance, known as the League of Cambrai, that had been formed by Louis XII of France (who also ruled Milan), Ferdinand II of Spain (also king of Naples), and the Holy Roman emperor Maximilian I. The following year the troops of the alliance inflicted a heavy defeat on Venice, which enabled the pope to reacquire those large portions of the papal states that had been appropriated by Venice after the death of Pope Alexander VI (Rodrigo Borgia).

3. See Gioacchino Volpe, LItalia in cammino: Lultimo cinquantennio (Milan: Treves, 1927), in which the history of Italy since the Risorgimento is presented as a forward march of national consolidation and expansion. Gramsci owned a copy of this book； he mentions it in a letter he wrote from the prison in Milan to Tatiana Schucht on May 23/1927: "I have very little history, and the same goes for literature: a book by Gioacchino Volpe on the last fifty years of Italian history, which is, however, topical and has a rather polemical slant/7

On Gioacchino Volpe, see Notebook 2, §ioo, n. 3.

4. On Benedetto Croce's Storia dltalia dal 1871 al 1915 (Bari: Laterza, 1928), see Notebook i, §132, n. 3.

5. On Giuseppe Prezzolini and the different editions of his book La cultura italiana, see Notebook 1, §8, n. 1, and §43, n. 13.

§83. Past and present

i. Ermanno Amicucci, "Scuola di giornalismo” (School of journalism^ Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1351 (July iz 1928): 71-90.

Ermanno Amicucci (1890-1955) worked indefatigably to establish Fascist control over the press. Founder of the Fascist Federation of Italian Journalists, he also served as secretary of the Fascist Journalist Union and was a member of the commission that formulated Mussolini's government policies on book censorship. For many years he edited the Turin daily Gazzetta del Popolo. Amicucci remained a steadfast Fascist even after the collapse of the regime, and he continued to serve Mussolini during the period of the Republic of Salò； among other functions, he took over the editorship of II Corriere della Sera, the very influential newspaper of Milan. Amicucci received a death sentence for his wartime activities, but an amnesty enabled him to emigrate to Argentina, where he remained until his death.

§84. The death of Vittorio Emanuele II

i. Angelo Guidi, archivio inedito di Paulo Fambri^ (The unpublished papers of Paulo FambriJ, Nuova Antologia 63, no, 1350 (June 16, 1928): 454-71； the sentence transcribed by Gramsci appears on p. 457. This is the first part of a long article published in segments in separate issues of Nuova Antologia. The third part of the article is cited in Notebook 2, §8i.

Guido Baccelli (1832-1916) held the post of minister of education under three different prime ministers: Agostino Depretis, Francesco Crispi, and Luigi Pelloux. He was also minister of agriculture in the cabinet of Prime Minister Giuseppe Zanardelli.

On Paulo Fambri, see Notebook 2, §81, n. 1.

Vittorio Emanuele II, the first king of Italy, died of pneumonia complicated by pleurisy on January 9, 1878； he was fifty-seven years of age.

§85. Arturo Graf

1. In Notebook 2, §53, Gramsci describes Giovanni Cena as a disciple of Graf." Cena, in. fact, was Arturo Graf's student at the University of Turin.

For notes on. Giovanni Cena and Arturo Graf, see Notebook 2, §53, nn. I and 3. For Cena, see also Notebook 3, §93, and Notebook 6, §42.

2. O. M. Barbano, “Per una fede: Da lettere inedite di Arturo Graf〃 (For faith: From Arturo Graf's unpublished letters), Nuova Antologia 63/ no. 1352 (July 16, 1928): 151-60.

3. Arturo Grafs slim volume Per una fede (Milan: Treves, 1906) consists of a reprint, with some added commentary, of an article Graf had originally published in the Nuova Antologia of June i, 1905 : that is, when the prestigious periodical was being edited by Giovanni Cena.

4. The periodical II Rinnovamento (Renewal) was founded in 1907 by Tommaso Gallarati Scotti and other Milanese intellectuals who drew their inspiration from the political philosophy of Vincenzo Gioberti. As its title indicates, the periodical was launched to promote the renewal of Catholicism by reconciling its teachings with science, its dogmas with historical criticism and biblical exegesis, and its social teachings with lib-eralz democratic, participatory politics. The intellectuals associated with Il Rinnovamento were very much a part of the current that was labeled modernism and officially condemned by Pope Pius X in his encyclical of 1907, Pascendi dominici gregìs. Il Rinnovamento ceased publication in December 1909 as a result of pressure from the church.

§86. Lorianism. Alfredo Trombetti

1. Alfredo Trombetti (1866-1929), a polyglot who taught linguistics at the University of Bologna, was a strong advocate of the thesis that all languages derive from a single source. His major works include a four-volume study of comparative linguistics, Saggi di glottologia generale comparata (1908-20), and the book on Etruscan, La lingua etrusca, cited by Gramsci later in this note. Trombetti was a member of the Italian Academy.

Gramsci also discusses Trombetti怎 work in Notebook 3, §156.

2. See Pericle Ducati, primo Congresso Internazionale Etrusco77 (The first International Congress of Etruscan Studies), Nuova Antologia 63, no, 1352 (July 16/ 工928): 196-205.

Pericle Ducati (1880-1944), an archaeologist, held professorships at the universities of Catania, Turin, and Bologna and was a member of the Lincei Academy. He wrote extensively on ancient classical art and history, including two books on the Etruscan civilization.

3. Gaetano De Sanctis (1880-1944), an antipositivist classical scholar who attached great importance to the history of art, religion, and law, was a professor of ancient history at the University of Turin from 1900 until 1929, when he moved to the University of Rome. He was forced out of his academic post in 1931 for refusing to take the oath of loyalty to the Fascist regime. He was restored to his professorship in 1944.

Luigi Pareti (1885-1962), a professor of the history of antiquity at the universities of Plorence, Turin, and Naples, wrote extensively on the origins of the Etruscan, Italic, and Greek cultures. -

4，See Alfredo Trombetti； La lingua etrusca (Florence: Casa Editrice Rinascimento del Libro, 1928).

5. Giacomo Devoto (1897-1974) was appointed professor of linguistics at the University of Florence in 1927. He had a special interest in the ancient languages and cultures of the Italian peninsula.

6. On Gramsci's former professor of linguistics, Matteo Bartoli, see Notebook 3, §74, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 2. §87. Regarding the formation of the Italian intellectual classes in the early Middle Ages

1. Gramsci writes on the question of Middle Latin in Notebook 3, §76.

2. Alessandro Manzoni published his tragedy Adelchi (1822) with an appendix entitled "Discorso sopra alcuni punti della storia longobardica in Italia” (A discourse on some points of Longobard history in Italy). One of the points Manzoni stresses in his essay is that the indigenous Latin people retained their separate identity and did not fuse with the foreign Lombard invaders. The tragedy itself； as the title indicates, focuses on Adelchis, the son of Desiderius, the last Lombard king in Italy, and on his heroic struggles to regain his father's kingdom from Charlemagne. Manzoni transforms the historical figure of Adelchis into a romantic tragic hero. The tragedy, however, also has a salient nationalist motif. It depicts the Italian people as the victims of domination by two foreign powers, the Longobards and the Franks, engaged in a power struggle with each other. One of the messages Manzoni attempts to convey is that the Italians should not rely on foreigners to free them from oppressive domination by other foreign powers； rather, they need to recognize their common heritage, unite, and achieve independence and nationhood on their own.

3. Francesco Brandileone, “I 'due diritti7 e il loro odierno insegnamento in Italia” (The two legal codes and how they are taught in Italy today). Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1352 (July 16, 1928): 238-52.

Francesco Brandileone (1858-1929), a distinguished legal historian who held professorships at various universities, was a specialist in the Byzantine legal tradition, on which he wrote extensively. One of his books is a study on Byzantine law in southern Italy from the eighth to the twelfth century.

§88. The study of the historical formation of the Italian intellectuals

i. Gramsci discusses the need to go back to the time of the Roman Empire in his study of the history and role of Italian intellectuals in his letters to Tatiana Schucht of November 工 7,1930, and August 3,1931 (see the excerpts quoted in 1:29-30).

§89. Lorianism

i. The false news of the discovery of the lost books of Livy received considerable attention in the press for about two months starting in early August 1924. Mario Di Martino-Fusco (the professor whose name Gramsci does not recall), editor-in-chief of the journal Mouseion, created the impression that he had discovered among the manuscripts held by Neapolitan convents the lost decads of Livy's history of Rome. The "discovery?, was first reported in early August in the scholarly journal Rivista Indo-Greco-Italica, edited by Francesco Ribezzo； the report claimed to be based on "Dr. Di Martino's word of honor/7 The story was picked up by the newspapers, fueled by the comments of some scholars who seemed inclined to give credence to the sensational news. The minister of education initiated an inquiry into the matter and asked Fausto Niccolini to conduct it. Di Martino, who in the meantime had made no effort to refute the stories about his supposed discovery, was compelled to declare that the whole affair stemmed from a misunderstanding. The Chicago Daily News contacted Benedetto Croce, asking him to shed some light on the issue. Croce responded with a telegram, the text of which was published in the Turin daily La Stampa on October n, 1926； it can now be found in Benedetto Croce, Pagine Sparse (Bari: Laterza, 1960), 2:269-70. Decades later, Fausto Niccolini provided a detailed reconstruction of the entire affair in a pamphlet, La farsa liviana (The Livy farce), published privately in 1954； it was later included in a book on Croce's minor works by Fausto Niccolini, Il Croce minore (Milan and Naples: Ricciardi, 1963), pp. 193-248.

2. On Matteo Bartoli, see Notebook 3, §74, and n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§90. History of the subaltern classes

i. Gramsci is referring to page numbers in his manuscript and specifically to Notebook 3, §14 and §18.

§91. Father Bresciani's progeny. The book fair

i. On Umberto Fracchia, see Notebook 1, §24, n. 18.

§92. Federico Confalonieri

i. On Federico Confalonieri, see Notebook i, §44, n.. 42； see also Notebook 3, §81.

§93. Giovanni Cena

i. On Giovanni Cena, see Notebook 2, §53, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

See two publications by Alessandro Marcucci extolling Cena's establishment of schools for the benefit of the rural population of Lazio. The first, G. Cena e le scuole peri contadini (Rome: Off. Poligr. Ital., 1919), is a fifteen-page pamphlet reproducing the text of a speech delivered to an audience of peasants at a school in Lazio on May 24, 1918； the second is an article Marcucci published in an educational journal: "La scuola in gloria di Giovanni Cena/Z I Diritti della Scuola, December 4, 1921.

§94. Father Bresciani怎 progeny. Polifilo

1. On Luca Beltrami and his stories (published under the pseudonym Polifilo) about the fictional town of Casate Olona, see Notebook i, §24, n. 2.

Il Romanzo Mensile and La Lettura were monthly supplements of the daily Corriere della Sera.

2. Fortunato Pintor, Bibliografia degli scritti di Luca Beltrami dal marzo 1881 al marzo 1930, with a preface by Guido Mazzoni (Milan: Tipografia U. Allegretti, 1930). This bibliography of Beltrami's writings was published by his friends to mark "his seventy-fifth birthday and the twenty-fifth anniversary of his nomination as senator of the realm.

Fortunato Pintor (1877-1960), a Renaissance scholar and compiler of some very important bibliographical works, served as an editor of the Italian encyclopedia and oversaw the production. of the biographical dictionary of Italians. He held the post oFlibrarian at the National Library in Florence and at the senate.

On Guido Mazzoni, see Notebook 2, §31, n. 2.

3. See the section "Bibliografie” (Bibliographies) in II Marzocco 35, no. 19 (May ii? 1930), which contains a brief description of and comment on Pintori bibliography of Beltrami's writings； it is Gramsci's source of information for this note.

4. "Bibliografie." The parenthesis is Gramsci's.

5. Francisco Ferrer, a republican and anticlerical Spanish intellectual, was accused of instigating the violent uprising that erupted in Barcelona in July 1909 in opposition. to the Moroccan war. Ferrer was found guilty and executed by firing squad on October 13/ 1909. The trial and condemnation of Ferrer generated widespread protest marches and strikes in Italy, organized for the most part by anticlericals. Il Marzocco, like many other newspapers and periodicals^ vehemently condemned Spain for its treatment of Ferrer. In its issue of October 17, 1909 (vol. 14, no. 42), for example, the entire front page, comprising an editorial and two articles, was devoted to the case.

§95. Father Bresciani's progeny

i. See Edoardo Boutet, /zGli aneddoti delFArgentina: 2. Eschilo tra le lavandaie,, (The anecdotes of the Argentina [Theater in Rome]: 2. Aeschylus among the washerwomen), Il Viandante i, no. 23 (November 7, 1909).

Edoardo Boutet (1856-1915), a drama critic and teacher, became the director of the permanent company of the Argentina Theater, in Rome, in 1905, a post he held for three years.

On Tomaso Monicelli and the weekly paper, Il Viandante, which he edited, see Notebook 2, §89, n. 5.

2, Gaio [pseudonym of Adolfo Orvieto], “Danton? il melodramma, e il 'romanzo nella vita/ 〃 (Danton, drama, and "fiction in life'” in the "Marginalia" section of II Marzocco 34, no. 46 (November 工7, 1929).

Adolfo Orvieto (1871-1952), together with his brother, Angiolo, founded the weekly review II Marzocco in Florence in 1896. He was editor-in-chief of the review from 1901 until its suppression by the Fascist regime in 工932.

3，Les deux orphelines (1874), a play by Eugène Cormon. (1810-1903) and Adolphe Dennery (1811-99), retained its great popularity for many years.

4. The Hungarian playwright who wrote Danton was actually Gyula Pekär (1867-1937). Danton, originally written in Hungarian, was first published in 1921 in Budapest.

§96. Father Biesciani's progeny. Popular novels

1. Baroness Emmuska Orczy (1865-1947) was born in Hungary but spent most of her life in England. She achieved fame with the publication, in 1905, of The Scarlet Pimpernel, the extremely popular novel about the adventures of an English aristocrat who rescues French aristocrats by smuggling them out of their country during the Revolution. Orczy's many other novels include sequels to The Scarlet Pimpernel and several detective stories.

2. After leaving his native Australia and settling in England, Guy Newell Boothby (1867-1905) wrote a prodigious number of novels and short stories, several of which are tales of adventure set in exotic places such as the South Seas and the East Indies.

3. La capinera del mulino (Milan: Sonzogno, nd) is the Italian translation of Emile Richebourg's La fauvette du moulin, a long novel that first appeared in serial form and was later published in four volumes (Paris: Rouff, 1948). This was one of several novels by Richebourg (mentioned earlier, in Notebook 3, §78) that were translated into Italian and brought out in inexpensive editions by the Sonzogno publishing house.

4. Edoardo Perino's publication of anticlerical literature (including Guerrazzi's work) is also mentioned in Notebook 2, §108.

On Francesco Domenico Guerrazzi, see Notebook if §44/ n. 37.

§97. The concordat

i. The Law of Papal Guarantees, enacted on May 13, 1871, was meant to define and regulate the relations between the Kingdom of Italy and the Holy See after the seizure of Rome, which completed the unification of the nation and wiped out the last vestiges of the pope's temporal power. Among other things, the law guaranteed the pope's rights and privileges as head of the Catholic Church and formally recognized the extraterritoriality of the Vatican. By this law, the Italian government also undertook to make an annual grant of several million lire to the Holy See. The Vatican, which regarded the Law of Papal Guarantees as an unacceptable unilateral action by a state whose legitimacy it did not recognize, refused to accept the grant, but the Italian. government continued regularly to deposit the decreed amount in a fund set aside exclusively for the pope. The issue was resolved only when relations between the Italian state and the Holy See were regularized by the Lateran Accords (i.e., the concordat) of 1929.

§98. Spartacus

i. Tenney Frank, Storia economica di Roma: Dalle origini alla fine della Repubblica, trans. Bruno Lavagnini (Florence: Vallecchi, 1924). Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison. This book is a translation of Frank怎 Economic History of Rome to the End of the Republic (Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press, 1920). A revised edition of this book was published by Johns Hopkins University Press in 1927. Gramsci is referring to a passage in chapter 10 (chapter 12 in the second edition) of Frank's book: Z/When Carthage fell, a large part of its population was sold into captivity. The Cimbri taken by Marius, assigned naturally to the heavy work on plantations, made up the backbone of Spartacus7 army a few years later/7 This chapter, entitled "The Plebs Urbana/' discusses at some length the impact that the large and diverse population of slaves and their descendants had on the economic and political life of Rome.

§99. The law of numbers

i. The content of this note (following the title and parenthesis) is a transcription of part of a footnote on p. 147 of Tenney Frank's Storia economica di Róma, cited in n. i of §9& above. See chapter 10 (chapter 12 in the second edition) of the original English version of Frank's Economic History of Rome.

§100. Father Bresciani^ progeny. Popular literature

i. On Ugo Mioniz see Notebook 3, §63/ and n. 17 in the accompanying Notes to the Text.

§101. Father Bresciani^ progeny. The antipopular or nonpopular-national character of Italian literature

1. On Adriano Tilgher, see Notebook i, §28/ n. 2.

2. See the unsigned note under the subtitle "Ferragosto” (The August holiday) in the "Rassegna della stampa” (Review of the press) section of Ultalia Letteraria 2, no. 34 (August 24, 1930).

On Giuseppe Parini, see Notebook iz §88/ n. 1.

§102. Past and present. School of journalism

i. Gramsci is referring to page numbers in his manuscript； they correspond to Notebook 3, §83.

2» See the column "Notizie sindacali” (Trade union news), in LItalia Letteraria 2, no. 34 (August 24/ 1930).

§103. The Risorgimento and the revolutionary classes

i. See Nino Cortese, Memorie di un generale della Repubblica e dell'impero, 2 vols. (Bari: Laterza, 1927), which comprises an edition of Francesco Pignatelli's Memorie storiche del Regno di Napoli dal 工790 al i8is (Historical memoirs of the Kingdom of Naples from 1790 to 1815) with Cortese's booklength introductory essay, "Stato e ideali politici nelPltalia meridionale e ^esperienza di una rivoluzione” (The state and political ideals in southern Italy and the experience óf a revolution).

The information that this note contains on Pignatelli's Memorie and on Cortese's introductory essay can be found (in many cases verbatim) in Piero Pieri, "Memorie dell'ottocento” ( N inet een th- century memoirs )z Leonardo 3； no. 12 (December 20, 1927). Gramsci had a copy of this issue of Leonardo and in all likelihood had read Pierizs article during the period of his internment on the island of Ustica. He did not, however, have access to it at the time he was writing this note (the second half of 1930) (see his March 23, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht. (Tatiana Schucht was later able to obtain for Gramsci copies of the issues of Leonardo that had been lost, and he informed her that he had received them in his letter of May 4, 1931.) Gramsci's direct source of information most .probably was a summary of Pieri's essay that appeared under the title 〃Le Memorie del generale Pignatelli/, in the "Marginalia" section of II Marzocco 33, no. 5 (January 29/1928). As for the bibliographical details (number of pages, size, price, etc.) pertaining to Cortese怎 edition, Gramsci probably obtained them from the advertisements of the Laterza publishing house in the issues of the periodicals he had available to him at the Turi prison when he wrote this note.

Francesco Pignatelli, prince of Strongoli (1775-1853), a Neapolitan aristocrat, was attracted early to eighteenth-century liberal thought, which put him at odds with the Bourbon monarchy and eventually led him to espouse the Jacobin cause. In 1798 he joined the French republican army that was occupying Rome under the command of General Championnet, and he led one of its divisions in the campaign against the Kingdom of Naples that resulted in the flight of King Ferdinand to Sicily and the establishment of the Parthenopean republic. Pignatelli played a prominent role in the suppression of dissidents during the short life of the republic. When the Bourbon monarchy was restored, his two brothers (Ferdinando and Mario) were executed, but he managed to flee into exile in France and northern Italy. He returned to Naples in 1806/ when it was taken over by Napoleon and King Ferdinand once again fled to Sicily. Pignatelli held important offices under Joseph Bonaparte and Joachim Murat. Later he also participated in military campaigns against Austria.

Gramsci alludes elsewhere to another work on Naples during the Napoleonic era by the historian Nino Cortese； see Notebook 2/ §98/ and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§104. Popular literature. An anthology of writings by American workers

1. Gramsci saw Poèmes d'ouvriers américains advertised in the issues of Les Nouvelles Littéraires he received in prison.

2. Gramsci extracted the information on Despresle's anthology from the "Correspondance" section of Les Nouvelles Littéraires 9/ no. 410 (August 23, 193O/L

On Henri Barbusse, see Notebook 3, §4, and n. 6 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. An advertisement for Nouvel àge littéraire appeared in Les Nouvelles Littéraires 9, no. 405 (July 19, 1930).

§105. Lonanism. American peanuts and oil

1. There is no other note on Lorianism that mentions this proposal to cultivate peanuts in very large quantities for the purpose of satisfying Italy's fuel oil needs.

2. Colonel Barberiszs presentation at the science congress, /ZI1 combustibile liquido e il suo avvenire” (Liquid fuel and its future}, is mentioned by Manfredi Gravina in the second part of his article "Olii, petroli, e benzina” (Oil, kerosene, and gasoline), Nuova Antologia 63/ no. 1339 (January i, 1928): 59-71. The first part of Gravina's article is discussed in Notebook 2/ §54,

§106. Prof. H. de Vries de Heekelingen

I. All the information contained in this note is drawn from a short article by L. Amaro, "Indagini internazionali sul fascismo” (International research on fascism), in the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section of Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1340 (January 16, 1928): 259-61.

§107. The social classes in the Risorgimento

1. Gramsci extracted the quotation from Niccolò Rodolico's book about the people's role during the early stages of the Risorgimento movement in southern Italy一II popolo agli inizi del Risorgimento nel'Italia meridionale (Florence: Le Mounier, 1925)—as well as the bibliographical information on it, from the ''Rassegna bibliografica” (Bibliographic review) section of Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1340 (January 1928): 269.

On the Bandiera brothers, who founded the secret society Esperia as part of their efforts for the liberation of Italy, see Notebook 2, §69, n. 2.

On Niccolò Rodolico, see Notebook i, §62/ n. 1.

2. Gramsci is referring to the trials that took place in Turin following the collapse of the insurrection that had been sparked in the early months of 1821 by a group of liberal aristocratic officers, prominent among them Santorre di Santarosa, who were pressing the demands for a constitution and a war of national liberation against Austria. Although the rebellion compelled King Vittorio Emanuele I to abdicate, it was suppressed within a few months by the new king, Carlo Felice, with the help of the Austrian army. The trials resulted in many death sentences, but only two executions were actually carried out, because many of the officers involved were able to go into exile.

3. The failure of the 1853 insurrections inspired by Mazzini's national movement in Milan and elsewhere and the brutal reprisals that followed resulted in serious, widespread criticism of Mazzini's revolutionary strategy; even by many of those who shared his political ideals. Undeterred, Mazzini reaffirmed his convictions, disbanded the London-based National Committee, and established the Action Party

Francesco Crispi (on whom see Notebook i, §43, n. io), a close collaborator of Mazzini, moved to Portugal from Paris in 1858, when Italian exiles like himself were regarded with great suspicion by the French following Febee Orsini's attempted assassination of Napoleon III.

§109. Father Bresciani's progeny. Italo Svevo and

Italian litterateurs

i. Italo Svevo met James Joyce in 1907, when the Irish novelist was residing in Trieste. Joyce was trying to make an income teaching English； Svevo, whose business affairs entailed frequent visits to England, needed private lessons to help him improve his facility with the language. The two quickly became friends. By that time Svevo had already written and published at his own expense two novels—Una vita (1892), translated into English as A Life (1963), and Senilità (1898b translated into English with the title As a Man Grows Older (1932)—both of which failed to get any critical attention. Joyce was greatly impressed by Svevo's work and strongly encouraged his friend to resume writing fiction. Svevo produced one more novel, which, again, he published at his own expense: it was La coscienza di Zeno (1923), translated into English as Confessions of Zeno (1930). Although it would eventually come to be regarded as Svevo's best novel. La coscienza di Zeno was largely ignored by Italian critics when it first came out. Joyce, however, thought very highly of it and recommended it to his Parisian literary friends, among them Valéry Larbaud and Benjamin Cremieux. Their reaction was as enthusiastic as Joyce's: they acclaimed Svevo as a major modern novelist. In Italy, Svevozs stature remained unacknowledged until 1925, when the poet, critic, and future Nobel Prize winner Eugenio Montale published an essay extolling the merits of La coscienza di Zeno in LEsame. Through that essay and subsequent critical writings, Montale contributed greatly to the understanding and appreciation of Svevo's writings by Italian readers. (On Italo Svevo, see Notebook i, §33, n. 1)

2. Editor's note, La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 39 (September 23, 1928). The parenthetical exclamation marks in the quoted passage are Gramsci's.

Three times in the note Gramsci cites Eltalia Letteraria when he is, in fact, referring to articles published in La Fiera Letteraria. La Fiera Letteraria changed its name to LItalia Letteraria in April 1929.

3. See Carlo Linati, “Italo Svevo, romanziere” (Italo Svevo, novelist), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1341 (February iz 1928): 328-36.

Carlo Linati (1878-1949), a novelist and literary critic, had a special interest in modern British, Irish, and American literature. In addition to translating works by Yeats, Synge, Henry James, D. H. Lawrence, and James Joyce's play Exiles, he was the first person to translate some of Pound's poetry into Italian.

4. See Notebook 1, §102, and n. 3 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

5. See Lea Nissim, "Omero Redi e le 'Pistole' 〃 (Omero Redi and the "Epistles"), Nuova Antologia 63/ no. 1341 (February i, 1928): 352-64. This article is about the regular column "Pistole” (Epistles), by the pseudonymous Omero Redi, in II Giornalino della Domenica, a Sunday paper for the young. The author of "Pistole" was a priest, Ermenegildo Pistelli (1862-1927), who had created the persona of a Florentine boy named Omero Redi. The columns recounted the experiences of school from the perspective of the young Omero, thus revealing the shortcomings of the educational system. These "Epistles" were subsequently collected in a volume. Le pistole di Omero (1917). A sequel, Memorie di Omero Redi (Memoirs of Omero Redi) was published in 1927. Pistelli, an expert philologist who, among other things, produced critical editions of Latin works by Dante and Pascoli, also wrote commentaries for children on some Greek and Roman classics and on Manzoni's The Betrothed.

Vamba was the pseudonym used by Luigi Bertelli (1858-1920), who in 1906 founded the extraordinarily successful Sunday paper for young read' ers II Giornalino della Domenica, which continued to be published after Bertelli's death, until 1924. His many writings found a very large youthful audience.

§111. Lorianism

i. See Benedetto Migliore, "Una nuova interpretazione delle rime di Dante e delzdolce stil nuovo7 " (A new interpretation of Dante怎 rhymes and the dolce stil nuovo), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1342 (February i6f 1928): 446-61. In his article, Migliore refers to a book by Luigi Valli, Il linguaggio segreto di Dante ß dei fedeli d'Amore (Rome: Casa Editrice Optima, 1928), in which Valli purports to provide the key to what he terms "Dante's secret language/' Gramsci first mentions Valli怎 work and labels it Lorian in Notebook iz §97.

On Luigi Valliz see Notebook 1, §97, n. 1.

§112. Corrado Barbagallo

1. Corrado Barbagallo； Loro e il fuoco: Capitale e lavoro attraverso i secoli (Milan: Corbaccio, 1927). While he was imprisoned in Milan awaiting trial, Gramsci received a copy of this book by Barbagallo on the history of capital and labor stretching back into ancient Rome. Gramsci also comments on Barbagallo^ work in Notebook 1, §25, and Notebook 4, §6。.

For notes on Corrado Barbagallo and his writings on. ancient economic history, see Notebook 1, §2$z im. 17 and 18.

2. The disagreement between Joachim Marquardt and Theodor Mommsen on. the function of the collegia opificum et artificum (i.ev the guilds in ancient Rome that became increasingly important during the imperial period, especially under Diocletian and Constantine) is touched on in a short article by M. Pierro, “I problemi del lavorov (Labor problems), in the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section in Nuova Antologia 63/ no. 1342 (February 16, 1928): 537-539.

Theodor Mommsen and Joachim Marquardt mention the collegia on several different occasions in their voluminous writings on ancient Rome； see especially, T. Mommsen, De collegiis et sodaliciis (工843), and J. Marquardt, Römische Fmanzverwaltung (1884).

§113. Utopias

I. See Achille Loria, "Pensieri e soggetti economici in Shakespeare^ (Economic thoughts and themes in Shakespeare),. Nuova Antologia 63, no. 工353 (August I, 1928): 315-29. On pp. 317-18 of his article, Loria makes references to Renan's plays Caliban (written in 1887) and Leau de jou-vence (written in 1889), both of which use Shakespeare's Tempest as the point of departure.

§114. Past and present

i. This is a translation of a line Achille Loria quotes (purportedly from Shakespeare's Timon of Athens} in Italian onp. 323 of his article "Pensieri e soggetti economici in Shakespeare^ (Economic thoughts and themes in Shakespeare), Nuova Antologìa 63, no. 1353 (August 1, 1928). As Gramsci's parenthetical question mark at the end of the quote indicates, Loria provides no information as to which act and scene he is quoting. Loria's article contains numerous quotations from Shakespeare's plays； none of them is accompanied by a citation. Furthermore, many of Loria's quotations are very loose renditions—rather than faithful translations—of Shakespeare's text. Although in the majority of cases Loria's quotes are more or less recognizable when compared to the original, this particular quotation from Timon of Athens cannot be reliably matched to any specific line in the original English version.

§116. International function of the Italian educated classes

i. See Eugenio Barbarich, "Un generale di cavalleria italo-albanese: Giorgio Basta” (An Italo-Albanian cavalry general: Giorgio Basta), Nuova Antologia 63/ no. 1354 (August i6, 1928): 459-73.

Giorgio Basta (ca. 1540-03. 1612) distinguished himself early as a cavalryman, and in 1579 Alessandro Farnese (the duke of Parma) appointed him general commander of his cavalry. After Farnese^ death, Basta joined the army of the Hapsburg emperor Rudolf II. He was eventually made commander of the imperial armies in occupied Transylvania and Hungary and became notorious for his persecution of Protestants. In his later years he devoted himself to scholarship and produced many treatises on military science, the most influential of which, Il governo della cavalleria leggera (IÓI2), is on the strategic and tactical uses of light cavalry.

2. Ibid., p. 473. Raimondo Montecuccoli (1609-80), an Italian prince from Modena who distinguished himself in several major military campaigns, rose to the rank of field marshal in the Austrian imperial army. Montecuccoli was especially esteemed for his expertise in the techniques of fortification and maneuver. He wrote a number of books on military science and military history. His views on the function and use of cavalry were strongly influenced by Giorgio Bastai work.

§119. Past and present. Agitation and propaganda

1. Agostino Depretis (1813-87) was first elected to the Piedmont parliament in. 1848； he was a follower of Mazzini at the time. He held various ministries before becoming the first leftist prime minister of Italy in 1876, a position that he retained, with three rather brief interruptions, for eleven years. He so completely dominated parliamentary politics that he earned himself the epithet of "dictator." What enabled him to hold on to power for so long was his exercise of "transformism”: rather than fight for his legislative projects along party lines, he coopted members of the opposition, bestowing favors on them (in some cases, cabinet positions) and/or on their constituents. In the electoral campaign of 1882, Depretis openly advocated and promoted transformism, and his success in the elections seemed to vindicate his approach. Although his mastery of the art of compromise gained Depretis the collaboration of members of the right-wing coalition and enabled him to enact a number of important reforms (among them, the extension of suffrage and the abolition of certain unfair taxes), he also incurred the anger of some of his most prominent colleagues of the Left, such as Crispi. As Gramsci points out in Notebook i, §43 and §44, transformism can be traced back to the earliest years of Italy's existence as a unified and independent nation—and even before that to the politics of Piedmont； nevertheless, it was Depretis who really refined transformism into the perdurable system that has often given the complexities of Italian politics their distinctive character. As prime min-istersz both Crispi and Giolitti proved to be very adept practitioners of transformism.

On. Francesco Crispi, see Notebook i, §43/ n. 10； and on Giovanni Giolitti, see Notebook 1, §43, n. 12.

Gramsci discusses transformism in several places in his notebooks, but see especially Notebook 8, §36.

2. See Max Weber, Parlamento e governo nel nuovo ordinamento della Germania: Crìtica politica della burocrazia e della vita dei partiti, trans, andpref. by Enrico Ruta (Bari: Laterza, 1919). This is the Italian translation from the German of Max Weber's book on parliament and government in postwar Germany, a political critique of bureaucracy and political parties: Parlament und Regierung im neugeordneten Deutschland, zur politischen Kritik des Beamtentums und Parteiwesens (Munich: Duneker and Humblot, 1918). Although this volume is not preserved among the books Gramsci had in prison, it is most likely that he had read it； see his remarks on it in Notebook 12, §i, and Notebook 15, §48, as well as the comment here on the quality of the translation. The bibliographical data he records in this note may have been transcribed from a catalog of the Laterza publishing house.

§120. Antonio Fradeletto

i. Antonio Fradeletto (1858-1930), public orator and politician from Venice, a member of the Radical Party, was a parliamentary deputy from 1900 until 1919, when Prime Minister Orlando put him in charge of a newly created ministry for the reconstruction of those areas that had suffered the direct effects of the war. He became a senator in 1920. He published several volumes of the many speeches he delivered on art, literature, Italian history, and education.

On December 20,1915, Antonio Fradeletto gave a speech at the Vittoria Theater in Turin on "Venezia e Fora presente” (Venice and the present hour). Italy had entered the war the previous May, and Fradeletto used the speech to stoke patriotic sentiments. The speech provoked Gramsci to write two polemical articles in which he severely criticized Fradeletto for distorting Italian history in order to foster nationalistic myths. The two articles are 〃Le bestialità storiche delPon. Fradeletto^ (The historical nonsense of the Hon. Fradeletto), in the Turin and Milan editions of Avanti! December 21, 1915,； and 〃Le bestialità storiche delPon. Fradeletto e dei suoi difensori” (The historical nonsense of the Hon. Fradeletto and his defenders), in the Turin and Milan editions of Avanti! December 24, 1915, In the first of these articles, Gramsci writes:

The orator stated that the three salient features of the history of Venice are (1 ) the struggle to dominate the Adriatic (with this struggle Venice was supposedly continuing the enterprise of Rome, preventing the Slavs from taking over the sea)； (2) the struggle against the Hapsburgs, animated by broad concepts of Italianness and of freedom (thus, in the seventeenth century, Venice and the dukes of Savoy were the only ones thinking of national independence)； (3) the struggle against the Turks....

In reality the wars that Venice waged in the Adriatic ... were directed either against Genoa or against the maritime cities on the opposite shore, such as Ragusa and Zara, which were anything but Slavic....

As for the assertion concerning the national Italian sentiment of the Republic of St. Mark in the seventeenth century, that is a glaring historical blunder that is still commonly found in current textbooks but that no serious scholar would even dream of taking seriously. Up to the time of the French Revolution there was no widespread or effective national sentiment in Italy； the expressions of Italianness found in the works of litterateurs and historians are nothing other than literature and rhetoric of greater or lesser seriousness, depending on the individuals. Machiavelli does not embody his entire century. It was the bourgeoisie that, having acquired class consciousness after 1789, had a feeling of national solidarity and launched the national revolution.

Gramsci also discusses Fradeletto's historical revisionism in another article in which, once again, he censures the distortions of Italy's past in the rhetorical excesses of wartime orators； see "Parole! Parole! Parole! (Words! Words! Words!}, Il Grido del Popolo, February 26, 1916.

2. Vittorio Cian (on whom see also Gramsci's remarks in Notebook 2, §31, and n. 3 in the corresponding Notes to the Text), a Nationalist member of parliament, was a professor of Italian literature at the University of Turin for many years, including the period when Gramsci was studying there. He appears with great frequency and is often the subject of harsh criticism in Gramsci's journalistic writings. In his article "Da De Sanctis a . . . Cian,z (From De Sanctis to . . . Cian) in the Turin edition of Avanti! January 18, 1916, Gramsci attacks Cian for his proposal to bar the appointment of non-Italian citizens to university professorships. In the same article, Gramsci also recalls that in 1911 Cian had publicly advocated a "boycott of teachers opposed to the war on Libya/7 Two days later, in "Il capintesta" (The ringleader), in the "Sotto ia Mole" column of the Turin edition of Avanti! January 20,工916, Gramsci ridicules Clan's antiGerman posturings (as he does en passant in various other articles). He launched an especially harsh attack on Cian in Z/Per un mandarino del-l,università,/ (For a university mandarin), in the "Sotto la Mole〃 column of the Turin edition of Avanti! May 17, 1916, where he accuses the professor of /z seeking to gain fame and rewards by denouncing to the school authorities all those teachers who are guilty only of wanting to perform their duties as teachers without getting involved in militant politics and who do not yearn to be crowned with the laurels of patriotism." Among many other articles by Gramsci that are critical of Cian's fanatical and reactionary nationalism, see especially ^Bollettino del fronte interno (Bulletin from the home front), in the Sotto la Mole〃 column of the

Turin edition of Avanti! July 6, 1916； "Disagio” (Uneasiness), in the "Sotto la Mole" column of the Turin edition of Avanti! July 21, 1918； 〃I1 mondo, Bertoldo, e il professore Vittorio Cian” (The world, Bertoldo, and Professor Vittorio Cian), in. the Turin edition of Avanti! September 11, 1918； and "La guerra continua, signori” (Gentlemen, the war goes on), in the column "Sotto la Mole" of the Piedmont edition of Avanti! January 20, 1920.

3. On Enrico Corradini, see Notebook iz §58, n. 3； on Francesco Coppola, see Notebook i, §35, n. 1； and on Luigi Federzoni, see Notebook 2, §25, n. i.

Gramsci alludes to the nationalism of Maurice Barres earlier in this notebook； see Notebook 3, §2, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 6.

§121. Father Bresciani怎 progeny

i. Arturo Calza./zConcorsi letterari77 (Literary contests), in the section "Fra i libri e la vita” (In the midst of books and life) of Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1358 (October 16, 1928): 533. The parentheses are Gramsci's.

Arturo Calza {1862-1934) worked on the editorial staff of the Giornale d'Italia from its inception, and he became well known. for his regular column farmacista” (The pharmacist). In his writings he toed the conservative, nationalist political line of the newspaper, which was the mouthpiece of Sidney Sonnino, with Alberto Bergamini as editor-in-chief. He left the Giornale dltalia toward the end of 1932 to become a regular contributor to Nuova Antologia, where he started using the pseudonym Diogene Laerzio. In 1930 one of his articles provoked the ire of Critica Fascista, which attacked him for being an antifascist—an. episode that, in effect, ended Calza's journalistic career. Gramsci refers to this episode in Notebook 6, §55.

On Roberto Forges Davanzali, see Notebook i, §53, n. 4.

§122. Italian diplomacy. Costantino Nigra and the Treaty of Wuchali

1. On Costantino Nigra, see Notebook 2, §95, n. 2； and on the Treaty of Wuchali (also known as the Treaty of Uccialli), see Notebook 2, §2iz n. 3.

2. Carlo Richelmy, "Lettere inedite di Costantino Nigra” (Unpublished Letters by Costantino Nigra), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1360, (November 16, 1928): 15S-61.

3. Emilio Visconti-Venosta (1829-1914) was appointed foreign minister seven different times between 1863 and 1901. His longest uninterrupted stretch in office lasted from 1869 to 1876. Visconti-Venosta was not foreign minister when the Treaty of Wuchali was signed, but he was in office in October 1896, when, in the aftermath of its military defeat at Adowa, Italy signed the Addis Ababa peace treaty, by which it recognized the full sovereignty and independence of Ethiopia, while holding on to the colony of Eritrea.

4. Richelmy, z/Lettere inedite di Costantino Nigra/7 pp. 156-57.

Count Pietro Antonelli signed the Treaty of Wuchali as Italy's representative. For several years he was the principal Italian negotiator with the Ethiopian government but was unable to resolve the dispute over the conflicting inteipretations of the treaty—a dispute that culminated in war and cost Italy dearly.

Oreste Baratieri (1841-1901), a member of Garibaldi^ famed "Thousand” and a member of parliament since 1876/ was appointed governor of Eritrea in 1892. He had some military successes in the region, but in the end he was responsible for the crushing defeat suffered by the Italians when they lost over five thousand men in a battle against Emperor Menelik IPs forces at Adowa on March 1, 1896.

§123. The pitiful Italian

i. Filippo Virgilii, ^Uespansione della cultura italiana” (The expansion of Italian culture), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1361 (December i, 1928): 346. The emphases and interpolation are Gramsci's.

§124. Emigration

1. Gramsci first alludes to Ferri's parliamentary speech on Italian emigration in Notebook i, §58； see also n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

On Enrico Ferri, see Notebook xz §25/ n. 15.

2. See Filippo Virgilii, 〃L'espansione della cultura italiana77 (The expansion of Italian culture), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1361 (December 1, 1928): 339-49, especially pp. 342-43，

Filippo Virgilii also wrote a book on the conditions of agricultural life in Italy: LItalia agricola odierna (Milan: Hoepli, 1.930). The book has a preface by Giacomo Acerbo, who at the time was Mussolini's minister of agriculture； Gramsci makes no reference to it anywhere in his notebooks, even though he received a copy of it in prison at Turi di Bari.

3. For notes on Enrico Corradini and the nationalist concept of Italy as a proletarian nation, as well as on Gramsci's treatment of the emigration question in his unfinished essay "Some Aspects of the Southern Question," see Notebook 1, §58, nn. 1 and 3.

4. The quotation from Ferruccio Macola^ book on the European takeover of Latin America through emigration, UEuropa alla conquista dell"America latina (Venice, 1894), appears on p. 342 of Virgilii?s article.

5. As prime minister, Crispi attempted to make Italy a colonial power； his expansionist policy ended in disaster with the debacle in Ethiopia. On Francesco Crispi, see Notebook i, §43/ n. 10.

§125. Luigi Castellazzo, the Mantua trial, and the other trials under Austrian rule

i. Luigi Castellazzo (1827-90), a militant member of the Mazinian revolutionary organization in Lombardy, was arrested in April 1852 and sentenced to a long prison term for conspiring against the Austrians. The following year, however, he was pardoned and released. Following his release, he rejoined the struggle for the liberation and unification of Italy, participating in several revolutionary battles, including the campaign in Trentino under Garibaldi. In 1867 he was arrested by the pontifical police and jailed for over two years. As Gramsci points out in this note, Castellazzo was later elected to parliament from the electoral district of Grosseto.

Castellazzo^ arrest in 1852 occurred at a time when the Austrian security forces in Lombardy-Veneto, under the command of Field Marshal Joseph Radetzky, were cracking down hard on every form of dissident activity. That same year many other Mazzinian revolutionaries were arrested, and in a trial held in Mantua in November five of them received the death sentence, Enrico Tazzoli (on whom see Notebook i, §88, n. i}7 Angelo Scarsellini, Bernardo de Canal, Giovanni Zambelli, and Carlo Poma were publicly executed at the Belfiore fortress in Mantua on December 7/ 1852； they came to be known as the Belfiore martyrs. Austrian repression became even more severe after the insurrection that took place in Milan in early February 1853, at the end of which month another trial in Mantua resulted in three death sentences: the Mazzinian conspirators Tito Speri, Carlo Montanari, and Bartolomeo Graziosi were executed on March 3,1853, at the Belfiore fortress, thus becoming the second group of Belfiore martyrs. Later that same month, also in Mantua, the Mazzinian Pietro Frattini was condemned to death for conspiracy and high treason. His hanging took place at the Belfiore fortress on March 19/ making him the last of the Belfiore martyrs.

The conservative historian Alessandro Luzio wrote a book (cited by Gramsci later in this note) on the trials and executions of the Belfiore martyrs—I martiri di Belfiore e il loro processo, 4th ed. (Milan: Cogliati； 1924)—in which he argues that after his arrest, Castellazzo provided the Austrians with damning information that sealed the fate of the Belfiore martyrs. Other historians have been less inclined to blame Castellazzo^ revelations to the police for the death of his fellow revolutionaries,

Gramsci remarks on Luzio's tendentiousness as a historian elsewhere in his notebooks； see Notebook i, §44 and §48, Notebook 3, §163, and Notebook 8, §23. On Alessandro Luzio, see Notebook i, §44, n. 45.

2. In the interrogations that followed his arrest in 1821, Giorgio Pallavicino made certain admissions and imprudent or indiscreet statements that led to the arrest of many other anti-Austrian conspirators, among them Count Confalonieri.

On the marquis Giorgio Pallavicino-Trivulzio, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 44； and on Count Federico Confalonieri, see Notebook i, §44, n. 42.

3. Gramsci makes several allusions to the act of homage that the Milanese nobles paid to the Emperor Francis Joseph I in 1853； see Notebook i, §43, n. 24.

4. See Romualdo Bonfadini, Mezzo secolo di patriottismo, ad ed* (Milan: Treves, 1886), which Gramsci also cites in Notebook i, §44.

On Romualdo Bonfadini, see Notebook i, §44/ n. 40.

5. Gramsci comments on Confalonieri^ depositions and his behavior following his release from prison in Notebook i, §149. On the Confalonieri depositions and the controversy that surrounded their discovery, see Notebook i, §44, nn. 42 and 43. Also on Confalonieri^ behavior after he regained his freedom, see Notebook 3, §8ix and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

6. Alessandro Luzio's I processi politici di Milano e di Mantova restituiti dall'Austria deals with documents related to the trials of Italian revolutionaries held in Milan and Mantua under Austrian rule, documents that Austria ceded to Italy. Luzio's book, however, does not discuss the Confalonieri depositions, because they were only discovered in the Viennese archives by Francesco Salata and reclaimed by Italy in 1924； i.e.z after the publication of Luzio's book. See Notebook i, §44, n. 42.

7. Alessandro Luzio, La Massoneria e il Risorgimento italiano, 2 vols. (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1925). This book is about Freemasonry and the Risorgimento.

8. Pier Luigi Rambaldiz "Luci ed ombre nei processi di Mantova” (Lights and shadows in the Mantua trials), Archivio Storico Italiano 63: 257-33「

9. Giuseppe Fat ini, 〃Le elezioni di Grosseto e la Massoneria77 (The Elections at Grosseto and Freemasonry), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1362 {December t6, 1928): 506-24. Fatini's article is the source of the bibliographical data on Luzio's books and Rambaldi's article that Gramsci records in this note.

Giosuè Carducci^ letter of October 13, i886y quoted in Fatini's article (p. 522), praises Castellazzo for the bravery he displayed when he partici-pated in Garibaldi's Sicilian campaign in 1859 and in a battle near Capua in i860, when he was wounded.

10. For another comment on the failure of the Action Party to educate the masses politically and develop a broad popular base； see Notebook 6, §166,

§126. The formation of the Italian educated classes and their cosmopolitan function

i. This note is canceled in the manuscript； unlike all but a handful of the many other canceled notes, however, it is not incorporated or developed in a subsequent notebook.

§127. The Risorgimento

1. Amerigo Scarlatti, writing in the section "Libri da fare” (Books to write), LItalia Che Scrive iiz no. 2 (February 1928): 34.

Vittorio Amedeo II was duke of Savoy (1675-1713), king of Sicily (1713-20), and king of Sardinia (1720-30).

2. Gramsci is referring to an anecdote, which he mentions earlier in this notebook, that he had read in Ferdinando Martini, Confessioni e ricordi, 1859-1892 (Milan: Treves, 1928), pp. 152-53； see Notebook 3, §38, and n. 5 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§128. Machiavelli and Emanuele Filiberto

i. The information contained in. this note is drawn from Pietro Silva's brief review of a collection of essays on Emanuele Filiberto (Turin: Lattes, 1928) in LItalia Che Scrive nf no. 4 (April 1928): 94.

On Emanuele Filiberto, duke of Savoy, see Notebook 2, §60, n. 1.

§129. Italian diplomacy

1. On Antonio Salandra, see Notebook i, §43, n. 20.

2. See Pietro Silva's review of Alessandro De Bosdari怎 book on the Balkan wars and World War I in LItalia Che Scrive ii, no. 4 (April 1928): 94.

On Alessandro De Bosdari, see Notebook 2, §33, n. 1.

3. See Notebook 3/ §2iz and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§130. Italian culture

I. Bilychnis, a monthly review of religious studies sponsored by the Baptist seminary in Rome, was published between 1912 and 1930. It published works by individuals of diverse religious orientations, but its principal purpose was to foster a harmonious relationship between religion and science.

§131. Italian diplomacy

1. Giuseppe A. Andriulli/ review of Antonio Salandra, La neutralità italiana (1914): Ricordi e pensieri (Milan: Mondadori, 1928), ^Italia Che Scrive 11, no. 5 (May 1928): 124. Salandra's book of memoirs deals with his government^ decision to keep Italy neutral at the outbreak of World War

I. In a subsequent volume, ^intervento (1915)： Ricordi e pensieri (Milan: Mondadori, 1930), Salandra covers the period in which Italy signed the Pact of London, committing itself to intervene in the war on the side of the Triple Entente. Gramsci received a copy of each of these volumes while he was in prison. On Antonio Salandra； see Notebook 1, §43, n. 20.

2. Antonio Paterno Castello, marquis di San Giuliano (1852-1914), had been Italy's foreign minister for more than four years when. World War I broke out. An advocate of colonial expansion, he vigorously promoted the occupation of Libya in 1911. He was also a staunch protector of Italian interests in Dalmatia, Croatia, and Albania, which created many serious tensions between Italy and Austria, in spite of the fact that they were both members of the Triple Alliance. San Giuliano maintained that, the Triple Alliance notwithstanding, Italy was not obliged to join the German and Austrian side in the Great War. He believed that it was to Italy's advantage to negotiate with the conflicting powers from a position of neutrality, extracting from each side the best possible territorial concessions.

San Giuliano died within a few months of the outbreak of the war, and in November 1914 Prime Minister Salandra put Sidney Sonnino in charge of foreign affairs. Sonnino, who had initially leaned toward preserving Italy's ties with the alliance, quickly embraced the neutralist policy of his predecessor and before long was engaged in serious negotiations with the Triple Entente. With the Pact of London, signed in April 1915, Italy promised to declare war against the alliance within one month； in return, the entente agreed that at the end of the conflict Italy would get control over the Austrian Alpine regions of South Tyrol and Trentino, a large portion of Dalmatia, the Dodecanese islands, as well as other territories. (See also the note on Giorgio Sidney Sonnino in Notebook i, §114/ n. 1.)

3. In its pact with the entente, Italy undertook to declare war against all the members of the alliance； in May 1915/ however, Italy declared war only against Austria, waiting until the end of August 1916 to declare war formally on Germany. Prince Sisto di Borbone-Parma (1886-1934) served as the einissary of the Austrian emperor in several important diplomatic missions that entailed negotiations with the warring powers.

§132. Loiianism. Paolo Orano

l This note is based on Ernesto Buonaiuti's brief review of the ^definitive edition" of Paolo Orano's book on early Christianity, Cristo e Quirino (Foligno: Campiteli] 1928), in LItalia Che Scrive it, no. 6 (June 1928): 157-

Buonaiuti opens his review by quoting a brief passage from the preface to Orano's book: the Mouvement Socialiste of April 1908/ Georges Sorel devoted an essay to [the first edition of] Cristo e Quiiino, postulating that 社 is difficult to give an account of a book of this nature and that in summarizing it one runs the risk of spoiling it." Buonaiuti immediately follows this with a passage from a letter that Sorel wrote to Benedetto Croce on December 29, 1907:     regu un. volume de P. Orano: Cristo e

Quirino, que vous avez sans doute lu et qui ne me semble pas avoir beaucoup avancé la question des origines chrétiennes； je suis fort embarassé pour en faire le compte rendu que Pauteur me demande de faire dans le Mouvement Socialiste/' SoreFs letter to Croce had been published in La Critica 26, no. 2 (March 20, 1928): 105.

§133. Carlo Flumiani, Igruppi sociali: Fondamenti di scienza politica

1. Gramsci probably obtained the bibliographical data on Carlo Flumiani/s book from the brief review of it in LItalia Che Scrive 11, no. 8 (August 1928): 211.

§134. Piero Pieri, Il Regno di Napoli dal luglio 1799 al marzo 1806

i. The information on Piero Pieri's history of the Kingdom of Naples between 1799 and 1806 is drawn from a short review of it by Pietro Silva in LItalia Che Scrive iiz no. 8 (August 1928): 210. Gramsci takes note öf Pieri's book elsewhere as well； see Notebook i? §83, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

1. Alfredo Zazo's work on public and private education in Naples from the middle of the eighteenth to the middle of the nineteenth century, Listruzione pubblica e privata nel Neapolitano: 1767-1860 (Città di Castello: Il Solco, 1927) is briefly reviewed on p. 213 of LItalia Che Scrive a, no, 8 (August 1928).

§135. History and antihistory

i. Adriano Tilgher's book of essays on ethics and the philosophy of law is reviewed briefly by Mario Missiroli in L'Italia Che Scrive 12, no. 1 (January 1929): 16. On Tilgher^ other book. Storia e antistoria (History and antihistory)—a copy of which Gramsci had while in prison at Turi— see Notebook i, §28/ and n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

The rest of this note consists of Gramsci's transcription of the entire text of Missirolizs review of Tilgher's Saggi di etica e di filosofia del diritto.

§136. Father Bresciani7s progeny

i. The information recorded in this note on. Giovanni Casatfs 击ctio・ nary of living Italian Catholic writers. Scrittori cattolici italiani viventi： Dizionario bio-bibliografico ed indice analitico delle opere (Milan: Romolo Ghirlanda, 1928), is derived from a short review in LItalia Che Scrive 12/ no. 1 (January 1929): 17-18. Another note by Gramsci contains more detailed information on this dictionary and its author drawn from an article in La Civiltà Cattolica) see Notebook 5, §63.

On Filippo Meda, who contributed a preface to Casati怎 dictionary, see Notebook i, §107, and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§137. The formation of the Italian intellectual class

i. The populists, called Narodniks—i.e.z the members and sympathizers of the nineteenth-century revolutionary movement in Russia known as Zemlya i Volya (Land and freedom)—were, for the most part, aristocrats and intellectuals who believed that by promoting the traditional communal values of the Russian peasantry and politically educating the masses they could inspire a popular revolt, abolish czarist autocracy, and reconstruct Russian society along socialist lines. In 1879 the movement split into two parties: the Narodnaya Volya (People's will) and the Chorny Peredel (Black repartition). The former party advocated political struggle by all available means, including terrorism/ and was responsible for the assassination of Alexander IIy in 1881, after which it fell apart and all but vanished. Many members of the Chorny Peredel movement, which continued its work among the peasantry, became Marxist revolutionaries advocating mass agitation and devoting more attention to the urban proletariat. Lenin writes as follows about the Russian populist revolutionary movement, in What Is To Be Done^ (New York: International Publishers, 1969):

The history of the revolutionary movement is so little known among us that the name ^Narodnaya Volya^ is used to denote any idea of a militant centralised organisation which declares determined war against tsarism. But the magnificent organisation that the revolutionaries had in the seventies, and that should serve us as a model, was not established by the Narodnaya Volya, but by the Zemlya i Volya, which split up into the Chorny Peredel and the

Narodnaya Volya. Consequently, to regard a militant revolutionary organisation as something specifically Narodnaya Volya in character is absurd both historically and logically； for no revolutionary trend, if it seriously thinks of struggle, can dispense with such an organisation. The mistake the Narodnaya committed was not in striving to enlist all the discontented in the organisation and to direct this organisation to resolute struggle against the autocracy； on the contrary, that was its great historical merit. The mistake was in relying on a theory which in substance was not a revolutionary theory at all, and the Narodnaya Volya members either did not know how, or were unable, to link their movement inseparably with the class struggle in the developing capitalist society. Only a gross failure to understand Marxism ... could prompt the opinion that the rise of a mass, spontaneous working-class movement relieves us of the duty of creating as good an organisation of revolutionaries as the Zemlya i Volya had, or, indeed, an incomparably better one. On the contrary, this movement imposes the duty upon us； for the spontaneous struggle of the proletariat will not become its genuine "class struggle77 until this struggle is led by a strong organisation of revolutionaries. (pp. 131-32)

§138. Father Bresciani's progeny. Alfredo Panzini

1. See Notebook i, §13, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

2. See, especially, Notebook 3, §38.

3. As in Notebook 1, §13, Gramsci is quoting from Fernando Palazzi« review of Alfredo Fanzini^ I giorni del sole e del grano (Milan: Mondadori,

1928) , in LItalia Che Scrive 12/ no. 6 (June 1929): 180-81.

§139. Past and present

i. The quotation from Guicciardini's Ricordi and the bibliographic citation are taken from a brief review in Eltalia Che Scrive 12, no. 6 (June

1929) : 183-84. Por an English translation of Guicciardini's Ricordi, see Francesco Guicciardini, Maxims and Reflections, trans. Mario Domandi (New York: Harper and Row, 1965b where the aphorism (Series C, 176) quoted by Gramsci is onp. 85.

On Arturo Labriola, see Notebook i, §25, n. 15.

§140. Catholicism and secularism. Religion and science

i. The bibliographical information on Edmondo Clone's II dramma religioso dello spirito moderno e la Rinascenza (The religious drama of the modern spirit and the Renaissance) and the quotation are taken from Adriano Tilgher's short review of Clone's work in LItalia Che Scrive 12f no. 6 (June 1929(: 190.

Edmondo Cione (1908-65) was strongly influenced by Croce, with whom he was personally acquainted at an early age. In II dramma religioso dello spirito moderno e la Rinascenza, his first book, the Crocean influence is evident in, among other things, its criticism of Gentile. Cione went on to write important works on De Sanctis, the Renaissance and the Reformation, and nineteenth-century Neapolitan culture. In the early 1940s he broke with Croce, and, while claiming not to be quite a Fascist himself, he became a very vocal opponent of antifascists and established friendly relations with Mussolini during the period of the Republic of Salò.

2. See, for example. Notebook 3, §40.

§141. The international function of Italian intellectuals

1, Dino Provenzal, in the "Libri da fare” (Books to write) column of LItalia Che Scrive 12, no. 10 (October 1929): 288.

Dino Provenzal (1877-1972) wrote numerous works for younger readers, as well as handbooks and other books for students. He was also an essayist and humorist.

On Cesare Balbo, see Notebook i, §no, n. 1.

Benedetto Croce's history of the baroque period in Italy, Storia della età barocca in Italia (Bari: Laterza, 1929), was among the books Gramsci had while in prison at Turi.

2. Giovanni Boterò (1544-1617) was educated by the Jesuits and joined their order in 1572 but left it seven years later. He went on to become an. important Counter-Reformation intellectual, writing influential treatises on political and economic theory. His best-known books are Della ragion di Stato (工589), in which he expounds a concept of the state in. which the church has absolute primacy, and La causa della grandezza e magnificenza delle città (1588), in which he correlates the power of the state and the strength of its economy with the population growth.

On Tommaso Campanella, see Notebook iz §6勾 n. 1.

§142. The limits of state activity

i. Alfredo Poggiò review of Carlo Alberto Biggini怎 book on the fundamental principles that limit the actions of the state, Il fondamento dei limiti all'attività dello Stato (Città del Castello: Casa Editrice II Solco, 1929), appeared in LItalia Che Scrive 12, no io (October 1929): 295.

Carlo Alberto Biggini (1902-45), who studied law and political science, joined the Fascist Party in 1928. He was a professor of law at the University of Siena and later rector of the University of Pisa, His writings betray the strong influence of Giovanni Gentile's philosophy and theories on the state. Biggini entered parliament in 1934 and served on several parliamentary commissions； he also held important posts within the Fascist Party. In February 1943 he became a member of the Fascist Grand Council as well as Mussolini's minister of education. Later that same year he followed Mussolini to the Republic of Salò, where he resumed his ministerial duties.

2. Within the parentheses Gramsci is summarizing Poggiò account of Biggini's main ideas.

3. Gioele Solari's review of Widar Cesarini Sforza, “Jus” et "directum": Note sulForigine storica dell'idea di diritto (fus and directum: Notes on the historical origin of the idea of law), in Leonardo 1, no. 8 (August 1930): 504-5.

§143-顷4

1. On June 7, 1914, an antimilitarist public meeting was being held at Ancona, in defiance of a government ban on. such demonstrations, when the police fired into the crowd, killing three people and wounding many more. The incident provoked a series of strikes, protest marches, and clashes with the police in numerous cities. The disturbances, which lasted an entire week一it came to be known as the settimana rossa (red week)—and resulted in the deaths of sixteen civilians (and hundreds of injuries), were especially intense and violent in Romagna and Marche. Prominent among the rebellious groups were the anarchists, with Errico Malatesta at their head； the socialist faction led by Mussolini； and the republicans, whose leader at the time was Pietro Neimi.

2. Giovanni Papini, /ZI fatti di giugno” (The events of June), Lacerba 2, no, 12 (June 15, 1914): 177-84. Gramsci refers to this essay again in Notebook 9, §42.

On Giovanni Papini, see Notebook i/ §8, n. 1.

3. See Gaetano Salvemini (who used the nom de plume Rerum Scriptor), "Una rivoluzione senza programma^ (A revolution without a program), LUnità 3, no. 25 (June 19, 1914): 531. Gramsci makes some observations about this article and the events of June 1914 in Notebook 8/ §119.

On Gaetano Salvemini, see Notebook i, §25, n. 19.

§145. Italian and French culture and the academies

i. The Accademia della Crusca was founded in 1582 by a small group of Florentine literati. Arrogating to itself the role of arbiter of literature, the Crusca promoted the Tuscan language as employed by Petrarch, Boccaccio, and other fourteenth-century authors as the norm for all good writing. Through its Vocabolario (1612) and other works, the Crusca sought unilaterally to prescribe or legislate usage. The Vocabolario, of which a new edition was started in 1863 (but was still unfinished when Gramsci was writing this note), is more like a thesaurus than a dictionary of the kind produced by the Académie Frangaise. The rigid and conservative approach to language that characterized much of the work produced by the Crusca led Francesco De Sanctis to describe it as "the Council of Trent of the Italian language/7

§146. Kipling

I. These words are attributed to Rudyard Kipling by Aldo Sorani in his article "La morale di Kipling” (Kipling's moral views)； Il Marzocco 34, no. 44 (November 3, 1929). According to Sorani, these words come from a speech Kipling delivered in September 1929 at the formal opening of the new building of the Junior King's School at Milner Court.

§147. Italian intellectuals. Calducci

1. Foscarina Trabaudi Foscarini De Ferrari's name and thematic indexes of Carducci^ complete works, Il pensiero del Carducci, 2 vols. (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1929), are discussed in the article by Guido Mazzoni, 〃H pensiero del Carducci attraverso gli indici delle sue opere,z (Carducci^ thought through the indexes of his works), Il Marzocco 34, no. 44 (November 3, 1929).

On Giosuè Carducci, see Notebook i, §44, n. 17； and on Guido Mazzoni, see Notebook 2, §31, n. 2.

§148. The negative popular-national character of Italian literature

t. Adolfo Faggi, "Fede e dramma” (Faith and drama), Il Marzocco 33, no. 46 (November uz 1928).

2. Gramsci is quoting Adolfo Faggi's rendition (in "Fede e dramma") of some views expressed by Tolstoy in his essay ^Shakespeare and Drama." The comparison between Tolstoy and Manzoni is drawn by Faggi； the Russian novelist makes no mention oil promessi sposi [The Betrothed) or its author in his essay. For an English translation of Tolstoy's essay on Shakespeare, see Leo Tolstoy, Tblstoy on Shakespeare: A Critical Essay on Shakespeare trans. V. Tchertkoff and I. F. Mayo (London: Funk and Wagnails, 1906).

§149. Popular literature. Verne and the literature of marvelous adventures

i. Gramsci amplifies his comparison of Jules Verne with H. G. Wells in Notebook 5, §84.

Gramsci did not have a very high opinion of H. G. Wells's work and had not read much of it. See the undated letter to his son Delio in Letters from Prison, ed. F. Rosengarten, trans. R. Rosenthal (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), 2:378； and Lettere dal carcere, ed. S. Caprioglio and E. Fubini (Turin: Einaudi, 1965), p. 885.

2. Adolfo Faggi, ^Impressioni di Giulio Verne/7 II Marzocco 33, no. 8 (February 19, 1928).

The expansionist ambitions of Britain and France in Africa generated a series of disputes that culminated in the Egyptian Sudan on September 18/ 1898, in what came to be known as the Fashoda Incident. The tense confrontation between the French expeditionary force led by Jean-Baptiste Marchand and the British force commanded by Herbert Kitchener threatened to explode into a military conflict between the two colonial powers, but it was gradually defused.

Gramsci mentions Verne's anti-British sentiments in an undated letter he wrote to his son Giuliano in 1936 (see Letters from Prison, 2：374-75)：

At the movies you saw the [film based on Jules Verne's story] "Sons of Captain Grant/7 but you don't tell me whether you liked the film and why. I read the book when I was a boy like you, and I remember I liked it a lot? so I reread it many times, with the atlas before mq and sought out other books that would explain the customs of the country crossed by the 34th parallel south (I think). Dr. Paganel with his absent-mindedness made me laugh so loud when I was alone that they would come to see whether I had gone crazy. The only thing I didn't like was Veined anti-English chauvinism (which perhaps does not appear in the film that you have seen) and the caricature of English geography books. When I was a boy, the English appealed to me a lot because they were great sailors and had many islands where I would have liked to live.

§150. Popular literature. Emilio De Marchi

i. Emilio De Marchi (1851-1901), a Milanese teacher of literature, a regular contributor to periodicals and newspapers such as La Vita Nuova, Italia, and Corriere della Sera, and author of children's books, espoused conservative politics and conventional values. Many of his writings are moralistic and didactic； they sentimentally extol religion. and the traditional family structure as repositories of the good. De Marchi also achieved some success as novelist, especially with Demetrio Pianelli (1890), Arabella (1892), and Giacomo 1'idealista (1897), all three stories of failed love with tragic consequences that (in contrast to many of De Marchiò other writings) are not allayed by the consolations of religion. Demetrio Pianelh, which portrays the milieu of late-ninteenth-century Milan in rich detail, was serialized in Italia in i888? before its pubEcation as a book.

§151. Negative popular-national character of Italian literature

1. See Notebook 3, §148.

2. Adolfo Faggi, "Tolstoi e Shakespeare,〃 Il Marzocco 33, no. 37 (September 9, 1928). In this article, Faggi discusses Tolstoy's essay on z/Shakespeare and Drama/7 as he does in his other article on Manzoni and Tolstoy, "Fede e dramma^ (Faith and drama), which Gramsci discusses in Notebook 3, §148. For an English translation of the book cited in the parenthesis, Shakespeare, eine kritische Studie (Hanover, 1906), see Leo Tolstoy, Tosltoy on Shakespeare: A Critical Essay on Shakespeare, trans. V. Tchertkoff and I. E Mayo, followed by "Shakespeare's Attitude to the Working Class," by Ernest Crosby, and a letter by G. Bernard Shaw (London: Funk and Wagnalls7 1906).

3. Up to this point, Gramsci is paraphrasing Adolfo Faggi's article, "Tolstoi e Shakespeare77—except for the parenthetical comment on Manzoni.

§152. “Spectator” = Mario Missiroli

i. Mario Missiroli's publication of unpublished letters by Sorel (to himself) and the appearance of his articles in Nuova Antologia under the pseudonym Spectator and in Ultalia Letteraria under his own name are also brought up in Notebook 4/ §44.

On Mario Missiroli, see Notebook iz §43/ n. 12,

This note is canceled by Gramsci in the manuscript, but unlike most other canceled notes, it is not incorporated in any of the later notebooks.

§153. Popular literature. Notes on the detective novel

1. Eugene Sue怎 Le juif errant (serialized in 1844-45) comprises a series of plots and schemes by the Jesuit agent Rodin, whose mission is to prevent the fortune of a persecuted Protestant from falling into the hands of his legitimate heirs. For an English translation, see The Wandering few (New York: Modern Library, 1940),

On Eugene Sue's portrayal of Rodolphe in Les mystères de Paris? see, inter alia, Notebook 3/ §52 and §53.

2. For a modern English translation of Friedrich Schiller's Die Räuber (1781), a tragedy in five acts, see The Robbers, trans. F. J. Lamport (New York: Penguin, 1979). The earliest English translations of this play date back to 1792 and 1799.

3. See Notebook 3, §78.

4. Javert is the police officer in Victor Hugc/s Les miserables (1862).

5. See Notebook 3/ §78.

6. In prison Gramsci had two books by the English Catholic belletrist and novelist G. K. Chesterton (1874-1936): a French translation of The New Jerusalem (1920) (see Notebook i, §24, n. 13), and an Italian translation of The Wisdom of Father Brown (1914； see Notebook 2, ^Description of the Manuscript/7 1:529). Gramsci's comments in Notebook 7, §38, suggest that he had also read an Italian translation of The Innocence of Father Brown (1911).

For additional observations on the detective novel, see Notebook 6, §兄 §17, and §28.

§154. The negative national-popular aspect of Italian literature

1. Alfredo Gargiulo, /zBruno Cicognani/' Ultalia Letteraria 2/ no. 34 (August 24,1930). This was the nineteenth in a series of articles by Gargiulo on twentieth-century Italian literature, all of which were published in the weekly LItalia Letteraria under the general title "900-1930.〃 The first article of the series appeared in LItalia Letteraria 2, no. 30 (January 19, 1930).

In his first work, Lo crittogama (1908), Bruno Cicognani (1879-1971 )? a Florentine writer of short stories, novels, and memoirs, adopted the style of D'Annunzio, but he quickly abandoned it. His subsequent work belongs to the realistic tradition； much of it is set in Florence and portrays the personal and psychological travails of ordinary characters.

Alfredo Gargiulo (1876-1949) published his earliest essays in Croce's journal La Critica. He eventually distanced himself from Croce, whose concept of art as pure intuition he was unwilling to endorse, and emerged as one of the prominent critics of the circle associated with the literary periodical La Ronda. In addition to important critical works on D'Annunzio and Ungaretti, he translated Kant怎 Critique of Judgment and collected his series of articles in LItalia Letteraria, together with some other essays that had appeared elsewhere, and published them in a single volume. Letteratura italiana del Novecento (Florence: Le Monnier, 1958), as a survey of twentieth-century Italian literature.

2. See Notebook 4/ §5.

§155，The new architecture

i. See Adriano Tilgher, /yPerché Partista scrive o dipinge o scolpisce, ecc.?,/ (Why does the artist write, paint, sculpt, etc.?), LItalia Che Scrive il, no. 2 (February 1929): 31-32. Gramsci comments on this article elsewhere； see Notebook %, §103/ and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

On Adriano Tilgher, see Notebook i, §28/ n. 2.

§156. Lorìanism. Trombetti and the monogenesis of language

1. See Notebook 3/ §86.

2. Vittore Pisani, "Divagazioni etnische” (Etruscan digressions), in the 〃Notize e commenti” (News and comments) section of Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1367, (March if 1929): 123-27.

3. This example [mysterion] is Gramsci's, whereas the two examples that follow it, as well as the citation of Enno Littmann's work, are derived from Pisani's "Divagazioni etnische."

4. Gramsci makes the same point in a November 17, 1:930, letter to Tatiana Schucht: "Manzoni himself, in revising I promessi sposi [The Betrothed] and in his studies on the Italian language, in reality took into account only one aspect of language, the vocabulary, but not syntax, which, after all, is the essential part of any language—so much so that English is a Germanic language although more than 60 percent of its words are Latin or NeoLatin, whereas Romanian is a Neo-Latin language although more than 60 percent of its words are Slavic/7

5. Gramsci's source of information on Voltaire怎 epigrams against Gilles Ménage has not been traced.

Gilles Ménage (1613-92), the French wit and critic of the Académie Fran^aise, produced several studies on etymology and grammar.

§158. The historical conjuncture of 1848-49

I. Gramsci is referring to the complicated and shifting political alliances that were a prominent feature of Piedmontese parliamentary and cabinet politics starting with the formation of the first constitutional government installed by King Carlo Alberto on May i6f 1848, and led by Cesare Balbo. These alliances involved individuals and groups from the entire political spectrum, and they "fragmented" the democratic forces, as Gramsci puts it, in the sense that they not only prevented certain progressive political formations, such as the Center-Left and the Left, from remaining compact oppositional blocs but actually made them participate in the maneuvers that enabled the conservative and moderate bourgeois forces to retain their hold on power. Within one year, Piedmont had eight different governments, some of them moderate, such as Balbo's, some rather progressive, such as Gabrio Casatfs (which included Urbano Rattazzi in the cabinet) and especially Vincenzo Gioberti?s, and others quite authoritarian, such as Gabriele de Launay's. This rapid succession of governments also reflects, of course, the turbulent events of the time, which included, among other incidents, the military defeats (at Custoza in July 1948 and Novara in March 1949( suffered at the hands of the Austrians and the abdication of Carlo Alberto in favor of his son Vittorio Emanuele II. Some degree of continuity and stability was achieved by Massimo D'Azeglio, who became prime minister in May 1949 and remained in office for three full years.

D?Azeglio, too, had to surmount some major crises. The first occurred just a few months after he took office: Unable to persuade parliament to ratify the peace treaty with Austria that had been agreed on in August 1849 in the aftermath of the Piedmontese defeat at Novara, D'Azeglio urged Vittorio Emanuele II to dissolve parliament. On November 20,工849, the king complied, dissolving parliament (which had been elected the previous July) and issuing a proclamation from his chateau at Moncalieri stating that he wanted save the nation from the tyranny of the political parties.By refusing to approve the peace treaty, the deputies, according to the king, were acting in manner "hostile to the crown." The constitutionality of the king's intervention was, at the very least, questionable, but when new elections were held the following month, DzAzeglio emerged victorious.

A parliamentary deadlock in 1852 compelled DzAzeglio to resign, and Vittorio Emanuele entrusted Cavour (who had served in D'Azeglio's cabinet as minister of agriculture) with. the task of forming a new government. Earlier that year Cavour had already positioned himself to assume the premiership by distancing himself from the right-wing deputies and forming an alliance (labeled nconnubio,f or z/mamage,/ by his conservative adversaries) with the democratic Center-Left bloc led by Urbano Rattazzi. Cavour thus became prime minister at the head of a centrist coalition.

On Cesare Balbo, see Notebook i, §110, n. 1； on Massimo D，Azeglio, see Notebook i, §121, n. 1； on Vincenzo Gioberti, see Notebook i? §46, n. I； and on Urbano Rattazzi, see Notebook 2, §29, n. 3.

§159. Risorgimento

i. The same point is reiterated in different terms in Notebook 5, §136.

§160. The economic structure of Italy

I. Giuseppe Paratore, 〃La economia, la finanza, il denaro d'Italia alla fine del [928〃 (The Italian economy, finance, and currency at the end of 1928), Nuova Antologia 64, no.工367, (March iz 1929): 74-87. On this same article and its author, see also Notebook 2, §122, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§16 工.Leo XIII

i. Piero Misciatelli, "Un libro di ricordi e di preghiere del papa Leone XIIP7 (A book of memoirs and prayers by Pope Leo XIH), Nuova Antologia 64, no, 1367 (March i, 1929): 3-16.

On Leo XIIIZ see Notebook i, §77, n. 2.

§162. The historical conjuncture of 1848-49

1. Carlo Pagani, "Dopo Custoza e Volta nel 1848 (con documenti inediti)” (After Custoza and Volta in 1848 [with previously unpublished documents]), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1367 (March rf 1929): 102-9.

The Austrians inflicted a heavy defeat on the Piedmontese army at Custoza on July 25, 1848, and again two days later, at Volta.

2. Gabrio Casati became prime minister on July 27/1848, a position he held for just one month. In forming his cabinet he had the support of Vicenzo Gioberti (on whom see Notebook iz §46, n. i)? who was president of the Chamber of Deputies.

3. Giuseppe Massari (1821-84) was very active in the political battles for Italian independence and unification. He became acquainted with Gioberti in Paris and in 1849 worked closely with him in Turin. Later, Cavour entrusted him with several diplomatic missions.

4. Carlo Pagani, Uomini e cose in Milano dal marzo all'agosto del 1848 (Men and events in Milan from March to August 1848) (Milan: Cogliati, 1906).

The bibliographical data recorded in this note are drawn from Carlo Pagani^ article, "Dopo Custoza e Volta nel 1848/'

§163. Alessandro Luzio's "history” of the Risorgimento

1. “Processo politico e condanna delFabbate Gioberti nell'anno 1833. IÜ” (The political trial and conviction of Abbé Gioberti in 1833. Part III), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (August 4,1928): 206-19. The first two parts of this unsigned article appeared, bearing the same title, in La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (April 21, 1928): ili-li； and 79/ no. 3 (July 7/ 1928): 19-29.

2. See Alessandro Luzio, Giuseppe Mazzini carbonaro (Turin: Bocca, 1920).

For other remarks by Gramsci on Luzio's tendentiousness as a histo-rianz see Notebook i, §44 and §48； Notebook 3, §125； and Notebook 8/ §23. On Alessandro Luzio, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 45.

3. The events to which Gramsci (and the Civiltà Cattolica article he cites) is referring took place in 1833 and not, as he erroneously writesz in 1831. Gioberti was arrested in Turin in 1833 because of his alleged collaboration with the Mazzinians, whose activities were deemed subversive and whose publications had been banned by a royal edict. Actually, Gioberti never stood trial. Largely because he was a priest and chaplain of Carlo Alberto's court, he was allowed to go into exile after being held under arrest for several months* In fact, Luzio discusses Giobertiys attitude during the period he was under arrest in his book Giuseppe Mazzini carbonaro—a book known to Gramsci only indirectly through the discussion of it in part 3 of the Civiltà Cattolica article "Processo politico e condanna delPAbbate Gioberti nelFanno 1833cited above.

On Vincenzo Gioberti, see Notebook i, §46/ n. 1.

4. See part 2 of the unsigned article "Processo politico e condanna delPAbbate Gioberti nelPanno 1833," especially pp. 22-25.

§164. Notes on the religious movement. The editorial staff of La Civiltà Cattolica

1. On the Codice sociale, see Notebook 1, §iz n. 2.

In Notebook 5/ §61, Gramsci lists some of Angelo Brucculeri's writings on labor issues published by La Civiltà Cattolica.

2. The Catholic weekly LAmico delle Famiglie (Family friend) was distributed gratis, and Gramsci may very well have had access to some issues of it in prison.

Enrico Rosa (1870-1938), a Jesuit priest—already mentioned in Notebook i, §24—joined the staff of La Civiltà Cattolica in 1905 and served as its editor-in-chief from 1915 until 1935. He gained a reputation as one of the staunchest defenders of the pope and of the official Catholic position against liberalism and modernism.

3. This index was published in 1926. When Gramsci wrote this note, the analytic index for 1926-30 was not yet available (it was published in 1931).

4. On the Confalonieri depositions and the controversy that surrounded their discovery, see Notebook 1, §44, nn. 42 and 43.

5. Gramsci discusses an article on the brothers Cipriano and Giona La Gala in Notebook 5, §43.

6. For more on Gioberti, see Notebook 3, §163, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

7. Nathan Söderblom (1866-1931), a promoter of peace and religious unity, won the Nobel Peace Prize in 1930. A scholar in the field of comparative religion, Söderblom is regarded as a pioneer of the ecumenical movement. His evangelical Catholicism," as Gramsci calls it, emphasized the catholicity—that is, the universal, all-embracing character—of Christian faith.

Gramsci derived this mformation on the pan-Christian, or ecumenical, movement and on Friedrich Heilert book from the first part of an unsigned article, sadhu Sundar Sing〃 (The holy man Sundar Sing), in La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (July 7/ 1928): 3-18.

7. The information on Upadhyaya (ie, master or teacher) Brahma-bandhav is drawn from part two of "Sadhu Sundar Singh/7 La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (July 21, 1928): 110-25. A //sannyasi,/ is a Hindu who renounces all material possessions, lives as a homeless mendicant, and reaches the highest stage of religious asceticism.

The Sadhu holy man) Sundar Singh, the target of severe criticism by Catholics, was a former Hindu who converted to Protestantism.

§165. Italo Toscani

1. Italo Toscani怎 biography of the Jesuit saint Aloysius Gonzaga, Vita di S. Luigi Gonzaga (Rome: Libreria Fratelli Ferrari, 1928), was favorably reviewed in La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (July 21, 1928): 152-53.

2. See Notebook 3/ §44, and n. 5 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. Apart from the bibliographical reference, the information in this note seems to be based on Gramsci's personal recollections and impressions. En 1916 Italo Toscani joined the Ninety-second Enfantry Regiment based in Turin. Gramsci probably met him in Turin； he certainly had heard of him, for Toscani had been the editor of LAvanguardia, the weekly published by the Italian Socialist Youth Federation. In September 1916 Toscani was arrested for attempting to disseminate antiwar leaflets prepared by the International Socialist Youth Committee in Berne, Others who were arrested at the same time included Federico Marinozzi (secretary of the Italian Socialist Youth Federation), Luigi Morara (a printer and publisher), and Giuseppe Sardelli (a trade unionist and member of the executive committee of the Chamber of Labor in Rome). They all stood trial before the Military Tribunal in Rome and were found guilty. Toscani was sentenced to six years in prison； the other received five-year terms. After ten months of imprisonment, however. Toscani and Sardelli were released and sent back to the army. Toscani wrote about the trial in a booklet, A bocca chiusa: Storia di un processo (Rome: Tipografia Morara, 1920), and in his biography of Morara, Socialista! Luigi Moiara nella storia del socialismo romano, 1892-1960 (Rome, 1961). From the latter work it is possible to understand what the episode of the false Calabresi" mentioned by Gramsci refers to. The "false Calabresi" was a police mformant who gained Italo Toscano's trust by posing as the brother of Toscani^ socialist comrade Carlo Calabresi (a leader of the Socialist Youth Federation). Z/On September 9 our man disappeared, taking with him the civilian clothes and all the correspondence belonging to Toscani, who was arrested the following day in a theatrical fashion at the barracks” [Socialista! p. 73). Gramsci owned three books of children's stories written

by Italo Toscani: La casa vuota e altre novelle (Rome: Primavera, 1923)； Fra terra e cielo: Storia di una goccia d'acqua (Rome: Primavera, 1923)； and La palla di fucile e altri racconti (Rome: Primavera, 1924). These books, however, were not among those that Gramsci had in prison.

§166. Past and present

i. See the unsigned article (in fact, written by Angelo Brucculeri) 〃La conferenza internazionale del lavoro(The international labor conference), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (August 4, 1928): 233-43, especially pp. 240-41 : 〃The bishops of Lombardy (1920) also point out that in periods of crisis, the capitalist should be the first to feel its effects, not the worker.

NOTEBOOK 4 (1930-32)
DESCRIPTION OF THE MANUSCRIPT

A ruled school notebook (15x20.5 cm) hardbound in thin cardboard covered with red cloth. A label on the front cover is blank, while Gramsci's prison number (7047) is inscribed with a blue pencil on the cover itself. This notebook is not signed by the prison warden. On a separate label glued after Gramsci's death to the upper righthand corner of the front cover, Tatiana Schucht wrote /zCompleto da pg. I a 160—Xin〃 (Complete from pp. 1-160一XIII). The Roman numerals indicate the number that Schucht assigned to the notebook according to the cataloging system she had devised when organizing Gramsci's papers soon after his death.

The notebook consists of eighty leaves with twenty-one lines on each side and unlined endpapers in front and back. The recto sides of the leaves are numbered (1-80) in green ink and stamped with the prison seal: "Casa penale speciale di Turi” (Special prison of Turi). The recto side of the endpaper inside the back cover is similarly numbered (81) and stamped but is otherwise blank. Gramsci's writing fills all the lined pages in the notebook, except for all but the first two lines of p. yv, the last two lines of p. iovz and the last four lines of p. 8ov. This notebook, then, contains a total of 160 manuscript pages.

In all, the notebook comprises ninety-seven notes. Gramsci crossed out seventy-five of these notes, but they remain perfectly legible (following V. Gerratana's denomination, these entries are called A texts), and he incorporated all but three of them in later notebooks. The three exceptions are §4 (^Machiavellianism and Marxism"), §57 ("Vincenzo Cuoco and passive revolution^)/ and §58 ("Popular literature"). The other twenty-two notes are B texts: they were neither canceled nor used again in other notebooks.

The notebook is made up of four segments, or clusters, of notes: Pages ir through yv of the manuscript contain a group of notes (an introductory note followed by ten notes, each preceded by the symbol §) collected under the general heading "Canto 10 of the Inferno^ which Gramsci wrote and underlined at the center of the first line of the opening page of the notebook. This group of notes corresponds to §78 through §88 of the present edition. Pages 8r through lov contain seven notes on diverse topics, each marked with the customary symbol §； these notes, which are not given a general title by Gramsci, correspond to §89 through §95 of the present edition. Pages nr through 40V comprise twenty-nine miscellaneous notes, all of which are preceded by the symbol §, and several of which seem to be thematically related (albeit rather loosely in some cases) to the first, unusually long note of the cluster, entitled “The intellectuals77 (a title that Gramsci inscribed in larger letters than usual)； this cluster of notes corresponds to §49 through §77 of the present edition. Pages 4ir through 8ov hold forty-eight notes (the first of which is not preceded by the symbol § and seems to have the character of a preface) collected under the general title "Notes on Philosophy. Materialism and Idealism. First Series建 which Gramsci inscribed and underlined twice (except for 〃First Series/7 which is only underlined once) on the top line of p. 4ir； this segment corresponds to §1 through §48 of the present edition.

The sequence in which the notes appear in the manuscript of Notebook 4 obviously does not correspond to the chronological order of their composition. On p. 171 of the manuscript (see §49 in this volume) Gramsci states: /ZI am writing in November 193o/7 whereas on p. 6ir (§31) he writes: z/but to this day—September 1930.〃 Also； on p. i4rz Gramsci cites a note that he had already written on p. 671 of his manuscript (see §49 and §38, respectively, in the present volume). From this internal evidence one can draw certain incontrovertible conclusions: for example, that the note on the "Relations between structure and superstructures'7 (§38), although it appears on p. 6yr in the segment entitled "Notes on Philosophy. Materialism and Idealism77 (which starts exactly in the middle of the notebook—i.ev p. 411—and continues to its very last page), was written prior to the note on "The intellectuals(§49), which runs from the first line of p. nr to the top of p. 191 in the manuscript. Still, it remains difficult to determine the exact chronology of the composition of each part of the notebook. One must always bear in mind that Gramsci often wrote in different sections of a particular notebook as well as in separate notebooks during the same stretch of time and that he did not wait until he ran out of pages in one notebook before starting to make entries in a new one. In any case, this edition replicates the sequential order and enumeration of Gramsci's notes established by Valentino Gerratana.

There can be little doubt that the moment Gramsci put this notebook into use he decided to devote the second half of its pages to his "Notes on Philosophy.It is also extremely likely that at the same time he planned to set aside a number of pages at the beginning of the notebook (probably the first five leaves, or ten pages, initially) for his notes on canto 10 of Dante's Inferno. Gerratana believes, however, that the first entry made in the notebook was the prefatory note that opens the sequence of "Notes on Philo-sophy〃 on p. 4工e It is all but certain that Gramsci started writing the /zNotes on Philosophy" sometime in the first half of May 1930, at the latest. In fact, in §6 (i.e., pp. 471—49V of the manuscript of Notebook 4) he quotes verbatim and at length passages from a book一Roberto Ardigò^s Scritti vari—that is included among the "Books Delivered to Tatiana at Turi on 20 May 1930〃 listed in Notebook 1 (see Notebook x, Description of the Manuscript, 1:371). Another fact relevant to the dating of these notes is the reference in §5 (on p. 46V of the manuscript of Notebook 4) to an article published in LItalia Letteraria of April 6, 1930. As has already been mentioned, Gramsci himself indicates that he was writing on p. 6ir (see §31) of this notebook in September 1930. Furthermore, a quotation from the Rassegna Settimanale della Stampa Estera of October 21, 1930, is transcribed on pp. 72V through 731 (see §38), and another one from Nuovi Studi of September-October 1930 is copied out on p. 76V (see §42) of the manuscript. Another thing can be ascertained: Gramsci was still entering notes in Notebook 3 when he had already filled at least thirteen pages of Notebook 4 with his "Notes on Philosophy.On p. 741 of the manuscript of Notebook 3 (see §154 of that notebook in this edition) he refers to what he had already written in a note that occupies pp. 44V through 47r of the manuscript of Notebook 4 (i.e., §5 in this edition).

It is more difficult to determine with any degree of exactitude when Gramsci entered the first note under the heading "Canto io of the Infernof, onp. ir of the manuscript of this notebook. A very loose time framework, however, can be reconstructed. The first two notes (i.e., §78 and §70 in this edition, and pp. ir-2v in the manuscript) were definitely composed before September 20, 1931, when Gramsci wrote a letter to Tatiana Schucht synthesizing and elaborating the ideas he had sketched in them. It is possible, however, to be more precise. The sentence that appears on the top two lines of p. 2V in the manuscript (see the conclusion of §79 in this edition) could not have been written prior to the publication of La Nuova Italia of June 20, 1930, which it cites. It is also safe to affirm that Gramsci completed §83 (pp. 3V-5V in the manuscript) before March 13/ 1931, since in that note he discusses and quotes several passages from Vincenzo Morello's booklet Dante, Farinata, Cavalcante, which in Notebook 2 is listed among the "Books Delivered to Carlo on 13 March 工931〃 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:529). The entry on pp. 6r-yr (see §86 in this edition), on the other hand, could not have been written any earlier than late March 1932. The contents of §86 are described by Gramsci as /zsome passages from a letter written by Prof. U. Cosmo (in the early months of 1932).〃 In fact, the letter was sent by Professor Umberto Cosmo on December 29, 1931, to Piero Sraffa who, on March iz 1932/ mailed it to Tatiana Schucht； she, in turn/ transcribed it for Gramsci in her letter of March 9. Gramsci acknowledged receipt of it in a March 21,工932, letter to Tatiana Schucht.

The cluster of notes that appears on pp. nr through 40V of the manuscript (i.ev §49-§77 in this volume) must have been started in November 1930； the evidence for this, as has already been pointed out, comes from Gramsci himself who, in the very first note of that cluster (see §49, /zThe intellectuals"), on p. iyr of the manuscript, remarks parenthetically, H1 am writing in November 工930.〃

The miscellaneous notes on pp. 8r through iov (i.e., §89-§95 in this volume) were the last to be entered in this notebook. The second note in this group refers to a book review published in La Civiltà Cattolica of August 20, 1932 (see p. 8r in the manuscript, or §90 in this volume). Gramsci's source for the last two notes (see §94-95, or p. iov in the manuscript) is La Civiltà Cattolica of September 3, 1932. In all likelihood, these notes were all written in the course of a couple of weeks, starting in late August or early September 1932.

In Lofficina gramsciana: Ipotesi sulla struttura dei "Quaderni del carcere" (Naples: Bibliopoli，工984), p. 141, Gianni Francioni offers the following chronology of the composition of Notebook 4:

§§    1-8： May 1930

9-27: between May and August 1930

28-30: between August and September 1930

3工：September 1930

32-37: between September and October 1930

38-42: October 1930

43-48: between October and November 1930

49-77: November 1930

78: May 1930

79: between May and June 1930

80: July 1930

81-83: between July 1930 and March 以 1931

84-85: between 1931 and 1932

86-88: 1932 (probably between. June and August)

89-95: between August and September 1932

NOTES TO THE TEXT

Notes on Philosophy, Materialism and Idealism. First Senes

§1. If one wants to study a conception of the world ...

i. Gramsci owned an Italian as well as a French translation. of Karl Marx's Critique of the Gotha Programme: Marginal Notes to the Programme of the German Workers7 Party (1875), but they were not among the books he had with him in prison. The editions owned by Gramsci were: Critica del programma di Gotha, in K. Marx, F. Engels, and E Lassalle, Opere, 2d ed.； ed. Ettore Ciccotti, vol. 2 (Milan: Società Editrice Avanti, 1922)； and Critique du piogramme de Gotha, with a preface and notes by Amédée Dunois (Paris: Librairie de PHumanité, 1922). For an English translation of the Critique of the Gotha Programme, see K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works, vol. 24 (New York: International Publishers, 1989).

In prison Gramsci had some volumes of French translations of Marx's letters. See K. Marx, Letties à Kugelmann, with a preface by V. I. Lenin and an introduction by E. Czobel (Paris: Editions Sociales Internationales, 1930)； and Correspondance K. Maix-Fr Engels, trans. J. Molitor, vols. 2 and 3 (Paris: A. Costes, 1931). Gramsci, however, did not have access to these books until after he had written this note； they are mentioned in the draft of the petition he sent to Mussolini in October 1931； see Notebook 1, Description of the Manuscript, 1:527-28.

2. Rodolfo Mondolfo, Il materialismo storico in Federico Engels (Genoa: Formiggini, 1912). Gramsci owned a copy of this book prior to his imprisonment/ but in this note he does not remember the title quite accurately: in his rendition of the title, Mondolfo's book is on 〃the historical materialism of Engels,^ whereas according to the original title it is about ^historical materialism in Engels.^ In two letters (March 25, 1929, and April ii, i932)he asked Tatiana Schucht to retrieve his copy of Mondolfo's book and send it to him in prison； the book never reached him一at least not while he was still at the Turi prison.

Rodolfo Mondolfo (1877-1976) was a professor of philosophy at the University of Turin from 1910 until 1914, when he moved to the University of Bologna and later to other universities. His earliest published works are on Condillac and on utilitarianism. Mondolfo was especially interested in social and political theory. In his writings on Marxism he emphasized what he termed the "activist character of the Marxist philosophy of praxis.” (It may very well be the case that Gramsci borrowed the phrase "philosophy of praxis" directly from Mondolfo.) He left Italy after the Fascists came to power and spent the rest of his life in Argentina. In his later years he turned his attention to ancient Greek philosophy.

3. See Georges SorePs letter to Benedetto Croce, March 16, 1912/ published in La Critica 26, no* 6 (November 20, 1928): 435: 〃Je viens de recevoir un enorme volume: Il materialismo storico in Federico Engels du professeur Rodolfo Mondolfo de Turin. Je suis effrayé en songeant qu'il faille taut de pages pour expliquer la pensée d'un homme qui pensait aussi peu qu'Engels.“

4. Engels's Anti-Dührmg (1878) was not among the books Gramsci had in prison, but in all probability he had read it in an Italian or French translation prior to his arrest.

§2. De Man's book

i. On Henri De Man's book, originally published in German with the title Zur Psychologie des Sozialismus (1926), and on its Italian, French, and English editions, see Notebook 1, §61, n. 13.

On Benedetto Croce's brief review of the French edition of De Man's book in La Critica 26, no. 6 (November 20,1928): 459-60, see Notebook 1, §132, n. 4.

2. Guido De Ruggiero, review of the Italian translation of H. De Man, Il superamento del marxismo (1929), La Critica 27, no. 6 (November 20, 工929): 459-63-

Guido De Ruggiero (1888-1948) was a liberal and an anti-Marxist whose philosophical and political views were strongly influenced by Croce. De Ruggiero published widely and exercised considerable influence on the cultural scene. He served briefly as minister of education in 1944.

3. “Il tramonto del marxismo(The decline of Marxism), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (October 5, 1929): 36-45, and 80 (November 16, 1929): 320-29； Giuseppe Santonastaso, review of De Man's II superamento del marxismo, Leonardo , no. 11-12 (November-December 1929): 304-5.

4. Giovanni Zibordi, Saggio sulla storia del movimento operaio in Italia: Camillo Prampolmi e i lavoratori reggiani, 2d ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1930). The reference to De Man's book is on p. 5 : 〃A wise and ardent illustration of this correction and integration. of the mechanistic conception of historical determinism with respect to the European socialist movement is found in the work of De Man: Il superamento del marxismo."

5. Gramsci is probably referring to the advertisement for De Man's book by its Italian publisher, Laterza, in La Critica 17, no. 3 (May 20,1929).

6. "Socialismo etico ed il nuovo fabianesimo in Germania” (Ethical socialism and the new Fabianism in Germany), I Problemi del Lavoro 3, no. 6 (June iz 1929): 5-7. A brief note preceding this article states: 〃The theses on ethical socialism and the new Fabianism in Germany are found in a book by Henri De Man, translated by Alessandro Schiavi, and just published in. two volumes entitled II supezamento del marxismo by Laterza of Bari in its Library of Modern Culture series./, In its next issue一 3, no. 7 (July 1, 1929)一I Problemi del Lavoro published the following correction: 〃In the last issue we published the Oppenheim theses stating that they are found in De Man's book； it should be pointed out, instead, that they are to be found only in the French edition, since the Italian translator has omitted them in order to preserve the pure scientific character of the book〃 (p. 23).

7. Alessandro Schiavi, preface to Henri De Man, Il superamento del marxismo, trans. A, Schiavi (Bari: Laterza, 1929), i:v-viii.

8. Umberto Barbaro, ,ZI1 superamento del marxismo,LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 19 (August 1929).

9. The parenthetical exclamation point is Gramsci^.

§3, Two aspects of Marxism

1. On Antonio Labriola, see Notebook i, §44/ n. 51.

2. Max Adler (1873-1937), one of the most prominent intellectuals of what is known as Austro-Marxism, based his efforts to formulate the foundations of Marxism as a sociological science on neo-Kantian and positivist philosophy.

3. The Catholic monsignor Francesco Olgiati (1886-1962) wrote extensively on the history of philosophy, including books on Thomas Aquinas and Descartes. He also wrote a book on Marx—Carlo Marx, 2d ed. (Milan: Società Editrice Vita e Pensiero, 1920)—in which his overall approach is heavily indebted to Croce. Olgiati's book on Marx is not preserved among Gramsci's books, but Gramsci's comments here and elsewhere in his notebooks strongly suggest that he read it―probably prior to his arrest and imprisonment.

4. Gramsci, as he himself states, is not so much quoting Missiroli as reconstructing his statement from memory. See Mario Missiroli's column "Opinioni” (Opinions) in the newspaper La Stampa, September io-ii, 1925, where he writes: cannot subscribe to the ideas that are currently circulating about Marx. It seems to me that his value as a scientific thinker is downplayed in order to exalt his revolutionary character. It is not in the least surprising that professors of political economy, like eunuchs standing in front of the sultan, should discover scientific errors in Marx and confute him triumphalistically in the duplicated lecture notes they provide to their students. It would be interesting, however, to know what the great industrialists and bankers secretly think about Marx's economic theories."

5. Gramsci is referring to Rosa Luxemburg's essay Stagnation and Progress in Marxism/7 on which Gramsci also comments elsewhere； see Notebook 3, §31, and the corresponding Notes to the Text (especially n. 7).

6. Sorel's letter was published in. an article signed "Spectator” (the pseudonym used by Mario Missiroli), "Sorel e Clemenceau/^ in L'Italia Letteraria iz no. 37 (December 15, 1929). Sorel wrote that Clemenceau

considers the philosophy of Marx, which constitutes the basic framework of contemporary socialism/ to be an obscure theory befitting the barbarians of Germany； this is how it has always appeared to quick and brilliant minds who are used to facile interpretations. Lightweight minds like his fail to understand what Renan understood so well, namely, that things of great historical value may appear alongside literary productions of obvious mediocrity—as mediocre, in fact, as the socialist literature that is offered to the people." On this article, see also Notebook 4, §44.

On Mario Missiroli, see Notebook i, §43, n. 12.

7. Benedetto Croce, Storia dell'età barocca in Italia (Bari: Laterza, 1929), pp. 11-12. The emphasis is Gramsci's. Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison.

8. The Spanish humanist Juan de Valdes (ca. 1490-1541), who corresponded with Erasmus and espoused many of his views, left his native Spain to avoid potential problems with the Inquisition following the publication of his book Dialogo de la doctrina cristiana (1529) and spent the rest of his life in Italy.

9. See Notebook iz §44/ n. 38.

10. Gramsci makes a similar comment on Maeterlinck in Notebook 3/ §48.

11. Guido de Ruggiero, Erasmo e la Riforma(Erasmus and the Reformation), La Nuova Italia if no. 1 (January 20, 1930): 12-17. De Ruggiero's article consists of some passages from his book on the Renaissance, the Reformation, and the Counter-Reformation, published the same year: Rinascimento, Riforma, Controriforma, 2 vols, (Bari: Laterza, 1930), specifically 1:197-204, 209-17.

§4. Machiavellianism and Marxism

1. Gramsci is quoting two lines from Ugo Foscolo's brief reflection on Machiavelli in the famous poem Dei sepolcn (On. tombs). The relevant passage consists of the following lines: "When. I saw the monument / where lies the body of that great man / who even as he tempers the scepter of the rulers / strips them of their laurels, and lets the people see/how it drips with tears and blood” (lines 154-58). According to Foscolo's inter-pretatioii7 Machiavelli pretended to write The Prince to instruct rulers on how political power is acquired and maintained, while his real intention was to reveal the mechanisms of power to the people.

2. See Benedetto Croce, Storia dell'età barocca in Italia (Bari: Laterza； 1929), p. 82.

Unlike most other canceled notes, this one is not incorporated into a later notebook； instead, the central idea articulated here is woven into §8 of this same notebook.

§5. Historical materialism and practical criteria or canons of historical and political interpretation

1. 〃(Cf. p. s。bis was inserted by Gramsci at a later time； between the lines directly above the title of this note. He is referring to p. 50V in the manuscript of this notebook； see §9 below.

2. Ernest Bernheim, Lehrbuch dei historischen Methode, 6th ed. (Leipzig: Dunker und Humblot, 1908). This edition of Bernheim's book is cited in Benedetto Croce, Conversazioni critiche: Serie prima (Bari: Laterza, 1918), of which Gramsci had a copy in prison.

Gramsci mentions Bernheim's book in. his letter to Giuseppe Berti, January 3。，1928: must correct a mistake contained in one of my letters from Ustica. I mentioned a book on the historical method, attributing it to a certain Bernstein, whereas the person is Bernheim: my memory really does not serve me well, because I used this book for two years as a. textbook； obviously Fve aged more than I supposed. The correct name suddenly floated up for no apparent logical reason. I wanted to tell you this for the sake of accuracy/7 What Gramsci used /zfor two years as a textbook77 was most probably a partial Italian translation (containing chapter i and section 5 of chapter 5 ) of the fourth edition of the German original of Bernheim's work； see La stoiiografia e la filosofia della storia (Milan: Sandron, 1907), to which Gramsci alludes in the C text version of this note (Notebook i6z §3). Another partial Italian translation (containing chapters 3 and 4) of Bernheim's book was also available； see Euristica e critica, ed. A. Cri veliucci (Pisa: E. Spoerri, 1897).

3. Gramsci is referring to Nikolai Bukharin's Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology； see Notebook 1, §153, n. 3.

4. On Francesco De Sanctis, see Notebook 1, §96, n. 3.

5. In his writings on aesthetics and in his literary criticism, Croce often made a distinction between what he called the structural^ and the "poetic" elements in literary works of art. In Croce's view, everything other than the "lyrical" moment or expression—for example, philosophical, historical, ideological, or theological concepts and frameworks—in a literary text is extraneous to "poetry" as such； it is "not poetry" and pertains to the /,structure,/ of the work.

6. On Giosuè Carducci； see Notebook i, §44, n. 17.

7. The cultural weekly La Voce was founded by Giuseppe Prezzolini (on whom see Notebook 1, §8, n. 1) in 1908 as a vehicle or instrument for intellectuals committed to bringing about a cultural and moral rejuvenation of Italy. Its main contributors included many of the leading intellectuals of the time, among them, Benedetto Croce, Giovanni Gentile, Luigi Einaudi, Giovanni Papin] and Giovanni Amendola. La Voce was animated by a felt need to combat what its contributors perceived as the provincialism of Italian culture.

.8. Alfredo Gargiulo, "Dalla cultura alla letteratura^ (From culture to literature), LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 14 (April 6, 1930). As Gramsci points out, this article is the sixth in a series entitled "900-1:930.'' Elsewhere, Gramsci comments on another article in the same series by Gargiulo； see Notebook 3/ §154, and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

9. Gargiulo was quoting from Giovanni Battista Angioletti's preface to Enrico Falqui and Elio Vittorini's anthology of works by contemporary writers, Scrittori nuovi: Antologia italiana contemporanea (Lanciano: Carabba, 1930). The parenthetical exclamation marks are Gramsci's.

On Giovanni Battista Angioletti, see Notebook 1, §8, n. 1.

10, On Giuseppe Ungaretti, see Notebook 3； §7/ and n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§6. Roberto Ardirò

1. Gramsci had a copy of this volume； it is listed in Notebook i among the "Books Delivered to Tatiana at Turi on 20 May 23。〃 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:371).

2. Ardigò, Scritti vari, pp. 248-49.

3. Ibid., p. 248.

4. Ibid, p. 249.

5. Ibid, p. 250. Alberto Mario, mentioned in the quoted passage, was a very active Mazzinian republican. In 1874 he was arrested in Rimini and spent some time in jail for allegedly participating in the planning of an antimonarchical insurrection.

6. Ibid., pp. 252-53. On. Alessandro Luzio, see Notebook i, §44/ n. 45.

7- Ibid., pp. 253-54.

8. See part three, "Il liberalismo di ArdigB〃 (Ardigo's liberalism), of section one, “Polemiche" (Polemics), in ibid” pp. 136-63.

9. The quotation is from section six, "Pensieri” (Thoughts), in ibid., pp. 271-72. The words in capital letters appear in that form in AidigB's text. The comments in parentheses are Gramsci's.

§7. Superstructures and science

i. Gramsci is referring to an article by Mario Missiroli, 〃I1 socialismo contro la scienza" (Socialism against science), in UOrdine Nuovo 1, no. 10 (July 以 1919). Missiroli wrote, among other things: "Science is an essentially bourgeois concept； it is a class privilege . . it is the armor with which the bourgeoisie defends itself； and the axe with which it attacks/7 Gramsci makes another reference to this article in Notebook 7, §1.

On Mario Missiroli, see Notebook if §43, n. 12.

§8. Machiavelli and Marx

1. Quoted in Filippo Meda, Machiavellismo(Machiavellianism), Rivista d'Italia 30, no. 6 (June 15, 1927): 232. Gramsci also cites this article by Meda in Notebook 2, §3 工.

2. On Foscolo's and Croce's views on Machiavelli to which Gramsci is referring in this instance, see Notebook 4, §4, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. The Florentine statesman Piero Soderini (1452-1522) was elected gonfaloniere for life in 1502. He was a strong supporter of Machia velli 怎 idea that Florence should form its own militia rather than rely on mercenary troops. In 1505 Soderini succeeded in passing the law that enabled Machiavelli to realize his goal. With the fall of the republic in 1512 and the restoration of Medici rule, Soderini was forced into exile and spent the rest of his life in Rome. Machiavelli was critical of Soderiniz whom he regarded as an example of the indecisiveness of Florentine rulers.

Machiavelli extols Duke Valentino (Cesare Borgia) as an exemplary leader and ruler in chapter 7 of The Prince.

§9. A repertory of Marxism

i. Gramsci is referring top. 45 V in the manuscript of this notebook； see Notebook 4, §5.

§11. Fundamental problems of Marxism

i. In the subsection "Teleology and Objections to Teleology, Immanent Teleology^ of chap. iz "Cause and Purpose in the Social Sciences (Causation and Teleology)/7 of his book Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969), Nikolai Bukharin wrote: Z/It is unnecessary to point out that the apparently teleological elements in the formulations of Marx and Engels are to be understood merely as a metaphoric, esthetic mode of expression" (p. 26). Gramsci returns to a discussion of this question in Notebook 4, §17.

§12. Structure and superstructure

1. Gramsci's observations in this note seem to be aimed directly against the views expressed by Nikolai Bukharin in chap. 6, 〃The Equilibrium Between the Elements of Society," of Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969), pp. 130-241.

§13. Notes and observations on the Popular Manual

.1. Nikolai Bukharinas Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969) was originally pub・ lished in Moscow with the title Teoriia istorischeskogo matenalizma: Popnliarnyi uchebnik marksistkoi sotsiologii (1921). Gramsci used a French translation of this work published in Paris in 1927； its title. La théorie du matenalisme historique, is a literal rendition of the Russian original, as is its subtitle Manuel populaire de sociologie marxiste. Gramsci constantly refers to this book as Saggio popolare (which I translate as Popular Manual}, which is a loose Italian rendering of the Russian populiarnyi uchebnik and of the French manuel populaire. See also Notebook i, §153/ n. 3.

2. In the introduction to Historical Materialism? Bukharin writes:

Some persons imagine that the theory of historical materialism should under no circumstances be considered a Marxian sociology, and that it should not be expounded systematically； they believe that it is only a living method of historical knowledge, that its truths may only be applied in the case of concrete and historical events. In addition? there is the argument that the conception of sociology itself is rather vague, that "sociology" signifies sometimes the science of primitive culture and the origin of the primitive forms of the human community (for instance, the family), and at other times extremely vague observations on the most varied social phenomena "in gen-eral/7 and at still other times, an uncritical comparison of society with an organism (the organic, biological school of sociology), etc.

All such arguments are in error. In the first place, the confusion prevailing in the bourgeois camp should not induce us to create still more confusion in our ranks. For the theory of historical materialism has a definite place, it is not political economy, nor is it history； it is the general theory of society and the laws of its evolution, i,e.f sociology. In the second place, the fact that the theory of historical materialism is a method of history, by no means destroys its significance as a sociological theory. Very often a more abstract science may furnish a point of view (method) for the less abstract sciences, (pp. 14-15)

This was one of the passages from Bukharin's work that Gramsci translated and adapted for inclusion in the first batch of materials sent out to those who were enrolled in the short-lived Communist Party correspondence school he set up in 1925. In the process of adapting this passage, Gramsci changed it considerably: he not only introduced a specifically Italian example into it, but he also transmuted Bukharin's argument. Here is the relevant section of Gramsci's adaptation:

There are various bourgeois currents—some of which have been able to acquire resonance even in the proletarian camp—that, while affirming that historical materialism has some merits, seek to limit its importance and strip it of its essential significance, its revolutionary significance. Thus, for example, the philosopher Benedetto Croce writes that historical materialism should be reduced to nothing more than a canon of the science of history, whose truths cannot be developed systematically into a general conception of life and are demonstrable concretely only in that. . . history books are written. In addition, there is the criticism directed against the general concept of sociology, which is said to be totally vague and indeterminate, for the term "sociology" sometimes is taken to be the science of primitive cultures and of the origin of the basic forms of human life, such as the "family% at other times, very vague reflections on social phenomena "in general^； and at still other times, the simplistic comparison of human society with an organism (the organic or biological school of sociology). The latter type of criticism has nothing to do with Marxist theory. As for the former type, it is sufficient to point out that historical materialism has not only been a canon of historical research, as has been thoroughly shown in a number of literary masterpieces, but it has also had its concrete manifestation .. .in the Russian revolution, a historical phenomenon that has been experienced and is still being experienced, and not just in books. Historical materialism manifests itself in the whole international workers' movement, which is developing continuously and systematically in keeping with the predictions of Marxists, in spite of the fact that according to bourgeois philosophers such predictions should be regarded as fables because in their eyes historical materialism is useful only for writing history books, not for actively living and functioning in history.

3. Gramsci is referring to p. 5 8r of his manuscript； see Notebook 4, §23.

§15. Croce and Marx

1. Gramsci had in prison a copy of the second edition of Benedetto Croce's Cultura e vita morale (Bari: Laterza, 1926). He was also familiar with its first edition (1914): in a letter to Giuseppe Lombardo Radice, March 1918, he lists it among the books that were discussed at the meetings of the Club of Moral Life that he had formed toward the end of 1917.

2. For Croce's comments on Marx in his preface to the 1917 edition of Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, see Notebook 1, §29, n. 4.

On Croce's comment regarding the war and Guido De Ruggiero's reference to it, see Notebook i, §132, n. 3.

3. See Benedetto Croce's letter, published with a comment by Corrado Barbagallo under the title /zIntorno alla storia etico-politica77 (On ethico-political history), in Nuova Rivista Storica 12/ no. 5-6/ (September-December 1928)： 626-29. A second letter by Croce, once again accompanied by Corrado Barbagallo^s comments, appeared under the title /zIntorno alla storia etico-politica: Discussione seconda” (On ethico-political history: Second discusssion) in Nuova Rivista Storica 13, no. i (January-February 1929): 130-33. In the second letter, Croce acknowledges that he made recurrent use of his concept of ethico-political history (he calls it “my war horse") in his attacks on historical materialism.

Gramsci alludes to this exchange between Croce and Barbagallo in an April i8? 1932, letter to Tatiana Schucht: "It seems to me that Croce is above all concerned with this position of his as the leader of revisionism and that he sees in this the best of his present activity. In a short letter written to Professor Corrado Barbagallo and published in Nuova Rivista Storica in 1928 or 1929 (I don't remember exactly), he explicitly states that the entire elaboration of his theory of history as ethico-political history (and this is all or almost all of his activity as a thinker for approximately twenty years) is aimed at deepening his revisionism of forty years ago."

4. See Benedetto Croce, Elementi di politica (Bari: Laterza, 1925), pp. 91-92/ where Croce states that historical materialism "viewed economic life as substantial and moral life as appear ance, illusion, or what it called "superstructure/ 〃 Gramsci had a copy of this booklet when he lived in Rome, prior to his arrest； it is listed among the books he requested Tatiana Schucht to send him in his letter of March 25, 1929. (It is not preserved among the books he had in prison, so he may never have received it.) The contents of Elementi di politica are reproduced in another of Croce's books. Etica e politica (Bari: Laterza, 1931), where the passage quoted above appears on pp. 273一74. Gramsci did receive a copy of Etica e politica in prison, but only after he had written this note. (In subsequent editions of Elementi di politica, the section containing the passage quoted above is omitted.)

5. Benedetto Croce, review of Giovanni Malagodi, Le ideologie politiche (Bari: Laterza, 1928), La Critica 26, no. 5 (September 20, 1928): 360-62. Gramsci had a copy of Malagodi's book in prison,

Giovanni Malagodi, a liberal like Croce, became the director of the Banca Commerciale Italiana in 工933. After the collapse of Fascism he entered politics in the ranks of the Italian Liberal Party, which Croce had helped reorganize. In 1954 Malagodi was elected secretary-general of the Liberal Party with the strong support of its conservative wing.

6. In his preface to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy (New York: International Publishers, 1970), Karl Marx writes: "The totality of these relations of production constitutes the economic structure of society, the real foundation on which arises a legal and political superstructure and to which correspond definite forms of social consciousness. The mode of production of material life conditions the general process of social, political and intellectual life. It is not the consciousness of men that determines their existence, but their social existence that determines their consciousness” (pp. 20-21).

7. Gramsci is again echoing a well-known passage from Marx's preface to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy: "The changes in the economic foundation lead sooner or later to the transformation of the whole immense superstructure. In studying such transformations it is always necessary to distinguish between the material transformation of the economic conditions of production, which can be determined with the precision of natural science, and the legal, political, religious, artistic or philosophic~~in short, ideological forms in which men become conscious of this conflict and fight it out〃 (p. 21). Gramsci included this passage in the first batch of materials he assembled for the Communist Party correspondence school he set up in 1925. This is also one of the selections from Karl Marx's writings that Gramsci later translated from German into Italian； see the manuscript of Notebook 7, pp. 3—41.

8. Gramsci refers to this same remark from Croce's preface to the 1917 edition of Matenalismo storico, ed economìa marxistica in Notebook xf §29. For a translation of the relevant passage from Croce's preface, see Notebook i, §29, n. 4.

9. Georges Sorel does not use the phrase ^historical bloc" in his writings； he does, however, write about the need to look at historical forces "as a whole”—i,e.； en bloc, or, as rendered in Italian, “in blocco/' Gramsci probably had in mind the following passage from SorePs "Letter to Daniel Halevy,/, which is printed as an introduction to SoreFs Reflections on Violence, trans. T. E. Hulme (Glencoe, Ill.: Free Press, 1950):

In the course of this study one thing has always been present in my mind, which seemed to me so evident that I did not think it worth while to lay much stress on it—that men who are participating in a great social movement always picture their coming action as a battle in which their cause is certain to triumph. These constructions, knowledge of which is so important for historians, I propose to call myths； the syndicalist "general strike" and Marx's catastrophic revolution are such myths. As remarkable examples of such myths, I have given those which were constructed by primitive Christianity, by the Reformation, by the Revolution and by the followers of Mazzini. I now wish to show that we should not attempt to analyse such groups of images in the way that we analyse a thing into its elements, but that they must be taken as a whole, as historical forces [emphasis added], (pp. 48-49)

Gramsci does not seem to have had a copy of SoreFs Reflections of Violence in prison, but he could have been reminded of it by a discussion of Sorel in a book he did have: Giovanni Malagodi怎 Le ideologie politiche. Paraphrasing SorePs point, Malagodi writes: 〃We must not confuse these rather fleeting states of our voluntary consciousness with the stable affirmations of science. We should not attempt to analyze these zsystems of images' in the way we analyze a scientific theory, breaking it down to its elements. We should "take them en bloc7 [in the original Italian, ^prenderli in bloccof,] as historical forces77 (p. 95).

§16. The teleology of the Popular Manual

1. See chap, r, ;/Cause and Purpose in the Social Sciences (Causation and Teleology)/7 in Nikolai Bukharin, Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969), pp. 19-32. Gramsci included most of this chapter, in somewhat modified form, in the second batch of materials he prepared for the Communist Party correspondence school he set up in 1925. The most significant of Gramsci's modifications is his replacement of the word "law" (used repeatedly by Bukharin) with terms like "regularity," "normality/' and 〃the relation between cause and effect/7

2. See chap. 5, "The Equilibrium Between Society and Nature/7 in. Bukharin, Historical Materialism, pp. 104-29.

3. This cautionary note is repeated verbatim on the first page of Notebook 11. In the opening paragraph of Notebook 8, Gramsci's remarks on the provisional character of the materials contained in his notebooks are even more emphatic.

§17. Immanence and the Popular Manual

1. For the relevant passage in Bukharin's Historical Materialism, see the Notes to the Text for Notebook 4, §11.

2. Gramsci was familiar with at least two texts that raise the possibility that some affinities might exist between certain aspects of Giordano Bruno's philosophy and Marx's thought: Rodolfo Mondolfo/ ^Razionalità e irrazionalità della storia,, (The rationality and irrationality of history). Nuova Rivista Storica 14, no. 1-2 (January-April 1930): I-21； and Rodolfo Mondolfoz Sulle orme di Marx: Studi di marxismo e socialismo, 2 vols., 3d ed. (Bologna: L. Cappelli, 1923-24). In Mondolfo's book (a copy of which Gramsci owned prior to his arrest), see especially 2:32-49.

§18. The technique of thinking

1. Gramsci is here quoting Croce's paraphrase—in Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, 4th ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), p. 31—of an observation made by Engels. Croce's rendition of Engels's thought, however, is not quite accurate. Cf. Frederick Engels, Anti-Duhiing (New York: International Publishers, 1939), p. 19.: 〃The art of working with concepts is not inborn and also is not given with ordinary everyday consciousness, but requires real thought, and that this thought similarly has a long empirical history, not more and not less than empirical natural science/7

2. See Notebook i, §153.

3. Benedetto Croce, Saggio sullo Hegel (seguito da altri scritti di storia della filosofia), 3d rev. ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1927, p. 136: "Passing from the extreme right to the extreme left, and dwelling for a moment on a writer who in recent times has been widely read and discussed in Italy, namely, Frederick Engels (the friend and collaborator of Karl Marx), one can see how he liquidates philosophy by reducing it to the positive sciences and preserving of it only 'the doctrine of thought and of its laws: formal logic (!) and the dialectic/ 〃

Gramsci had a copy of this book by Croce in prison. Croce's book contains, in addition to a long essay on Hegel, other essays on the history of philosophy； it was first published in 1913. The essay on Hegel has been translated into English: What Is Living and What Is Dead in the Philosophy of Hegel, trans. D. Ainslie (London: Macmillan/ 1915)； the quoted passage is on p. 206.

Croce is referring to a passage in the opening chapter of Engels's Anti・ Dühring'. Z/Modern materialism is essentially dialectical, and no longer needs any philosophy standing above the other sciences. As soon as each separate science is required to get clarity as to its position in the great totality of things and of our knowledge of things, a special science dealing with this totality is superfluous. What still independently survives of all former philosophy is the science of thought and its laws—formal logic and dialectics" (p. 31).

4. See Notebook if §153.

5. See Notebook 1, §122, and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

6. See Giuseppe Prezzolini, Il linguaggio come causa d'errore: H._, Bergson. (Florence: Spinelli, 1904). Prezzolini怎 booklet was reviewed by Benedetto Croce in La Crìtica 2, no. 2 (March 1904): 150-53； the review is reprinted in B. Croce, Conversazione critiche: Serie prima (Bari: Laterza, 1918), pp. 105-7/ a copy which Gramsci had in prison.

On Giuseppe Prezzolini, see Notebook i, §8, n. 1.

Vilfredo Pareto devoted many pages of his magnum opus, Trattato di sociologia generale, 2 vols. (Florence: Barbera, 1916), to the discussion of language and definitions. Pareto's voluminous treatise on sociology has been translated into English: The Mind and Society, 4 vols., trans. A. Bongiorno and A. Livingston. (New York: Harcourt Brace, 1935), later reprinted as Treatise on General Sociology, 2 vols. (New York: Dover, 1963). An abridged version of this classic work was edited by Giulio Farina with the approval of Pareto—Compendio di sociologia generale (Florence: Barbèra, 1920)—and translated into English as Compendium of General Sociology, trans. E. Abbott (Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1980). For a guide to Pareto's treatment of language, see the ^Index-Summary of Theoremsin the Compendium of General Sociology, especially the entries under "Language and Definitions," pp, 428-29. Gramsci refers to Pareto again in Notebook 4/ §42, and makes some more extensive remarks on him in Notebook 7, §36.

Vilfredo Pareto (1848-1923), one of Italy怎 most eminent social scientists, who made major contributions to sociology, economics, and political theory, was born in Paris, the son of a Mazzinian exile. He held important managerial positions in industry before his appointment to a professorship at the University of Lausanne in 1893. Within a few years of his appointment, he was able to devote all his time to research and writing, thanks to a sizable inheritance. Pareto published two major works on economic theory before turning his attention to sociology and political theory. The salient feature of his work is its critique of ideologies and of all rational explanations of human conduct. Pareto insisted that society was governed by nonrational forces. Another well-known and influential element in Pareto's writings is his theory of elites. In his view, democracies are a sham since the most competent few always hold sway over the masses； government, he maintained, is necessarily oligarchic and relies on force even while pretending to be executing the will of the people. Well before the outbreak of the First World War, Pareto had established himself as one of the severest critics of liberalism and the Italian parliamentary system. Later, the Fascists claimed to be inspired by his theories, and Mussolini nominated him to the senate in 1923, just a few months before Pareto died in Switzerland.

§19. The "technical instrument^ in the Popular Manual

1. See, especially, Notebook 4, §12.

2. See Nikolai Bukharin's extended discussion on music in chap. 6, "The Equilibrium Between the Elements of Society/7 of Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969), pp. 189-96. At the start of his discussion, Bukharin provides a schematic outline of his approach:

Our investigation will show the following elements: 1. the element of objective material things, the musical technology: musical instruments and groups of musical instruments (orchestra, quartette, etc,； the combinations of instniments may be likened to combinations of machines and tools in factories)； also physical symbols and tokens: systems of notation, musical scores, etc.； 2. the human organization； these include many forms of human association in musical work (distribution of persons in the orchestra, the chorus, in the process of musical creation； also, musical clubs and societies of all kinds)； 3. the formal elements of music, including rhythm, harmony (corresponding to symmetry in the graphic and plastic arts), etc.； 4. the methods of uniting the various forms, principles of construction, what corresponds to style in some arts； in a broader sense, the type of artistic forni) 5. the content of the art work, or, if we are dealing with an entire movement or tendency, the content of all the works； we are chiefly concerned here not with the method of performance, but with its substance, let us say with the choice of "subject" of presentation； 6. as a ^superstructure of the superstructure," we may also include, in music, the theory of musical technique (theory of counterpoint, etc.), (pp. 189-90)

3. See chapter 6 in Bukharinas Historical Materialism, especially the subsection entitled "Social Technology and the Economic Structure of Society/7 Among other things, Bukharin writes:

We have already pointed out that in a consideration of social phenomena it is necessary to begin with the social, material productive forces, with the social technology, the system of tools of labor. We may now supplement these remarks. In speaking of the social technology, we of course meant not a certain tool, or the aggregate of different tools, but the whole system of these tools in society. We must imagine that in a given society, in various places, but in a certain order, there are distributed looms and motors, instruments and appa-ratus/ simple and complicated tools. In some places they are crowded close together (for instance, in the great industrial centers), in other places, other tools are scattered. But at any given moment, if people are connected by a labor relation, if we have a society, all these instruments of production—tools and machines, large and small, simple and complicated, manual or power-driven—are united into a single system, (p. 134)

The text continues: "Thus, as there is a definite relation and a definite proportion between the various branches of production； there is also in social technology a certain definite relation between its parts as well as a definite prevailing proportion. This circumstance changes the mere aggregate of tools, machines, instruments, etc., into a system of social technology" (pp. 135-36).

4. See chap. 2, Z/Le teorie storiche del prof. Loria" (The historical theories of Prof. Loria), in Benedetto Croce, Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, 4th ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), pp. 198-204. Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison.

5. In the C text of this note    Notebook 11, §12) Gramsci transcribes

the passages from Marx and from Loria that are quoted and compared by Croce in. Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, pp. 39-40.

6. Gramsci makes a slight error in recalling the title of Achille Loria's essay, changing aaviazione" (aviation) to ffaeroplano^ (airplane)； the correct title is "Le influenze sociali dell'aviazione” (The social effects of aviation). On this article and on Gramsci's references to it in his journalistic writings, see Notebook 1, §25/ n. 2.

7. This entire paragraph is a very precise paraphrase of a passage on p. 41 of Croce's Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica. As Gramsci points out, Croce does not indicate which edition of Marx's Capital the page numbers he provides refer to. Marx calls attention to the importance of technical innovation and the history of technology on several occasions in Capital, both in the main text and in footnotes (Croce is alluding to footnotes). For example, in Capital (trans. B. Fowkes [New York: Penguin, 1990]), Marx writes: "The writers of history have so far paid very little attention to the development of material production, which is the basis of all social life, and therefore of all real history(ch. 7, sec.i, 1:28611). Also:

A critical history of technology would show how little any of the inventions of the eighteenth century are the work of a single individual. As yet such a book does not exist. Darwin has directed attention to the history of natural technology, i.e. the formation of the organs of plants and animals, which serve as the instruments of production for sustaining their life. Does not the history of the productive organs of man in society, of organs that are the material basis of every particular organization of society, deserve equal attention? And would not such a history be easier to compile, since, as Vico says, human history differs from natural history in that we have made the former, but not the latter? Technology reveals the active relation of man to nature, the direct process of the production of his life, and thereby it also lays bare the process of the production of the social relations of his life, and of the mental conceptions that flow from these relations, (ch. 15, sec. 1, 1:49311)

Croce's remark that Marx "flirted" with the Hegelian dialectic is an allusion to what Marx wrote in the postface to the second edition of Capital (1873): "I criticized the mystificatory side of the Hegelian dialectic nearly thirty years ago； at a time when it was still in fashion. But just when I was working at the first volume of Capita^ the ill-humoured, arro» gant and mediocre epigones who now talk large in educated German circles began to take pleasure in treating Hegel... as a 'dead dog/1 therefore openly avowed myself the pupil of that mighty thinker, and even, here and there in the chapter on the theory of value, coquetted with the mode of expression peculiar to him〃 (1:102-3).

§20. Croce and Marx

i. See Benedetto Croce, Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, 4th ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), p. 93. The parenthesis is inserted by Gramsci on the basis of the sentences preceding the quoted passage.

See Karl Marx, The Poverty of Philosophy, in K. Marx and F, Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 6:174:

Economists have a singular method of procedure. There are only two kinds of institutions for themz artificial and natural. The institutions of feudalism are artificial institutions, those of the bourgeoisie are natural institutions. In this they resemble the theologians, who likewise establish two kinds of religion. Every religion which is not theirs is an invention of men, while their own is an emanation from God. When the economists say that present-day relations—the relations of bourgeois production—are natural, they imply that these are the relations in which wealth is created and productive forces developed in conformity with the laws of nature. These relations therefore are themselves natural laws independent of the influence of time. They are eternal laws which must always govern society. Thus there has been a history, but there is no longer any. There has been a history, since there were the institutions of feudalism, and in these institutions of feudalism we find quite different relations of production from those of bourgeois society, which the economists try to pass off as natural and as such, eternal.

§21. The technique of thinking

1. Mario Camis, aeronautica e le scienze biologiche^ (Aeronautics and the biological sciences). Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1344 (March 16f 1928): 229.

2. Gramsci translated this passage into Italian from the French translation of Sinclair Lewis’ Babbitt, trans. M. Rémon (Paris: Stock, 1930)； p. 50. Gramsci had a copy of this edition in prison； it is listed in the manuscript of Notebook 2 among the "Books Delivered to Carlo on 13 March 1931〃 (see Description. of the Manuscript, 1:529). The passage, in section 4 of chapter 3/ is quoted here from the original edition of Sinclair Lewis, Babbitt (New York: Harcourt Brace, 1922), p. 44.

For other comments by Gramsci on Sinclair Lewis's Babbitt, see Notebook 5, §105, and Notebook 6, §49.

3. Don Ferrante is a minor character in Alessandro Manzonizs I promessi sposi {The Betrothed], Gramsci is alluding to the closing pages of chapter 37 of the novel, where Don Ferrante's formally impeccable but totally misguided reasoning is described with tragicomic irony. Don Ferrante "was a learned man" who refuted the existence of the plague that would soon decimate the population of Milan. He did this, the narrator tells us； "with a series of arguments whose logical connection, at least, could be denied by no one." When he was unable to explain away the physical evidence of the effects of the plague on the body, Don Ferrante resorted to another impeccable line of reasoning. The doctors were not wrong about the actual existence of the plague, he argued, but they were mistaken "in the reasons to which they attributed it." The real cause of the plague, Don Ferrante explains, is the Sfatai conjunction of Saturn and Jupiter." Relying as always on his formal reasoning, Don Ferrante then goes on to prove, at least to his own satisfaction, that the idea of the plague being spread by contagion is absurd, 〃 (The doctors] have the nerve to come to us and say: 'Don't touch this, and don't touch that, and you'll be all right!7 As if avoiding the material contact of earthly objects could impede the powerful working of the heavenly bodies! And all that wasted labour of burning rags! Poor wretches! Can you burn Jupiter? Can you bum Saturn?The narrator concludes the little vignette of Don Ferrante: ,fHis fretus—or, in other words, basing himself on these fine suppositions—he took no precautions whatever against the plague. He caught it in due course, took to his bed, and died, like a hero of Metastasi。，quarrelling with the stars” (Alessandro Manzoni, The Betrothed, trans. B. Penman [New York: Penguin, 1972], pp. 698-700).

4. See the opening of chapter 6 of Leo Tolstoy怎 Death of Ivan Ilyich, in The Death of Ivan Ilyich and Other Stories, trans. L, Maude and A. Maude (Oxford University Press, 1935):

Ivan Ilyich saw that he was dying, and he was in a continual despair.

In the depth of his heart he knew he was dying, but not only was lie not accustomed to the thought, he simply did not and could not grasp it.

The syllogism he had learned from Kiesewetter's Logic: "Caius is a man, men are mortal, therefore Caius is mortal," had always seemed to him correct as applied to Caius, but certainly not applied to himself. That Caius—man in the abstract—was mortal, was perfectly correct, but he was not Caius, not an abstract man, but a creature quite, quite separate from all the others.

In prison, Gramsci had a copy of La tempesta di neve ed altri racconti, trans. A. Prospero (Turin: Casa Editrice Madia, 1928), a collection of stories by Tolstoy that included The Death of Ivan Ilyich.

§22. Croce and Marx. The value of ideologies

I. See, inter alia, Notebook i, §18, §48, §53, and §131.

§23 The Popular Manual and sociological laws

I. See the reference to this note (by manuscript page number) inserted by Gramsci at the end of Notebook 4, §13 [Notes and critical observations on the Popular Manual).

§24. The Restoration and historicism

i. Gramsci is referring to the period immediately following the final defeat of Napoleon, during which the European powers attempted to restore at least a semblance of the old order. It started with the Congress of Vienna (1815) and lasted, more or less, until the revolutions of 1848.

§25. Notes on the Popular Manual

i. ^Robinsonades〃 are narratives or theoretical constructions of a social and/or economic order that are based on the imagined needs and behavior of a fictional individual who, like Daniel Defoe's creation, Robinson Crusoez is isolated and independent. Karl Marx, in Capital (trans. B. Bowkes [New York: Penguin, 1990]), observes that "political economists are fond of Robinson Crusoe stories” (1:169),皿d he illustrates the pitfalls of constructing economic theories or models based on Robinsonades.

§26. The Popular Manual and the “ultimate cause'"

I. See Frederick Engels's September 21, 1890, letter to Joseph Bloch, published in Dei Sozialistiche Akademikei, no. 19 (October i, 1895)； and his January 25/ 1894, letter to Heinz Starkenburg, published in Dei Socialistische Akademiker, no. 20 (October i6, 1895). The two letters were translated into Italian and published together in a booklet. Due lettere di Federico Engels sulla interpretazione materialistica della storia (Rome: Mongini, 1906)； the translations were later incorporated in vol. 4 of K. Marx-E Engels-E Lassalle, Opere, 2d rev ed., 8 vols., ed. Ettore Ciccotti (Milan: Società Editrice Avanti, 1922}, of which Gramsci had a copy prior to his arrest. For an English translation of these letters, see K. Marx and F. Engels, Correspondence: 1846-1895, trans. D. Torr (New York: International Publishers, 1936), pp. 475-77 and pp. 516-19.

In these letters, Engels cautions against certain reductive and dogmatic interpretations or applications of his and Marx怎 ideas. For example, in his letter to Bloch, Engels writes:

According to the materialist conception of history the determining element in history is ultimately the production and reproduction in real life. More than this neither Marx nor I have ever asserted. If therefore somebody twists this into the statement that the economic element is the only determining one, he transforms it into a meaningless, abstract and absurd phrase. The economic situation is the basis’ but the various elements of the superstructure—political forms of the class struggle and its consequences, constitutions established by the victorious class after a successful battle, etc.—forms of law—and then even the reflexes of all these actual struggles in the brains of the combatants: political, legal, philosophical theories, religious ideas and their further development into systems of dogma— also exercise their influence upon the course of the historical struggles and in many cases preponderate in determining their form. There is an interaction of all these elements, in which, amid all the endless host of accidents (i.e. of things and events whose inner connection is so remote or so impossible to prove that we regard it as absent and can neglect it), the economic movement finally asserts itself as necessary. Otherwise the application of the theory to any period of history one chose would be easier than the solution of a simple question of the first degree....

Marx and I are ourselves partly to blame for the fact that younger writers sometimes lay more stress on the economic side than is due to it. We had to emphasise this main principle in opposition to our adversaries’ who denied it, and we had not always the time, the place or the opportunity to allow the other elements involved in the interaction to come into their rights. But when it was a case of presenting a section of history, that is, of a practical application, the thing was different and there no error was possible. Unfortunately, however, it happens only too often that people think they have fully understood a theory and can apply it without more ado from the moment they have mastered its main principles, and those not even always correctly. And I cannot exempt many of the more recent "Marxists” from this reproach, for the most wonderful rubbish has been produced from this quarter too.

Gramsci did not have copies of these two letters by Engels in prison. His recollection of them may have been prompted by Benedetto Crocei paraphrase of their contents (accompanied by a precise citation in a footnote) in his attack on deterministic versions of Marxism in Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, 4th ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921):

Some have supposed that historical materialism asserts that history is nothing more than economic history; and all the rest is simply a mask, an appearance without reality. And then they labor to discover the true god of history, whether it be the productive tool or the earth, using arguments that call to mind the proverbial discussion about the egg and the hen. Frederick Engels was besieged by people who turned to him to ask how to interpret this or that historical factor with respect to the economic factor. In the many letters he wrote in response—letters that now, after his death, are being published in reviews—he let it be understood that when, together with Marx, he conceived this new interpretation of history based on factual study, he had not meant to formulate a rigid theory. In one of these letters he apologizes for whatever modicum of exaggeration he and Marx may have inserted into the polemical articulation of their ideas and recommends that greater attention be paid to his and Marx's interpretations of history rather than to the theoretical expressions they employed. It would be a fine thing, he exclaims, if one could come up with a formula with which to explain all the facts of history! Applying such a formula would render the understanding of any period of history as easy as solving an elementary equation! (pp, 11-12)

In the C text of this note (Notebook 11, §25) Gramsci seems to be echoing Croce's paraphrase of Engels when he criticizes "the degenerate tendency ... [that] consists in reducing a conception, of the world to a mechanical set of formulas that gives one the impression of holding the entirety of history in one's pocket/7

§27. Teleology

I. For the epigram (in elegiac couplets in the original) from Goethe and Friedrich Schiller's Xenien {1796) and the brief comment on it, see Benedetto Croce, Goethe, id rev. ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), p. 262. Croce's book has two parts: a study on Goethe and a translation of selected lyrics. (The first part of Croce's book is available in English； see B. Croce, Goethe, trans. E. Anderson [London: Methuen, 1923].) Gramsci, as he himself indicates, transcribed Croce's translation of the epigram "The Teleologist77； it is translated here from Croce's Italian. This volume is not among Gramsci's books that have been preserved, but in all probability he had direct access to it when he wrote this note.

§28. Antonino Lovecchio, Filosofia della prassi e filosofia dello spirito

i. Giuseppe Tarozzi's review of Antonino Lovecchio's book on the “philosophy of praxisz/ (Marxism) and the "philosophy of mind" (idealism)—Filosofia della prassi e filosofia dello spirito (Palmi: Zappone, 1928)—in LItalia Che Scrive n, no. 6 (June 1928): 156.

2. On Antonio Labriola, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 51； on Giovanni Gentile, see Notebook i, §15/ n. 1； on. Rodolfo Mondolfoz see Notebook 4, §i, n. 2； and on Adelchi Baratone, see Notebook 1, §96, and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§29. Machiavelli

1. Mario Sertoli's book on Russian constitutional history. La costituzione russa: Diritto e storia (Florence: Le Monnier, 1928), was reviewed by Alfredo Poggi (not Giuseppe Tarozzi) in LItalia Che Scrive 11, no. 8 (August 1928): 212. Poggi alludes to but provides no details about Karl Vorländer^ book Von Machiavelli bis Lenin: Neuzeitliche Staats und Geselleschaftsthßorien (Leipzig: Meyer, 1926). Vorländer, a neo-Kantian scholar, also wrote other books on Marxism.

2. Felice Battagliai survey "Studi sulla politica di Machiavelli” (Studies on Machiavelli怎 politics) was published in four parts in Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica ir no. 1 (November 1927): 36-47； iz no. 2 (January 1928): 122-31； i, no. 4 (September 1928): 376-84/ and 2, no. I (January-February 1929): 46-57.

§30. De Man's book

1. Paolo Milano, review of Henri De Man, Il superamento del marxismo, 2 vols./ trans. A. Schiavi (Bari: Laterza, 1929), LItalia Che Scrive 12f no. 9 (September 1929): 269-70.

On Henri De Man's book, originally published in German with the title Zur Psychologie des Sozialismus (1926), and on its Italian, French, and English editions, see Notebook 1, §6i, n. 13. See also Notebook 4, §2, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

2. See "Preface to the First Edition of the German Original/7 in Henry De Man, The Psychology of Socialism, trans. E. Paul and C. Paul (London: Allen and Unwin, 1928): “I speak frankly of the liquidation of Marxism/ instead of using some such half-hearted word as Revision/ adaptation/ "reinterpretation,, or the like, which might seem to imply a wish to run with the hare as well as to hunt with the hounds" (p. 14)

3. See De Man, The Psychology of Socialism:

In Marx's day, the method of science was that of the natural sciences； and the method of the natural sciences was that of the mechanical sciences. We do not need, here, to examine how far the general advance of knowledge, or the advance of the natural sciences themselves, has necessitated the abandonment of mechanical hypotheses. Enough to point out that, in the domain of the historical and psychological sciences, all the knowledge gained during the last fifty years presupposes and confirms the belief that the idea of mechanic cal causation must yield place to another and far more complicated relationship of cause and effect.

Every happening which man can try to understand may be referred to one of two types of motion, which can be respectively called the type of mechanical reaction and the type of psychological reaction....

...The mechanical reaction produces an effect proportional to the energy developed by the cause.—The psychological reaction has an intensity which is not proportional to the stimulus, (pp. 340-41)

4. It is clear from the overall context that Paolo Milano (in his review of De Manzs book) is referring to Alfred Adler (1870-1937), the Austrian psychologist and psychiatrist. Gramsci is obviously puzzled because the Adler whose works he knew was Max Adler (1873-1937), a lea击ng intellectual of the Austro-Marxist school whose sociological theories were strongly influenced by neo-Kantian philosophy, not by Freudian psychology.

§31. By Georges Sorel

1. Gramsci is referring to p. 781 of his manuscript； see Notebook 4, §44. This page reference was inserted (at a later time) between the lines, directly above the first words of the note.

2. Georges Sorel, "Ultime meditazioni (Scritto postumo inedito)" (Final reflections: A previously unpublished posthumous text), Nuova Antologia 63, no. 1361 (December 1, 1928): 289-307.

3. In fact, this collection of articles by Sorel was published two years later/ and Gramsci received a copy of it at the Turi prison. See Georges Sorel, LEuropa sotto la tormenta, ed. Mario Missiroli (Milan: Corbaccio, 1932).

On Mario Missiroli, see Notebook 1, §43, n. 12.

4. Gramsci quotes the conclusion. of SoreFs essay later in this note.

5. A volume of letters from Sorel to Missiroli was published more than three decades after Gramsci wrote this note. See Georges Sorel, Lettere a un amico d'Italia, ed. Mario MissiroE (Bologna: Cappelli, 1963).

6. Louis-Adolphe Thiers (1797-1877) became president of the French republic in 1871 after the Franco-Prussian war had resulted in the fall of Napoleon Ill's empire. That same year Thiers virtually destroyed the French socialist and workers7 movements when, with a great deal of help from the Germans, he crushed the Paris Commune uprising.

7. In his article, Sorel cites a French translation of Eduard Bernstein, Die Voraussetzungen des Sozialismus und die Aufgaben der Sozial-democratie (Stuttgart: Verlag von. I. W. Dietz Nachf, 1899), the work that laid the foundations of the social-democratic revisionist version of Marxism. For an English translation/ see E. Bernstein, Evolutionary Socialism, trans. E. C. Harvey (London, 1909).

8. In his article, Sorel cites Charles Andler, Le Manifeste Comuniste de Karl Marx et F. Engels, 2 vols. (Paris: Rieder, n.d.J. Gramsci owned a copy of this detailed commentary on The Communist Manifesto, but most probably it was not among the books he had with him in prison. His familiarity with this work is evident from his reference to it in Notebook i, §47.

9. See the opening paragraphs of the subsection entitled "Critical-Utopian Socialism and Communism/' in part 3, "Socialist and Communist Literature/' of The Communist Manifesto, in K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Woiks (New York: International Publishers, 1976):

We do not here refer to that literature which, in. every great modern revolution, has always given voice to the demands of the proletariat, such as the writings of Babeuf and others.

The first direct attempts of the proletariat to attain its own ends, made in times of universal excitement, when feudal society was being overthrown., these attempts necessarily failed, owing to the then undeveloped state of the proletariat, as well as to the absence of the economic conditions for its emancipation, conditions that had yet to be produced and could be produced by the impending bourgeois epoch alone. The revolutionary literature that accompanied these first movements of the proletariat had necessarily a reactionary character. It inculcated universal asceticism and social levelling in its crudest forms.

The Socialist and Communist systems properly so called, those of Saint-Simon, Fourier, Owen and others, spring into existence in the early undeveloped period, described above, of the struggle between proletariat and bourgeoisie. (6:514)

The "conspiracy of the equals" was organized by Francois-Noel Babeuf (1760-97) and the secret society he founded in 1796. In alliance with the Jacobins and other elements opposed to the Thermidorian reaction, the Babouvists planned an insurrection to overthrow the government and return France to the constitution of 1793. The conspiracy was discovered by the police, and Babeuf was guillotined in May 1797. Babeuf's utopian vision of egalitarian communism as well as his delineation of conspiratorial revolutionary organizational strategy and tactics had a profound influence on many nineteenth-century socialists and revolutionaries, including Louis-Auguste Blanqui (see Notebook i, §48, n. 2).

10. Up to this point, the contents of the paragraphs marked 〃工〃 and ili,, (including the citations of Bernstein's and Andler's books) are transcribed almost verbatim (with some compression) from SorePs essay, "Ultime meditazioni."

11. Gramsci is probably referring to some political documents related to Gabriele D'Annunzio's foreign policy during his occupation of Fiume (September 1919-December 1920). D'Annunzio's ultimate goal was to annex Fiume (Rijeka in Croatia) for Italy. He envisioned establishing friendly relations with the Soviet Union, which would have constituted a provocative act of defiance against the Entente powers. These documents were collected in the Libro violetto (The violet book) of the command of the city of Fiume, which contains the "Acts and Communiques of the Office of Foreign Relations from 28 November 1919 to 1 May 192。.〃

12. Gramsci is here quoting a footnote (n. 15} on pp. 299-300 of SorePs article ^Ultime meditazioni.^ For an English translation of the ""Preface to the Russian Edition [of the Manifesto] of 1882," by Marx and Engels, that is mentioned here by Sorel, see Harold ]. Laski, The Communist Manifesto of Marx and Engels (New York: Pantheon, 1967), pp. m-13.

13. For documents related to Marx's involvement with refugee organizations in 1849-50, see the appendices in K. Marx and E Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers,工978), 10:595-637. These documents, the editors explain in a note, ^reflect Marx's efforts to gather revolutionary forces scattered after the defeat of the 1848-49 revolution and to render support to the revolutionary refugees suffering poverty and privation in England" (p. 705),

14. Except for the final parenthetical comment, the paragraph numbered 〃3〃 is partly a paraphrase and partly a word-for-word transcription of pp. 301-3 of Sorel's "Ultime meditazioni."

15. Sorel, "Ultime meditazioni," p. 304.

16. Ibid., p. 305.

17. Ibid., p. 307.

18. In a footnote (n. 28) on p. 307 of his essay "Ultime meditazioni,“ Georges Sorel cites his own book, Matériaux d'une théorie du proletariat (Paris: Rivière, 1921). For an English translation of some selected passages from this work, see "From Materials for a Theory of the Proletariat； in From Georges Sorel: Essays in Socialism and Philosophy, ed. John L. Stanley (New York: Oxford University Press, 1976), pp. 227-56.

19. The view that Gramsci attributes to Croce in this particular instance is not found in Croce's brief review of Henri De Man's book (mentioned by Gramsci in Notebook i, §132), nor has it been located in any of Croce's published writings. Gramsci may have taken his cue from an advertisement for De Man's book by its Italian publisher Laterza (mentioned in Notebook 4, §2) that states that De Man ''resumes the profoundly spiritualist tradition of socialists like Fourier, Owen, and Proudhon from the first half of the nineteenth century, or like Jaurès from the end of the century/' Since Croce collaborated very closely with the publisher Laterza, Gramsci may have assumed that the text of the advertisement was written by Croce.

2。. As he did with the reference at the beginning of this note, Gramsci added this reference to p. 781 of his manuscript一corresponding to Notebook 4, §44―at a later time.

§32. The Popular Manual

1. See Nikolai Bukharin, Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1969), p. 93:Society consists of individual persons； it could not exist without them, as we may assume without further discussion. But society is not merely an aggregate of persons, constituting their sum. Society is more than a mere summation of its various Jacks and Jills. . . . This means that society, as a whole, is greater than the sum of its parts. It cannot in any way be reduced to these parts, which is also true of many systems of various kinds, both living organisms and dead organisms.z/

2. Gramsci is referring to the philosophy of Giovanni Gentile and his followers. On Gentile, see Notebook i, §15/ n. 1.

3. The story of Saladin is recounted in Novellino, also known as Libro di novelle e di bel parlar gentile (Book of novellas and of elegant noble speech), a thirteenth-century collection by an unknown Florentine writer of a hundred tales based on a wide range of sources.

§33. The passage from knowing to understanding to feeling ...

i. See Henri De Man's book, originally published in German, Zur Psychologie des Sozialismus (1926), On the Italian, French, and English editions of this work, see Notebook 1, §61, n. 13.

§34. Apropos of the appellation of ^historical materialism "

i. Diego Angeli, “I Bonaparte a Roma: XI. La principessa Carlotta Napoleone” (The Bonapartes in Rome: XI. Princess Charlotte Napoleon), 11 Marzocco 62, no. 40 (October 2/ 1927).

Diego Angeli (1869-1937) helped found the literary periodical II Marzocco and contributed to various literary journals. He translated Shakespeare^ plays into Italian and wrote some interesting books on the history of Roman art and culture.

Pietro Giordani (1774-1848), a classicist and a purist in. matters concerning language and literature, was a fervent supporter of Napoleonic rule in Italy. He held the post of pro-secretary at the Academy of Fine Arts in Bologna from 1808 to 1815. A diehard patriot, Giordani was forced to move to Florence in 1824 to avoid Austrian persecution. His books on language include one on the art of writing, A un giovane italiano: Istruzioni per Parte di scrìvere (1821), and another on the art of speech, Sul vero nelle arti della parola e del disegno (1827).

§35. On the origin of the concept of "ideology”

1. Alessandro Manzoni returned to the Catholic fold in 1810, at about the same time that he left Paris (where he had friends who were associated with the Idéologie philosophical movement) and resettled in Milan. He composed the Inni sacri (Sacred hymns) over a period of years between 1812 and 1822. Manzoni met Antonio Rosmini for the first time in 1826； the two became very close friends.

On Antonio Rosmini Serbati, see Notebook i, §51, n. 1.

2. The information in this paragraph is drawn from an article by Adolfo Faggi, “Stendhal e gli ideologi” (Stendhal and the ideologues), in II Marzocco 32, no. 18 (May i, 1927).

Antoine-Louis-Claude Destutt de Tracy (1754-1836) had already had a successful military career and been elected to the States General when he started participating in philosophical discussions at the salon of Madame Helvétius, the widow of the distinguished philosopher Claude Helvétius. He developed his distinctive philosophical school. Idéologie, by building on and developing the ideas of John Locke and, even more, the sensationalist philosophy of Condillac. Destutt de Tracy's theories, first systematically expounded in. his four-volume work Elements dldeologie, emphasized the dependence of knowledge (both its acquisition and its verification) on the human senses.

On Hippolyte Taine and Georges Cabanis, see also the observations recorded in Notebook i, §91.

On Charles Maurras, see Notebook 1, §14, n. 1； and on Paul Bourget, see Notebook 3, §37, n. 4.

3. Gramsci remarks more than once on the political motivation behind

Croce's enthusiasm for De Man； see, for example, Notebook iz §132   -

4，This is one of the most important underlying motifs running through the many pages Gramsci devotes to the critique of Bukharin's Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology.

§36. Criteria of "literaryff judgment

i. See Benedetto Croce, Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica, 4th ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), p. 26. Gramsci quotes the same passage in Notebook 1, §11.

§37. Idealism-positivism. [“Objectivity” of knowledge]

1. "Religione e filosofia nelle scuole medie” (Religion and philosophy in the middle school), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (June 1,1929): 419. The article is unsigned, but it was in fact written by Mario Barbera.

2. Karl Marx, preface to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy (New York: International Publishers, 1970), p. 21. Gramsci refers to this same statement by Marx in Notebook 4, §15； see also n. 7 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. Gramsci is distinguishing his views from Giovanni Gentile's philosophy of //actualism./, See, especially, Giovanni Gentile, Teoria generale dello spinto come atto puro (Pisa: Mariotti, 1916), translated into English as The Theory of Mind as Pure Act, trans, and introd. H. Wildon Carr (London: Macmillan, 1922).

§38. Relations between structure and superstructures

1. Gramsci is quoting from memory. See Karl Marx's preface to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy (New York: International Publishers, 1970), p. 21: "No social order is ever destroyed before all the productive forces for which it is sufficient have been developed, and new superior relations of production never replace older ones before the material conditions for their existence have matured within the framework of the old society. Mankind thus inevitably sets itself only such tasks as it is able to solve, since closer examination will always show that the problem itself arises only when the material conditions for its solution are already present or at least in the process of formation." Gramsci later translated this passage, together with other selections from Marx's writings, from German into Italian； see the manuscript of Notebook 7, pp. 3r-4r. In the C text of this note (Notebook 13, §17), Gramsci quotes his own translation of this whole passage.

2. A very important part of the background of this note is Lenin's polemical work against economism, What Is to Be Done^ (1902), with its critical assessment of social democratic politics and trade union politics. Prior to his arrest (but not while in prison) Gramsci possessed a copy of the French translation of this work by Lenin, Que faired (Paris: Librairie de PHumanité, 1925).

3. See Gaetano Salvemini, La rivoluzione francese (ij88-i792)r 3d ed. (Milan: Signorelli, 1913). This was one of the books discussed at the Club of Moral Life, which Gramsci organized toward the end of 1917； see Gramsci's March 18 letter to Giuseppe Lombardo Radice.

4. See Albert Mathiez, La revolution frangaise, vol. i. La chute de la royauté (Paris: Colin, 1922), a copy of which Gramsci had while in prison. Mathiez makes the following observation on the revolutionary significance of the events of August io, 1792, when the Tuileries Palace was stormed and the monarchy deposed:

Ce nzetait pas seulement le parti feuillant, c'est-à-dire la haute bourgeoisie et la noblesse libérale, qui était écrasé avec la royauté sous le canon du io aout, le parti Girondin lui-mème, qui avait transigè avec la Cour in. extremis et qui s^était efforcé d'emp仓eher Finsurrection, sortait amoindri dzune victoire qui nzétait pas son oeuvre et qui lui avait été imposée.

Les citoyens passifs, c^st-à-dire lés prolétaires, enrolés par Robespierre et les Montagnards, avaient pris largement leur revanche du massacre du Champs-de-Mars de Pannée précédente. La chute du tròne avait la valeur dzune Révolution nouvelle. La démoc-ratie pointait à Fhorizon. (p. 217)

5. See especially Notebook i, §44, §uoz §114-§115, and §117-§119.

6. Comparisons between the Action Party and the Moderates (here called the Piedmontese party") are an important feature of Gramsci's analysis of the Risorgimento and its outcome； see, for example, Notebook I, §43 and §44, and Notebook 3, §125.

7，Mathiez, La chute de la loyauté, p. 13:

Un signe infaillible que le pays s'enrichit, czest que la population augment。rapidement et que le prix de denrees, des terres et des maisons subit une Hausse constante. La France renferme déjà 25 millions d'habitants, deux fois autant que PAngleterre ou que la Prusse. Le bien-ètre descend peu à peu de la haute bourgeoisie dans la moyenne e dans la petite. On s'habille mieux, on se nourrit mieux qu'autrefois. Surtout on s'instruit. Les filles de la roture, qu'on appelle maintenant demoiselles pourvu qu'elles portent des paniers, achètent des pianos. La plus-value des impots de consummation atteste les progrès de Faisance.— Ce n'est dans un pays épuisé, mais -au contraire dans un pays florissant, en plein essor, quzeclatera la Révolution, La misere, qui détermine parfois des émeutes, ne peut pas provoquer les grands bouleversements sociaux. Ceux-ci naissent toujours du déséquilibre des classes.

8. In this edition, the Italian terms "sindacato" and smdacalismoff are almost always rendered into English as "trade union" and "trade unionism." In this instance, however, "syndicalism" has been used because Gramsci's phrase ^theoretical syndicalism" refers to a specific—though loosely organized and variegated—current in the organized labor movement. Two important facets of the syndicalism to which Gramsci refers were an insistence on the primacy of industrial struggle and a scorn for the role of the poEtical party； indeed, the syndicalists disdained "politics" as such and glorified direct action. (Lenin dealt with syndicalism in many of his writings, and he was especially harsh in his condemnation of anarcho-syndicalism and of the syndicalists' economistic views.) In. Italy, syndicalism was strongly influenced by the ideas of Georges Sorel and by the anarchist tradition. The ranks of the Italian syndicalist movement produced many nationalists and interventionists during the years leading to World War I and quite a number of militant Fascists in the postwar period. Gramsci's conviction that the syndicalist approach was ineffective and misguided comes through clearly in the following passages from his unfinished essay "Alcuni temi della questione meridionale77 ("Some Aspects of the Southern Question"):

No mass action is possible if the masses themselves are not convinced of the goals they want to achieve and of the methods that need to be applied. In order to be able to become a governing class, the proletariat must rid itself of every residue of corporatism, every syndicalist prejudice and incrustation. What does this mean? It means that the distinctions that exist between one trade and another must be overcome. But not only: in order to win the trust and the consent of the peasants and of some semiproletarian urban cate-goriesz it is also necessary to overcome certain prejudices and to defeat certain forms of egoism that can and do subsist within the working class as such, even after the disappearance of narrow craft distinctions. The metalworker, the carpenter, the construction worker, etc., must not only think as proletarians and no longer as metalworker, carpenter, construction worker, etc.； they must also take another step forward: they must think as workers who belong to a class that aims to lead the peasants and the intellectuals, a class that can be victorious and can build socialism only if it is helped and followed by the great majority of these social strata. If this is not achieved, the proletariat will not become the leading class, and these strata~which in Italy represent the majority of the populationwill remain under bourgeois leadership, thus enabling the state to resist the proletarian drive and wear it down....

If you look closely, the most radical crises in the socialist and workers' movement occurred in the decade 1900-1910. The masses reacted spontaneously against the policies of the reformist leaders. Syndicalism was born； it was the instinctive, rudimentary primitive but healthy expression of the workers7 reaction against the bloc of alliance with the bourgeoisie and in favor of a bloc with the peasants, and first and foremost with the southern peasants. Exactly so. Indeed? in a certain sense, syndicalism is a weak attempt by the southern peasants, represented by their most advanced intellectuals, to lead the proletariat. Who forms the leading nucleus of Italian syndicalism? What is the ideological essence of Italian syndicalism? The leading nucleus of syndicalism is made up almost exclusively of southerners: Labriola, Leone, Longobardi, Orano. The ideological essence of syndicalism is a new liberalism, more energetic, more aggressive, more pugnacious than traditional liberalism. If you look closely, two fundamental issues are at the center of the successive crises of syndicalism and the gradual passage of the syndicalist leaders into the bourgeois camp: emigration and free trade, two issues closely linked to southernism. The phenomenon of emigration gave rise to Enrico Corradini's concept of ^proletarian nation”； the Libyan war was seen by a whole layer of intellectuals as the beginning of the "great proletariat'soffensive against the capitalist and plutocratic world. A whole group of syndicalists went over to nationalism； indeed, the Nationalist Party was originally made up of ex-syndicalist intellectuals.

9. Gramsci is referring, in particular, to Henri De Man's book The Psychology of Socialism, trans. E. Paul and C. Paul (London: Allen and Unwin, 1928), which he discusses extensively in this and other notebooks.

10. The Vatican's non expedit, which prohibited Catholics from participating in. national electoral politics, was relaxed somewhat in 1904 and tacitly withdrawn in 1913 (with the Gentiloni Pact)； however, it remained official church policy until 1919.

11. Karl Marx, chap. 2, §5, Strikes and Combinations of Workers/7 in The Poverty of Philosophy, in K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers,工976), 6：2io-ii:

The first attempts by workers to associate among themselves always takes place in the form of combinations.

Large-scale industry concentrates in one place a crowd of people unknown to one another. Competition divides their interests. But ' the maintenance of wages, this common interest they have against their boss, unites them in a common thought of resistance—combination. Thus combination always has a double aim, that of stopping competition among workers, so that they can carry on general competition with the capitalist. If the first aim was merely the maintenance of wages, combinations/ at first isolated, constitute themselves into groups as the capitalists in their turn unite for the purpose of repression, and in the face of always united capital, the maintenance of the association becomes more necessary to them than that of wages. This is so true that English economists are amazed to see the workers sacrifice a good part of their wages in favour of associations, which, in the eyes of these economists, are established solely in favour of wages. In this struggle—a veritable civil war—all the elements necessary for a coming battle unite and develop. Once it has reached this point, association takes on a political character.

12. See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, chap. 4/ §4/ /zProudhon/z and chap. 6, §3 (d), "Critical Battle Against French Materialism/7 in The Holy Family； or, Critique of Critical Criticism, in K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1975), 4:23-54, 1^4-34.

On translations of The Holy Family owned by Gramsci, see Notebook I, §29, n. 2.

13. Gramsci is referring to Frederick Engels's letters to Joseph Bloch, September 21, 1890, and to Heinz Starkenburg, January 25, 1894； see Notebook 4, §26, n. 1.

14. See Karl Marx's preface to A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy (New York: International Publishers, 1970), p. 21. The relevant passage (which is among the selections from Marx's writings that Gramsci later translated in Notebook 7) is quoted in Notebook 4, §15, n. 7.

15. See? for example. Notebook 4, §3.

16. "Historical economism,/ is the term used by Achille Loria to describe his economic and sociological theories. In his writings, Loria professed great admiration for Marx, but he also claimed to have identified serious problems with the economic theories expounded in Capital^ problems that he purported to solve, thus enabling socialist economic theory to progress beyond Marx. For a refutation of Loria怎”reading" of Marx, see Frederick Engels, preface and ^Supplement and Addendum to Volume 3 of Capital/' in Karl Marx, Capital^ trans. D. Fernbach (New York: Penguin, 1991)/ 3：9工th, 1027-47.

17. The article by Loria to which Gramsci is referring was in fact first published in 1910； see Achille Loria, “Le influenze sociali dell'aviazione” (The social effects of aviation), Rassegna Contemporanea 3, no. i (January 1910): 20-28. On this article and Gramsci's criticism of it in his journalistic writings, see Notebook i, §25, n. 2.

18. Antonio Laviosa, “L'estrazione del petrolio/z (The extraction of petroleum), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1372 (May i6, 1929): 254-62.

19. See "La mania del prestigio/, (The fixation with prestige). Rassegna Settimanale della Stampa Estera 5/ no. 42 (October 21,1930): 2303-4. The Rassegna Settimanale della Stampa Estera (Weekly review of the foreign press) was published by the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.

20. Gramsci is probably referring, as he does earlier in this note, to Frederick Engels's letters to Joseph Bloch, September 21, 1890, and Heinz Starkenburg, January 25, 1894. But he may also be thinking of Engels's letter to Conrad Schmidt, August 5/ 1890. For an English translation of this letter, see K. Marx and F. Engels, Correspondence: 1846-18^^ trans. D. Torr (New York: International Publishers, 1936), pp. 472-75. In this letter (which was frequently quoted in Marxist literature) Engels wrote, among other things:

In general the word materialistic serves many of the younger writers in Germany as a mere phrase with which anything and everything is labelled without further study； they stick on this label and then think the question disposed of. But our conception of history is above all a guide to study, not a lever for construction after the maimer of the Hegelians. All history must be studied afresh, the conditions of existence of the different formations of society must be individually examined before the attempt is made to deduce from them the political, civil-legal, aesthetic, philosophic, religious, etc., notions corresponding to them. Only a little has been. done here up to now because only a few people have got down to it seriously. In this field we can utilise masses of help, it is immensely big and anyone who will work seriously can achieve a lot and distinguish himself. But instead of this only too many of the younger Germans simply make use of the phrase, historical materialism (and everything can be turned into a phrase), in order to get their own relatively scanty historical knowledge (for economic history is still in its cradle!) fitted together into a neat system as quickly as possible, and they then think themselves something very tremendous.

21. See Lenin, What Is to Be Donel

22. The Boulangist movement was a short-lived but powerful force on the French political scene in the late 1880s—so powerful, in fact, that it came close to toppling the Third Republic. The popularity of Georges Boulanger (1837-91) rose rapidly after his appointment as minister of war in 1886, largely because he made himself the de facto leader of the revanche movement against German occupation of Alsace-Lorraine. Afraid that he might inflame the nation to the point of war and worried by his relations with a whole array of dissident elements (monarchists, Bonapartists, and some leftists), the government dismissed him from the war ministry and, soon afterward, from the army. Meanwhile, however, Boulanger won election to the Chamber of Deputies and formed a political party that campaigned for sweeping constitutional, military, and administrative reforms. The Boulangists' success in the elections of January 1889 led to massive popular demonstrations in streets, with the crowds urging Boulanger to seize government power. The immediate danger of a coup subsided as Boulanger refrained from instant action. Once a new cabinet was formed the following month, the government started taking steps to suppress the threat to state security posed by Boulanger and his allies. Fearing arrest, Boulanger fled to Belgium on April i, 1889, and within a year his raovement had all but ceased to exist.

23. The events culminating in Louis Napoleoni coup dzétat on December 2, 1851, are the subject of Karl Marx's historical-critical study, The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte (1852).

24. Georges Valois (1878-1945), a French revolutionary syndicalist close to Sorel, founder of the "Cercle Proudhon" and the journal Cahiers du Cercle Proudhon, formulated extreme antidemocratic, antiparliamentarian positions that led him to forge alliances with monarchists and other exponents of the far right, including the Action Frangaise circle. After he broke off with. the Action Frangaise in 1925 he organized a movement called 〃Le Faisceau" that derived its inspiration drectly from Italian Fascism. (Gramsci fleetingly mentions Georges Valois's relations with. the Action Fran^aise in Notebook i, §48/ and Notebook 2, §74.)

General Rudolf Gajda was the commander of the Czech legionnaires in Siberia who fought for the anti-Bolshevik leader Aleksandr Kolchak during the Russian civil war. In the 1920s he was discharged from the Czech army for plotting a military putsch. He subsequently formed a fascist party that won three parliamentary seats in the Czech national elections of 1929.

25. L& Lenin's.

§39. On the Popular Manual

i. These words, which are missing in the manuscript, are supplied on the basis of the C text version of this note； see Notebook n, §33.

§40. Philosophy and ideology

i. Frederick Engels, Anti-Dühring (New York: International Publishers, 1939), pp. 309-10:

The seizure of the means of production by society puts an end to commodity production, and therewith to the domination of the product over the producer. Anarchy in social production is replaced by conscious organisation on a planned basis. The struggle for individual existence comes to an end. And at this point, in a certain sense, man finally cuts himself off from the animal world, leaves the conditions of animal existence behind him and enters conditions which are really human. The conditions of existence forming man怎 environment, which up to now have dominated man, at this point pass under the dominion and control of man, who now for the first time becomes the real conscious master of Nature, because and in so far as he has become master of his own. social organisation. The laws of his own social activity, which have hitherto confronted him as external, dominating laws of Nature, will then be applied by man with complete understanding, and hence will be dominated by man. Men's own social organisation which has hitherto stood in opposition to them as if arbitrarily decreed by Nature and history, will then become the voluntary act of men themselves. The objective, external forces which have hitherto dominated history, will then pass under the control of men themselves. It is only from this point that men? with full consciousness, will fashion their own history； it is only from this point that the social causes set in motion by men will have, predominantly and in constantly increasing measure, the effects willed by men. It is humanity's leap from the realm of necessity into the realm of freedom.

The same passage (which is the conclusion of part 3, chap. 2, of Anti-Dühring] is also included in Engels's Socialism: Utopian and Scientific (1892), of which Gramsci owned (but did not have with him in prison) two Italian editions: Socialismo utopistico e socialismo scientifico, trans. P. Martignetti (Milan: Società Editrice Avanti, 1920), and devoluzione del socialismo dall'utopia alla scienza (Milan: Seum, 1925).

2. In his book on modernism and the relations between philosophy and religion, Il modernismo e i rapporti tra religione e filosofia (Bari: Laterza, 1909}, Giovanni Gentile writes:

Catholicism remains the most noteworthy, if not the only surviving historical form of religion in Western civilization, the most noteworthy and maybe the only one that for centuries has stood against the development of the absolute form of the spirit—i.e.z philosophy—impeding its progress or battling against it in the practical-social sphere. For this reason, one might say, modernism is one of the great fatal confrontations that, in the history of humanity, must necessarily take place between religion, which is the philosophy of the multitudes, and philosophy, which is the religion of the spirit or, to put it another way the religion of its highest exponents, (p. $4)

§41. Science

i. Bertrand Russell, The Problems of Philosophy (New York: Henry Holt, 1911), pp.工52-54:

Consider such a proposition as "Edinburgh is north of London/7 Here we have a relation between two places, and it seems plain that the relation subsists independently of our knowledge of it. When we come to know that Edinburgh is north of London, we come to know something which has to do only with Edinburgh and London: we do not cause the truth of the proposition. by coming to know it, on the contrary we merely apprehend a fact which was there before we knew it. The part of the earth's surface where Edinburgh stands would be north of where London stands, even if there were no human being to know about north and south, and even if there were no minds at all in the universe. This is, of course, denied by many philosophers, either for Berkeley's reasons or for Kant怎.But we have already considered these reasons, and decided that they are inadequate. We may therefore now assume it to be true that nothing mental is presupposed in the fact that Edinburgh is north of London. But this fact involves the relation "north of/7 which is a universal； and it would be impossible for the whole fact to involve nothing mental if the relation "north of," which is a constituent part of the fact, did involve anything mental. Hence we must admit that the relation, like the terms it relates, is not dependent upon thought, but belongs to the independent world which thought apprehends but does not create.

This conclusion, however, is met by the difficulty that the relation "north of" does not seem to exist in the same sense in which Edinburgh and London exist. If we ask "Where and when does this relation exist?,z the answer must be "Nowhere and nowhen.There is no place or time where we can find the relation "north of.〃 It does not exist in Edinburgh any more than in London, for it relates the two and is neutral as between them. Nor can. we say that it exists at any particular time. Now everything that can be apprehended by the senses or by introspection exists at some particular time. Hence the relation zznorth of〃 is radically different from such things. It is neither in space nor in time, neither material nor mental； yet it is something.

It is largely the very peculiar kind of being that belongs to universals which has led many people to suppose that they are really mental.

Gramsci's parenthetical remark indicates that he read this passage (probably prior to his arrest since he is here citing it from memory) in the Italian translation of RusselLs work: I problemi della filosofia, trans. B. Ceva (Milan: Sonzogno, 1922). Gramsci alludes to this same passage again in. Notebook 7/ §25.

§42・ Giovanni Vailati and scientific language

1. See Notebook i, §44 and §151； Notebook 3/ §48； and Notebook 4, §3. For the relevant passage from The Holy Family and for Gramsci's related comments in a letter to Tatiana Schucht, see Notebook i, §44, n. 38.

2. Luigi Einaudi, "Se esista, storicamente, la pretesa ripugnanza degli economisti verso il concetto dello Stato produttore: Lettera aperta a R. Benini” (The supposed repugnance of economists toward the concept of state as producer: Does it exist, historically? An open letter to R. Benini), Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica 3, no. 5 (September-October 1930): 302-14. This article is followed (in the same issue of Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica) by a response from Rodolfo Benini,

Coesione e solidarietà^ (Cohesiveness and solidarity), pp. 315-20； and by Ugo Spirito^ article 〃La storia della economia e il concetto di Stato” (The history of economics and the concept of state), pp. 321-24.

On Luigi Einaudi, see Notebook iz §n7 n. 1.

3. Giovanni Vailati (1863-1909), a mathematician and philosopher, described himself as a pragmatist. In his writings he stressed the importance of refining the methodologies of scientific and philosophical research, the primary purpose of which, in his view, was to develop useful instruments capable of reliably predicting or anticipating future phenomena. Vailati also advocated a scientific approach to language aimed at eliminating errors and misunderstandings stemming from the ambiguity of terminology. Through his friend Mario Calderoni, Vailati had close contacts with the circle of intellectuals associated with the Florentine journal Leonardo (edited by Giovanni Papini). Both Calderoni and Vailati wrote for Leonardo,

Prior to his imprisonment, Gramsci owned a book that contained some of Vailati/s writings on pragmatism: Mario Calderoni and Giovanni Vallati, Il pragmatismo, ed. Giovanni Papini (Lanciano: Carabba, 1915).

4. On Ugo Spirito, see Notebook if §132, n. 2.

5. On Achille Loria, see Notebook iz §25, n. 1.

6. On Giuseppe Prezzolini^s II linguaggio come causa dferrore: H. Bergson (Florence: Spinelli, 1904), and on Vilfredo Pareto (including his discussion of scientific language), see Notebook 4/ §18/ n. 6.

7. See Ugo Spirito, 〃La storia della economia e il concetto di Stato” (The history of economics and the concept of State), Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica 3, no. 5 (September-October 1930): 321-24.

§43. The ^objectivity of the real77 and Prof. Lukàcs

1. Gramsci is referring to p. 7sr of his manuscript； see Notebook 4, §41.

2. Georg Lukacsz "What is Orthodox Marxism?” in History and Class Consciousness, trans. R. Livingstone (Cambridge, Mass.: mit Press, 1971), p. 24 n. 6: 〃It is of the first importance to realise that the [dialectical] method is limited here to the realms of history and society. The misunderstandings that arise from Engels7 account of dialectics can in the main be put down to the fact that Engels—following HegePs mistaken lead— extended the method to apply also to nature. However, the crucial determinants of dialectics—the interaction of subject and object, the unity of theory and practice, the historical changes in the reality underlying the categories as the root cause of changes in thought, etc.一are absent from our knowledge of nature/7

Whatever knowledge Gramsci may have had of Lukacs's History and Class Consciousnessf it was surely partial and secondhand. Most probably, however, he was familiar with at least one of the essays collected in Lukacszs volume: an Italian translation of "The Marxism of Rosa Luxemburg” (pp. 27-45 in the edition cited above) was published in three parts in Rassegna Communista iz no. 14 (November 30, 1921): 681-86； i, no. 15 (December 15/ 1921): 727-34； and i, no. 16 (December 30, 1921): 754~57- Another essay by Lukäcs (but one that is not included in History and Class Consciousness) that Gramsci almost certainly read is "The Question of Parliamentarianism/ which originally appeared in Kommunismus 1, no. 6 (1920)； it was translated into Italian as "Sulla questione del parlamentarismo" and published in three parts in II Soviet 3, no. 12 (April 25z 1920)； 3/ no. 13 (May 务 1920)； and 3, no. 14 (May 16, 1920). The following passage from "The Question of Parliamentarianism/, was reprinted (presumably on. Gramsci's own initiative or at least with his editorial approval) in LOrdine Nuovo 2, no. 5 (June 12, 1920): 40:

As organizations of the entire proletariat (both conscious and unconscious) the workers7 councils by their mere existence point the way forward beyond bourgeois society. They are by their very nature revolutionary and organizational expressions of the growing significance, the ability to act, and the power of the proletariat. As such, they are the true index of the progress of the revolution. For everything that is achieved and attained in the workers7 councils is wrested from the defiant grasp of the bourgeoisie and is therefore valuable not simply as a result but chiefly as a means of education for class-conscious action. Attempts (like those of the Independent Socialist Party of Germany) to "anchor the workers' councils in the constitution// to assign them a legally established field of activity, therefore indicate a new peak in ''parliamentary cretinism// Legality is the death of the workers' councils. As an offensive organization of the revolutionary proletariat the workers' council can exist only insofar as it threatens the existence of bourgeois society, only insofar as it struggles for and prepares, step by step, the destruction of that society and hence the construction of the proletarian society. Legality in any shape or form—i.e.z integration into bourgeois society, with precisely defined limits to its competence—would transform its existence into a sham: the workers7 council would turn into a cross between a debating society and a poor man's parliamentary committee.

"The Question of Parliamentarianism^ is available in English in Georg Lukacs, Political Writings: 1919-1929, ed. R. Livingstone, trans. M. McColgan (London: nlb, 1972), pp. 53-63.

In all probability, Gramsci knew of the harsh attack (provoked by the critical comments on Engels in History and Class Consciousness} on what was termed Lukacs's ^theoretical revisionism" made by Zinoviev in a report to the Fifth Congress of the Third International in 1924； see La Conespondance Internationale 4/ no. 43 (July 10, 1924): 440. It is also likely that Gramsci had read the fiercely critical article against Lukäcs (again focusing on the unorthodox views expressed in History and Class Consciousness) by Abraham Deborins in his article /zLukäcs und seine Kritik des Marxismus,z, published in the Viennese journal Arb eiter-literatui 10 (1924). Lukacs's criticism of Engels in his controversial book is also mentioned in the first part of a two-part article by Enrico De' Negri, “Recenti studi tedeschi sul marxismo” (Recent German studies on Marxism), in Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica if no. 1 (November 1927): 132-44； the second part of this article is one of the sources used by Gramsci in Notebook io, II, §33.

3. Georg Lukäcs wrote a review of N. Bukharin's Theorie des historischen Materialismus: Gemeinverständliches Lehrbuch der marxistischen Soziologie [Historical Materialism: A System of Sociology} that was published in Archiv für Geschichte des Sozialismus und der Arbeiterbewegung ii (1925). (For an English translation, see Lukäcs, Political Writings, pp. 134-42.) It is quite possible that Gramsci read Lukacs's book review or was told about it while he was in the Soviet Union or in Vienna. In any case, some of Gramsci's own criticisms of Bukharin's book are very similar to Lukacszs. Lukäcs, for example, bemoans the fact that "Bukharin's tendency to simplification is not confined to marginal ideological creations, but encroaches on central questions. More specifically, Lukäcs, like Gramsci after him, objects strongly to Bukharin's misconception of "science" and to his treatment of the question of "technique” (what Gramsci sometimes calls the ^technical instrument,). Lukäcs writes, among other things:

The closeness of Bukharin's theory to bourgeois, natural-scientific materialism derives from his use of 〃science〃 (in the French sense) as a model. In its concrete application to society and history it therefore frequently obscures the specific feature of Marxism: that all economic or Msociological phenomena derive from the social relations of men to one another. Emphasis on a false "objectivity" in theory leads to fetishism.

The discussion of the role of technique in social development highlights these remnants of undissolved quiddity ... and false z/objectivityBukharin attributes to technology a far too determinant position, which completely misses the spirit of dialectical materialism.

Lukäcs also anticipates Gramsci when he points out that a fundamental methodological error of Bukharin is his use of the natural sciences as a model for the construction of a z/generai sociology" that he misguidedly identifies with Marxism as such.

§44. Sorel

1. Spectator (pseudonym of Mario Missiroli), 〃Clemenceau/ Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1386 (December 16, 1929): 478-99； and Mario Missiroli, "Sorel e Clemenceau/7 LItalia Letteraria i, no. 37 (December 15, 1929). Gramsci also comments on these two articles in Notebook 5, §126.

2. These two passages by Sorel are, in fact, not taken from letters he wrote to Missiroli but from a single article published in II Resto del Carlino, June i, 1919, and later reprinted in Georges Sorel, LEuropa sotto la tormenta, ed. Mario Missiroli (Milan: Corbaccio, 1932), pp. 123-32.

On Jean Jaurès, see Notebook §75, n. 4.

3. On Sorel怎 letters to Croce, published in La Critica, see Notebook 2/ §74z n. 2. Of particular interest in this context is SoreFs letter to Croce of August 22, 1909, published in La Critica 26, no. 5 (September 20, 1928): nVous allez recevoir un volume curieux écrit par un jeune royaliste sur la monarchie et la classe ouvrière； G. Valois est un employé de commerce, dont la valeur littéraire est sérieuse； il s'illusionne certainement sur les conséquences que peuvent avoir les relations de quelques syndicalistes révolutionnaires avec les royalistes de YAction fran^aise} mais son livre renferme pas mal d，observations qui montrent que Pauteur a une intelligence élevée et perspicace. Il m'a demandò de le recommander à quelques critiques Italiens； je vous serais oblige si vous pouviez lire son ouvrage et en parler" (pp. 334-35). See also, in the same issue of La Critica, SoreFs letters of September s, 1910, and January 25, 1911, where he discusses plans to launch a new journal in collaboration with some monarchists associ-ated with the Action Frangaise group. (The journal, which was to be entitled La cité frangaise, never appeared.)

On Georges Valois, see Notebook 4/ §3& n. 24.

4. See Edouard Berth, Les méfaits des intellectuels (Paris: Rivière, 1914). Berth's book is dedicated to Sorel, who contributed a preface to it.

Edouard Berth had been a contributor to La Rivoluzione Liberale, the Turin political journal founded and edited by Gramsci's friend Piero Gobetti. One of Berth's books, La France au milieu du monde, was brought out by Gobetti's publishing house in. 1924, and Gobetti wrote at some length about it in La Rivoluzione Liberale 4, no. 7 (February 15, 1925).

§45. Structure and superstructures

1. Gramsci is referring to an observation made by Engels at the conclusion of chapter 2 of part 3 of Anti-Dühring. See Frederick Engels, Anti-Dühring (New York: International Publishers, 1939), pp. 309-10. Gramsci alludes to the same passage in Notebook 4, §40； see n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

2. On the significance of these phrases for Gramsci (who derives them from Marx), see Notebook 7, §21.

3. V. I. Lenin (Ilyich in Gramsci's encryption), "Materials Relating to the Revision of the Party Programme/7 in Selected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1943), 6:118: "Free and compulsory general and technical education (familiarizing the student with the theoretical and practical aspects of the most important branches of industry) for all children of both sexes up to the age of sixteen； education to be closely associated with the performance by children of socially productive labour. Leninas text was first published in 1917 (a search for the ^Geneva edition” mentioned by Gramsci proved fruitless). The reference to Lavoisier is not in Lenin/s text but in the explanatory notes prepared by N. Krupskaya, which are not included in the available English editions of Lenin's writings. These notes have been published in N. Krupskaya, Pedagogiceskje socinenja (Moscow, 1957), pp. 424-26.

Antoine-Laurent Lavoisier (1743-94), the French chemist, became a member of the provincial assembly of Orléans in 1787 and was engaged in numerous civic activities and projects, including some involving the improvement of hygiene and public education. He was arrested and executed (with several others) by order of the Revolutionary Convention because he was a member of the detested tax-collecting government agency known as the Ferme Générale.

4. Benedetto Croce, Cultura e vita morale, 2d ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1926), p. 45: “The horror of positivism (since I have allowed myself to be carried away by confessions and memories, I will add one more thing； perhaps this expresses the feelings shared by several others who have suffered the same spiritual travails), my horror of positivism became so violent that for several years it even stifled my democratic leanings, which have always been natural to my heart. fOmnis enim Philosophia (I once read in an old German doctoral dissertation) cum ad communem hominum cogitandi facultatem revocet, per se democratica est； ideoque ab optimatibus non iniuna sìbi existimatur perniciosa/ 〃

Gramsci had a copy of this book by Croce in prison, and he reproduces this quote in Latin in Notebook 6, §82, and Notebook 7, §38.

§46. Philosophy—politics—economics

1. See Notebook 4, §42.

2. See Rosa Luxemburg怎 essay /zStillstand und Fortschritt im Marxismus/7 first published iri Vorwärts, March 14, 1903. In all probability Gramsci read Luxemburg's essay in a collection of writings on Marx edited by D. Ryazanov: Karl Marx homme, penseur et révolutionnaire (Paris: Editions Sociales Internationales, 1928). For an English translation, see ''Stagnation and Progress of Marxism,in Karl Marx: Man, Thinker and Revolutionist, ed. D. Ryazanov, trans. Eden and Cedar Paul (New York: International Publishers, 1927), and in Rosa Luxemburg Speaks, ed. Mary-Alice Waters (New York: Pathfinder, 1970). The relevant passage is quoted in Notebook 3, §31, n. 7.

§47. The objectivity of the real and Engels

i. Frederick Engels, Anti-Dühimg (New York: International Publishers’ 1939)/ part I, chap. 4, p. 51: “The real unity of the world consists in its materiality, and this is proved not by a few juggling phrases, but by a long and protracted development of philosophy and natural science/' Gramsci quotes this passage textually in the C text version of this note； see Notebook n, §34.

§48. Henn De Man's book

i. Z/Per la pace sociale” (For social peace). La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (September 7, 1929): 395). This unsigned article (in fact, written by the Jesuit priest, Angelo Bmcculeri), is discussed by Gramsci in Notebook a, §131.

In his article, Brucculeri refers to the book by Henri De Man, Il superamento del marxismo, 2 vols. (Bari: Laterza, 1929). On the editions (with different titles) of De Man's work in various languages, see Notebook i, §6i, n. 13.

2. Giuseppe Prezzolini describes André Philip as a "Christian democratz, in the course of his review of Georges Duhamel怎 Scenes de la vie future (Paris: Mercure de France, 1930) in the "Libri” (Books) section of Pègaso 2, no. 9 (September 1930): 383. Prezzoimi alludes to Andre Philip's Le problème ouviiex aux Etats-Unis (Paris: Alcan,工927), a book Gramsci had in prison that he cites on a number of occasions in the notebooks. See, inter alia, Notebook i, §51, and im. 4 and 5 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

On Giuseppe Prezzolili, see Notebook iz §8/ n. 1.

3.    tramonto del marxismo(The decline of Marxism), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (October 5, 1929): 36-45； and 80 (November 16, 1929): 320-29. This article is among the publications on De Man's work listed in Notebook 4, §2.

4.    tramonto del marxismo,ff La Civiltà Cattolica (October 5, 1929): 36.

5. "H tramonto del marxismo” La Civiltà Cattolica (November i6z 1929): 329. (The italicized phrase at the end is a quotation from Dante's Paradiso, canto 33, 87 J

§49. The intellectuals

1. On Giovanni Agnelli, see Notebook iz §50, n. 2.

2. The phrase "trained gorilla" has its origins in Frederick W. Taylor's Principles of Scientific Management (New York: Harper, 1911): "This work is so crude and elementary in its nature that the writer firmly believes that it would be possible to train an intelligent gorilla so as to become a more efficient pig-iron handler than any man could ben (p. 40). Gramsci, who did not have access to Taylor's work, encountered the phrase in André Philip, Leproblème ouvxier aux Etats-Unis (Paris: Alcan, 1927), a book he had in prison that he cites several times in the notebooks: ^Uouvrier se trouve ainsi absorbé dans un engrenage mécanique qu'il doit subir sans essayer de le comprendre； ceci conduit à une dégradation de la fonction ouvrière dans la vie industrielle du pays, à une diminution de la personnalité qui pourrait devenir ePune extreme gravite. Taylor n'est-il-pas alle jusqu'A dire que bientót un gorille entraìné poxurait faire le travail actuellement effectué par un. ouvrier?f/ (p. 224), The phrase "trained gorilla" is also mentioned in a review of André Philip's book published in Nuova Rivista Storica 13, no. i (January-February 1929): 124.

3. Z/Conceitedness?/ is used here to render Gramsci's aboriai which he, too, places in quotes； it is a term derived from and meant to echo Vico's observations on the conceit of nations." See especially The New Science of Giambattista Vico, trans. Thomas G. Bergin and Max H. Fisch (Ithaca, N.Y,: Cornell University Press, 1968), p. 61: Z/On the conceit [bona] of nations, there is a golden saying of Diodorus Siculus. Every nation, according to him, has had the same conceit that it before all nations invented the comforts of human life and that its remembered history goes back to the very beginning of the world."

4. Gramsci had written on this topic in 1926 in his unfinished essay /zAlcuni temi della questione meridionaleSome Aspects of the Southern Question"). For a translation of an especially relevant passage, see Notebook i, §43, n. 11.

5. Gramsci is referring to p. 6yr of his manuscript； see Notebook 4, §38.

6. See, especially. Notebook 2, §116 and §117； Notebook 3, §117, §126, and §141； and Notebook 5/ §3。，§37/ §74, §82, §83, and §100. All of these were written prior to this note.

7. Gramsci's disclaimer here is very similar to his cautionary remarks at the end of Notebook 4/ §i6； see also the first page of Notebook 11 and the opening paragraph of Notebook 8.

8. Gramsci later incorporated most of his scattered notes on American intellectuals in Notebook 22, which he entitled ^Americanism and Fordism."

9. On Kulturkampf see Notebook i, §sz n. 2.

10. On Plutarco Calles, whose implementation of the Mexican constitution's provisions on religion and education triggered a violent struggle with the Catholic Church, see Notebook i, §107, n. 3.

11. Seez especially, Notebook 3, §5.

12. Gramsci is referring to Notebook 3, §28.

§50. The common school

1. Gramsci's term "scuola unitana,f (translated here as z/common school") could also be rendered as ^comprehensive school" or, perhaps, as "unified school/7 It should be kept in mind that Gramsci's notes on education often contain an implicit critique of the education reform enacted by the Fascist government on May 6, 1923. The reform was designed primarily by the philosopher and ideologue Giovanni Gentile, who at the time was Mussolini's minister of education. One of the salient features of the ^riforma Gentile/7 as it was frequently called, was its separation of technical and vocational or professional training from "classical" education (the latter was reserved for the preparation of select students who were meant to move on to the universities).

2. Giovanni Gentile emphasized the importance of /zactive education” while condemning traditional pedagogy, which, in his view, assigned students a purely passive role.

§52. Americanism and Fordism

i. Le., Leon Trotsky.

2. With the civil war nearing its end and the Soviet economy in shambles, Trotsky put forward a plan to militarize the labor force and subordinate the trade unions to state control. The proposal was fiercely opposed by the Mensheviks and triggered a bitter dispute within the Bolshevik ranks. Lenin, who was initially sympathetic to the idea, repudiated it in the party's Central Committee in November 1920. The whole issue was rendered irrelevant by the economic policies advanced by Lenin and endorsed by the Tenth Party Congress in March 1921.

Trotsky explained his views on the militarization of labor more or less systematically and at considerable length in his book Terroiism and Communism, a fierce polemic against Karl Kautsky written in 1920 and soon afterward widely disseminated among communist circles in several translations. Gramsci did not have this book in prison, but he had almost certainly read it years earlier in the Italian translation: Terrorismo e comuniSmo: Anti-Kautsky (Milan: Società Editrice Avanti, 1921). The English version of this work by Trotsky has appeared under three different titles: Dictatorship vs Democracy (New York: Workers Party, 1921)； The Defence of Terrorism (London: Allen and Unwin, 1921)； and Terrorism and Communism: A Reply to Karl Kautsky (Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press, 1961). Trotsky expounds his views on the militarization of labor in detail in chap. 8, Problems of the Organization of Labor: The Soviet Government and Industry.This chapter contains, among other things, Trotsky's report to the Third All-Russian Congress of Trade Unions and extracts from other reports he delivered at the All-Russian Congress of Economic Councils and at the Ninth Congress of the Communist Party. A substantial part of Trotsky's argument in this chapter appears in the form of an attack on the Menshevik Rafael Abramovich一not, as Gramsci erroneously recalls, against Yurii Martov (also a prominent Menshevik leader)—who at various congresses and trade union gatherings had criticized Trotsky's plans to form "labor armies/7

In Tenoiism and Communisin, Trotsky makes the following points’ among others:

The frightful pressure of war is becoming weaker. Economic requirements and problems are more and more coming to the fore. History is bringing us? along the whole line, to our fundamental problem— the organization of labor on new social foundations. The organization of labor is in its essence the organization of the new society: every historical form of society is in its foundation a form of organi--zation of labor. While every previous form of society was an organization. of labor in the interests of a minority, which organized its State apparatus for the oppression of the overwhelming majority of the workers, we are making the first attempt in world-history to organize labor in the interests of the laboring majority itself. This however does not exclude the element of compulsion in all its forms, both the most gentle and the extremely severe. The element of State compulsion not only does not disappear from the historical arena, but on the contrary will still play, for a considerable period, an extremely prominent part. (p. 133)

The very principle of compulsory labor service is for the Communist quite unquestionable. Z/He who works not, neither shall he eat/7 …. Compulsory labor service is sketched in our Constitution and in our Labor Code. But hitherto it has always remained a mere principle .... Only now, when along the whole line we have reached the question. of the economic re-birth of the country, have problems of compulsory labor service arisen before us in the most concrete way possible. The only solution, of economic difficulties that is correct from the point of view both of principle and of practice is to treat the population of the whole country as the reservoir of the necessary laborpower一an almost inexhaustible reservoir—and to introduce strict order into the work of its registration, mobilization, and utilization.

How are we practically to begin the utilization of labor-power on the basis of compulsory military service?

Hitherto only the War Department had any experience in the sphere of the registration, mobilization, formation, and transference from one place to another of large masses. These technical methods and principles were inherited by ow War Department, to a considerable extent, from the past.

In the economic sphere there is no such heritage； since in that sphere there existed the principle of private property, and laborpower entered each factory separately from the market. It is consequently natural that we should be obliged, at any rate during the first period, to make use of the apparatus of the War Department on. a large scale for labor mobilization, (pp. 135-36)

The question of the life or death of Soviet Russia is at present being settled on the labor front； our economic, and together with them our professional and productive organizations, have the right to demand from their members all that devotion, discipline, and executive thoroughness, which hitherto only the army required, (p. 141)

Without general labor service, without the right to order and demand fulfilment of orders, the trade unions will be transformed into a mere form without a reality； for the young Socialist State requires trade unions, not for a struggle for better conditions of labor—that is the task of the social and State organizations as a whole—but to organize the working class for the ends of production, to educate, discipline, distribute, group, retain certain categories and certain workers at their posts for fixed periods....

Consequently, comrades, militarization of labor, in the root sense indicated by me, is not the invention of individual politicians or an invention of our War Department, but represents the inevitable method of organization and disciplining of labor-power during the period of transition from capitalism to Socialism. And if the compulsory distribution of labor-power, its brief or prolonged retention at particular industries and factories, its regulation within the framework of the general State economic plan—if these forms of compulsion lead always and everywhere, as the Menshevik resolution states, to the lowering of productivity, then you can erect a monument over the grave of Socialism. For we cannot build Socialism on. decreased production. Every social organization. is in. its foundation an organization of labor, and if our new organization of labor leads to a lowering of productivity, it thereby most fatally leads to the destruction of the Socialist society we are building, whichever way we twist and turn, whatever measures of salvation we invent, (p. 143).

3. Indications of Trotsky怎 interest in Americanism can be found in several remarks scattered throughout his writings, including Terrorism and Communism. In that work he makes the following observations about Taylorism:

Finally, the bourgeoisie learned how to gain possession even of the trade unions—i.ev the organizations of the working class itself； and it made use of them on a large scale, particularly in Great Britain, to discipline the workers. It domesticated the leaders, and with their help inoculated the workers with the fiction of the necessity for peaceful organic labor, for a faultless attitude to their duties, and for a strict execution of the laws of the bourgeois State. The crown of all this work is Taylorism, in which the elements of the scientific organization of the process of production are combined with the most concentrated methods of the system of sweating, (p. 146)

Under capitalism, the system of piece-work and of grading, the application of the Taylor system, etc., have as their object to increase the exploitation of the workers by the squeezing-out of surplus value. Under Socialist production, piece-work, bonuses, etc., have as their problem to increase the volume of social product, and consequently to raise the general well-being. Those workers who do more for the general interest than others receive the right to a greater quantity of the social product than the lazy, the careless, and the disorganizers.

(P-工49)

A very pertinent observation by Trotsky on Americanism is found in a speech he delivered on July 28, 1924, which was published under the title "The Premisses of the Proletarian Revolution" in Izvestia, August 5,1924； it is quoted by Quintin Hoare in the critical apparatus of his edition of Antonio Gramsci, Selections from Political Writings: 1921-1926 (New York: International Publishers, 1978): /zIf we Americanize our still frail socialist industry, then we can say with tenfold confidence that the future is completely and decisively working in our favour. Americanized Bolshevism will crush and conquer imperialist Americanism” (pp. 492-93 n. 168). Gramsci alluded to this speech by Trotsky in his report to the Central Committee of February 6, 1925.

Trotsky's writings on "byt" (Russian for or "mode of living") to which Gramsci is referring consist of a series of articles he wrote for Pravda in the summer of 1923. The articles were published together soon afterward in a book entitled Voprosy Byta (Moscow, 1923) and translated into English by Z. Vergerova as Problems of Life (London, 1924)； they are also available in English in Leon Trotsky, Problems of Everyday Life and Other Writings on Culture and Science (New York: Monad, 1973).

Trotsky wrote extensively on literary topics； his best-known work on the subject is Literature and Revolution. (1923), which in the original Russian edition included a note by Gramsci on Italian futurism； see Notebook iz §i24z n, 1,

Gramsci also had close personal contact with Trotsky during the time he spent in Moscow (May 1922 to December 1923) as a delegate to the executive committee of the Third International. On Gramsci's relationship with Trotsky, see Frank Rosengarten, “The Gramsci-Trotsky Question (1922-1932),Social Text 11 (winter 1984-85): 65-95.

4. See Notebook 4, §49, n. 2.

5, Ina letter to Tatiana Schucht, October 20, 1930, Gramsci makes the following observations on "the new methods of work" and the "measures taken by the American industrialists ... like Ford/,:

He has a corps of inspectors who check on the private lives of the workers and impose on them a certain regimen: they control even the food, sleeping arrangements, the room size, the hours of rest； and even their most intimate affairs； whoever won't go along is fired and no longer has six dollars minimum daily salary. Ford pays a minimum of six dollars, but he wants people who know how to work, that is, who know how to coordinate work with their life regimen.

We Europeans are still too bohemian, we believe that we can do a certain kind of work and live as we please, like bohemians； naturally, machinism crushes usz and I mean machinism in a general sense, as scientific organization that also encompasses intellectual work. We are too romantic in an absurd way and not wanting to be petty bourgeois we fall into the most typical form of petty bourgeoisism that is precisely bohemianism.

6. This is a slightly modified version of the line on "easy and readily available love〃 in Horace's Satires, Iz ii: "namque parabilem amo venerem facilemque^ (line 119).

7. See Notebook i, §61.

8. Gramsci uses the English word turnover/7 which, in all likelihood, he derives from André Philip, Le problème ouvrier aux Etats-Ums (Paris: Alcan, 1927), p. 88ff.

§53. Concordats and international treaties

i. On February 11,1929, the Fascist government and the Holy See concluded eighteen months of secret negotiations with the signing of the Lateran Accords (also known as the Lateran Pacts). The pacts comprised three documents: a treaty, a concordat, and a financial convention. The treaty settled the bitter dispute between the Catholic Church and the Kingdom of Italy, which dated back to the Risorgimento and specifically to the seizure of Rome in 1870 and the unilateral enactment of the Law of Guarantees a year later (see Notebook 3/ §97, and the corresponding Notes to the Text)； this part of the agreement was therefore called the Conciliation Treaty. The treaty, in effect, created Vatican City, which Italy agreed to recognize as an independent and sovereign state with its own inviolable territory. Italy also recognized Roman Catholicism as the sole religion of the state. The Holy See, for its part, formally recognized the Kingdom of Italy with Rome as its capital, and by so doing it renounced its territorial claims on the former Papal States. The concordat guaranteed for the Catholic Church in Italy a privileged position and an extremely powerful presence in civil society: the church was guaranteed complete freedom in spiritual matters； marriages were to be governed by canon law； religious instruction was to be made mandatory in all elementary and secondary schools； teachers of religion had to be approved by the church； Catholic Action was formally recognized by the state as an autonomous organization. The financial convention provided the Vatican with compensation for the papal territories that had been absorbed by Italy in the process of unification. The Italian government undertook to pay the pope 1.75 billion lire, 1 billion lire of which consisted of government bonds.

The Lateran Accords were approved by th.e senate on May 25, 1929； they were opposed only by a handful of senators, among them Benedetto Croce, who argued that the accords violated one of the basic principles on which the unified Italian state had been founded: namely, the separation between church and state.

2. Prussia (which at the time was a state or Land in the German Reich] and Vatican City signed a concordat on June 14, 1929, by which the Catholic Church obtained new privileges in addition to the restoration of some older ones. Most of th.e provisions of th.e concordat concerned the establishment of bishoprics and parishes and state subsidies for the church.

3. See the following articles, all of them published in Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Polìtica: Ugo Spirito, concordato” (The concordat), 2, no. 2-3 (March-June 1929): 81-87； Arnaldo Volpicelli, "La Conciliazione^ (The conciliation) it no. 2-3 (March-June 1929): 88-97； Arnaldo Volpicellì, z/Stato e Chiesa di fronte alla Conciliazione” (Church and state in light of the conciliation) 2, no, 4 (July-August 1929): 161-70； Arnaldo Volpiceli!, nuove relazioni politiche tra lo Stato e la Chiesa” (The new poHtical relations between church and state) 2, no. 6 (N0vember-December 1929): 305-10； Arnaldo Volpiceli] nuove relazioni giuridiche tra lo Stato e la Chiesa” (The new juridical relations between church and state) 2, no. 6 (November-December 1929): 311-15； Arturo Carlo Jemolo, "Religione dello Stato e confessioni ammesse” (The religion of the state and permitted religions) 3/ no. I (January-February 1930): 21-44； Arnaldo Volpicelli /zLa natura super-confessionale dello Stato italiano” (The super-confessional nature of the Italian state) 3/ no. 2 (March-April 1930): 89-102. See also the polemical exchange between Francesco Ercole and Arnaldo Volpicelli in Nuovi Studi dì Diritto, Economia e Politica 3, no. 2 (March-April 1930): 126-36.

4. General Anton Ivanovich Denikin (1872-1947) commanded the White forces in southern Russia during the civil war that followed the Bolshevik Revolution. In 1919 he inarched through Ukraine and was headed toward Moscow in October when his forces were defeated by the Red Army at Orel, less than three hundred miles from the capital. His army retreated in disarray, and the following year it was evacuated to the Crimea, where Denikin gave up his command and sought exile in France before emigrating to the United States.

On May 7,1920, Soviet Russia signed a formal agreement with the government of Georgia, in which the Mensheviks were the majority party. One of the provisions of the agreement guaranteed the rights of the Bolsheviks to function legally within Georgia. (Th.e Bolsheviks would eventually succeed in taking control of Georgia, which was proclaimed a Soviet republic in February 1921.) Gramsci had alluded to this agreement in two articles he wrote in the course of a heated polemic with Claudio Treves on the question of Georgia: "La coda di paglia delPonorevole Treves" (The Hon. Treves's guilty conscience), LUnità, August 2, 1925, and 〃I1 fronte antisoviettista delPonorevole Treves(The anti-soviet front of the Hon. Treves), LUnitàf August 18/ 1925.

5. Nuovi Studi di Dùittto, Economia e Politica was founded in 1927 by Ugo Spirito and Arnaldo Volpicelli, both of whom belonged to Giovanni Gentile's philosophical school of "actual idealism”； see Notebook I, §132, and n. 2 in the corresponding Notes to the Text. Gramsci received and retained a copy of every issue of the journal from its inception up to 1933.

6. The reform of the educational system spearheaded by Giovanni Gentile (who was minister of education at the time) and enacted by the Fascist government on May 6,1923, made religious instruction mandatory at the elementary school level. The policies of Gentile's successor as minister of education, Pietro Fedele, and the provisions of the concordat extended the requirement of religiqus instruction to all secondary school levels up to (but not including) the university.

7. The University of the Sacred Heart (Università del Sacro Cuore), a private Catholic university in Milan, was established in 1921 and received official government recognition in 1924. The founder of the university, the Franciscan friar Edoardo Agostino Gemelli (1878-1959) was a conservative Thomist who in 1908 launched an influential journal of neoscholastic philosophy, the Rivista di Filosofia Neoscolasticaf and in 1914 another periodical, Vita e Pensiero. A fierce opponent of all forms of modernism~positivism, liberalism； neoidealism—he was also openly supportive of the Fascist regime and its ventures, including the Ethiopian war and intervention in the Spanish Civil War. In 1939 (the year after the Fascist regime had made anti-Semitism its official policy and proclaimed the racial laws that were specifically directed against the Jewish minority), Gemelli publicly endorsed anti-Semitism in a speech at the University of Bologna. On Gemelli, see Notebook 9, §31.

8. Gramsci's source of information in this instance is most probably a book by Mario MissiroE (of which he owned a copy) on the concordat of 1929 and on the relations between church and state in Italy: Date a Cesare: La politica religiosa di Mussolini, con documenti inediti (Give unto Caesar: Mussolini^ policy on religion, with previously unpublished documents) (Rome: Tipografia del Littorio, 1929). In his book, Missiroli quotes from an account published in ^Osservatore Romano on July 29, 1929, of a speech delivered by Pope Pius XI to the Italian bishops:

The pope confessed that he was deeply preoccupied by the throngs knocking at the doors of the seminaries and of the apostolic schools that are in effect the seminaries of the religious orders. After a period of crisis and of a scarcity of vocations to the ecclesiastical life, there is now in some places an enormous number of young men headed for the priesthood. It would certainly be unfortunate if one had to repeat: Multiplicasti gentem, sed non magnificasti laetitiam. It is, therefore, necessary to bear in mind three factors that may be influencing this abundance of students at church institutions. Parents are easily induced to point their sons toward the priesthood by the exemption of military service conceded to clerics in sacris. Another factor is to be found in. the improved economic and financial positions of the clergy. The third factor is the ease with which the course of studies can be completed, (pp. 389-90)

9. On Catholic Action, see Notebook i, "Notes and Jottings, 〃 ru 2,1373.

10. Robert Bellarmine (1542-1621), the Jesuit cardinal and renowned Counter-Reformation theologian who is best known for his prosecutorial role in the trial of Galileo, addressed the question of the temporal and spiritual power of the pope in his major theological works, including Disputationes de controversiis christianae fidei adversus huius tempons haereticos, 3 vols. (1586-93), and De potestate summi pontificis in rebus temporibus (1610). Instead of the pope's right to temporal power, Bellarmine emphasized the supreme power of the church over all aspects of society, a power that the church exercised "indirectly/〃 that is, without necessarily having to assume the function of a direct, temporal ruler. On Bellarmme, see also Notebook 6, §151, and Notebook 7, §88.

11. Gramsci probably read a number of articles in various journals about the Seventh National Congress of Philosophy that was held in Rome in May 工929, At the congress. Father Agostino Gemelli (the founder of the Università del Sacro Cuore) delivered a speech fiercely attacking the philosophy of Giovanni Gentile. Parts of the speech are quoted in Eugenio Garin, Cronache di filosofia italiana, 1900-1943 (Bari: Laterza, 1955)； for example: /zNothing is less religious, less Christian than the philosophy of Gentile and the idealists . . . nothing is more anti-Christian； and it is worth stating this because there is nothing that corrodes the Christian soul worse than idealism； no system negates the Christian foundation of life as totally as idealism, even though it uses our vocabulary. ... In a Catholic country, the teacher has no right to administer philosophical poison, the poison of idealism, to the young sons of Catholic parents77 (pp. 490-91).

12. Gramsci may have been thinking of a comment he came across in Andre Mauroiszs La vie de Disraeli (Paris: Gallimard, 1927), a copy of which he had in prison. For an. English translation, see André Maurois, Disraeli: A Picture of the Victorian Age, trans. H. Miles (New York: Appleton, 1928), especially p. 56: “He did not understand how a Jew could not be a Christian； in his eyes that was to stop half-way and to renounce the glory of the race, which was that it had given the world a God."

13. The pope maintained that the different components of the Lateran Accords—specifically the treaty and the concordat一went hand in hand, such that an abrogation of one would inevitably entail the annulment of the other. Should the treaty fail to hold, Gramsci is arguing, the church would have to face the problem of restituting the large sums of money that it received from the Italian state as part of the agreements. For further discussion of this issue, see Notebook 6f §23.

§54- 19 工 8

i. The quoted passage and all the other information in this note are derived from the article by Arturo Carlo Jemolo, "Religione dello Stato e confessioni ammesse^ (The religion of the state and permitted religions), Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica 3/ no. 1 (January-February 1930): 21-44. D. Schiappoli^ pamphlet I recenti provvedimenti economici a vantaggio del clero (The recent economie measures for the benefit of the clergy) was originally published in the proceedings of the Royal Academy of Moral and Political Sciences of Naples.

On Arturo Carlo Jemoloz see Notebook 1, §51, n. 2.

Thez/Sardinian law of 29 May 1855“ passed by the senate of Piedmont and reluctantly approved by King Vittorio Emanuele II, suppressed religious orders and confiscated ecclesiastical property. The law was regarded as an affirmation of the principle of separation between church and state upheld by the liberal majority in the government led by Prime Minister Cavour.

§5 5. The educational principle in elementary and secondary school

i. Gramsci is referring to the changes in the Italian educational system introduced by the "riforma Gentile” (on which, see, inter alia, the Notes to the Text for Notebook 4, §50). On this issue, Harold Entwistle makes the following pertinent observation in his Antonio Gramsci: Conservative Schooling for Radical Politics (London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1979), p. 184:

Nowadays primary and elementary tend to be used interchangeably (the former in Britain, the latter in North America, for example), to refer to that stage of early schooling which precedes universal secondary schooling. In Gramsci's time, however, elementary was a kind of schooling which was terminal for most children. In its upper grades it often overlapped with secondary schooling and consisted of more than merely the teaching of the basic academic sldlls of literacy and numeracy. It is to this earlier elementary tradition that Gramsci was referring in defending the old elementary school.

2. Here, again, Gramsci is criticizing the views of Giovanni Gentile, which in this case coincided with Benedetto Croce's. See Giovanni Gentile, La riforma dell"educazione: Discorsi ai maestri di Trieste (Bari: Laterza, 1920). For an English translation, see Giovanni Gentile, The Reform of Education, trans* D. Bigongiari, intro, by B. Croce (New York: Harcourt, 1922), especially p. 190: "The antithesis between instruction and education is the antithesis between realistic and idealistic culture, or again, that existing between a material and a spiritual conception of life."

3. The Casati Educational Law (named after Vittorio Emanuele IFs minister, Gabrio Casati), enacted in. 1859, established for the first time a comprehensive and centralized system of public education in Piedmont and Lombardy. After unification, the provisions and regulations of the Casati Act (as it was also known) were made to apply to the whole country. Although it underwent some modifications over the years, the Casati Law remained the basis of the Italian educational system until it was replaced by the Gentile Reform in 1923.

4. In one of his essays, Giosuè Carducci remarks that ever since Dante wrote De vulgari eloquentia, Italians have been so self-conscious about their use of language that they are always "watching their tongue(Giosuè Carducci, Bozzetti e scherme, in Opere, [Bologna: Zanichelli, 1914], 3:268-69(. Carducci's remark is quoted in a book Gramsci had in prison, namely Benedetto Croce's collection of essays on Manzoni, Alessandro Manzoni: Saggi e discussioni (Bari: Laterza, 1930), p. 69.

On Giosuè Carducci； see Notebook i, §44, n. 17.

5. This same view recurs in different contexts in Gramsci's writings. See, for example, his June 16, 1936, letter to his son Delio: "I believe that one of the most difficult things at your age is to sit behind a desk and put one's thoughts in order (or even to think) and to write them down with. a certain grace； this sometimes is an apprenticeship more difficult than that followed by a worker who wants to acquire a technical qualification, and it must begin precisely at your age/z

6. The Gentile Reform introduced compulsory religious instruction in the schools； see Notebook 4, §53, n. 6.

For a related argument on dogmatism and religion in the schools, see also Notebook 8, §200, and the corresponding C text, Notebook n, §1.

7. “Barbara" and //Baràlipton,/ were terms used by students as mnemonic devices for memorizing different types of syllogism in classical logic.

In a July 4, 1927, letter to his friend Giuseppe Berti, who was interned at Ustica, Gramsci expresses his views on how philosophy should be taught and studied in the "school" that the political prisoners had organized among themselves: "Each member would have to offer his contribution as lecturer or reporter on specific scientific, historical, or philosophical but especially didactic or pedagogical subjects. For the philosophy course I believe, still by and large, that the historical presentation ought to be a summary while on the other hand the course should emphasize a concrete philosophical system, the Hegelian, dissecting and criticizing it in all aspects. I would also set up a course in logic, I would even say including the barbara, baralipton, etc., and a course in dialectics."

8. “Gentleman" is used here to render the Italian signore" which has no exact equivalent in English. For a discussion of some aspects of the status of a "signoie" in Italian society； see Notebook 3/ §46.

§56. Machiavelli and the ^autonomy" of the phenomenon of politics

1. Soon after his accession to the Prussian throne in 1740, Frederick II (1712-86) published a short treatise (in French) entitled Lanti-machiavel； ouf Examen du Prince de Machiavel, a work strongly influenced by Voltaire.

2. See Benedetto Croce, Materialismo storico ed economia marxistica,

4th ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), p. 112:         as a sociologist, has certainly

failed to give us carefully developed definitions of 'sociality/ such as may be found in the works of certain contemporary sociologists, of the Germans Simmel and Stammler, or of the Frenchman Durkheim； but he teaches us, albeit in propositions that are approximate in content and paradoxical in form, how to get to the heart of what society is in its effective reality. Indeed, from this point of view, I am surprised that no one has yet thought of giving him the honorary title of the 'Machiavelli，of the proletariatGramsci had a copy of this book in prison. For a somewhat looser translation of the same passage, see B. Croce, Historical Materialism and the Economics of Karl Marx, trans. C. M. Meredith (London: Allen and Unwin, 1914), p. 118.

3. The phrase "dialectic of distincts,, was never used by Croce himself； it is, in fact, rather confusing, since Croce developed his theory of distinction as a corrective to what he considered Hegel怎 misapplication of the dialectic, which in his view stemmed from HegeFs confusion of "opposites" with "distincts." Gramsci may have encountered the phrase in (and adopted it from) an article by Arnaldo Volpicelli, "La teoria del diritto di Benedetto Croce” (Benedetto Crocei theory of right), Nuovi Studi di Diritto, Economia e Politica 1, no. 4 (May 1928): 241-78. It is nonetheless the case that Croce's concept of distinction lies at the very heart of his critique—or ^reform/7 as Gramsci calls it—of Hegel and constitutes a crucial element of his own philosophy, A succinct description of Croce's position is provided by Douglas Ainslie in his introduction to his translation of Benedetto Croce, Aesthetic: As Science of Expression and General Linguistic, 2d rev. ed. (London: Macmillan, 1922), p. xxi-xxii:

If the great conquest of Hegel be the dialectic of opposites, his great mistake lies in the confusion of opposites with things that are distinct but not opposite. If, says Croce, we take as an example the application of the Hegelian triad that formulates becoming (affirmation, negation and synthesis), we find it applicable for those opposites which are true and false, good and evil, being and not-being, but not applicable to things which are distinct but not opposite, such as art and philosophy, beauty and truth, the useful and the moral. These confusions led Hegel to talk of the death of art, to conceive as possible a Philosophy of History, and to the application of the natural sciences to the absurd task of constructing a Philosophy of Nature. Croce has cleared away these difficulties by showing that if from the meeting of opposites must arise a superior synthesis, such a synthesis cannot arise from things which are distinct but not opposite, since the former are connected together as superior and inferior, and the inferior can qxist without the superior, but not vice versa. Thus we see how philosophy cannot exist without art, while art, occupying the lower place, can and does exist without philosophy.

In their introduction to Selections from the Prison Notebooks (New York: International Publishers, 1971), Q. Hoare and G. Nowell Smith make the following observation: 〃The distinct 'categories' of the Crocean system allow for the existence of four sciences, Aesthetics, Economics, Logic and Ethics, relating to the pursuit respectively of the Beautiful, the Useful, the True and the Good. Politics, in this conception, can only be a composite entity, a mere /passion/ of no philosophical value" (p. xxiii). For other useful observations on this issue, see David D. Roberts, Benedetto Croce and the Uses of Historicism (Berkeley: University of California Press, 1987), especially pp. 52-53； and Maurice A. Finocchiaro, Gramsci and the History of Dialectical Thought (New York: Cambridge University Press, 1988), especially pp. 176-179.

4, See, for example, Ugo Spirito, E idealismo italiano e i suoi critici (Florence: Le Moimier, 1930).

5. Croce discusses the link between Vico and Hegel in, among other places, La filosofia di Giambattista Vico, 2d ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1922), and Saggio sullo Hegel (seguito da altri scritti di storia della filosofia), 3d rev. ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1926), Gramsci was familiar with both works and had a copy of the latter in prison. For English translations, see The Philosophy of Giambattista Vico, trans. R. G. Collingwood (London: Latimer, 1913), and What Is Living and What Is Dead of the Philosophy of Hegelf trans. D. Ainslie (London: Macmillan, 1915).

Bertrando Spaventa (1817-83) was the progenitor of Italian neoHegelianism. In his writings on the history of philosophy he sought to establish a link between the Italian tradition and Hegelian idealism by tracing a philosophical thread running from Giordano Bruno and Tommaso Campanella to Hegel. Giovanni Gentile studied philosophy under one of Spaventai closest followers, Donato Jaja. In many respects, Gentile怎 philosophy is a development and elaboration of issues and ideas adumbrated in Spaventai work. Gentile also edited many voltunes of Spaventai writings.

6. Gramsci is citing from memory the final sentence in Frederick Engels's Ludwig Feuerbach and the Outcome of Classical German Philosophy (1888): /zThe German working class is the inheritor of German classical philosophy."

§57. Vincenzo Cuoco and passive revolution

i. This is the first reference in the notebooks to Vincenzo Cuoco勺 concept of passive revolution. The references that appear at the end of the first paragraph of Notebook 1, §44, and in Notebook 1, §150, were inserted by Gramsci at a later time. It is rather obvious that Gramsci's observations in this note were not prompted by a reading or rereading of Cuoco's work on the Neapolitan revolution. Instead, Gramsci may have been stimulated by some allusion to Cuocozs concept of passive revolution that he encountered in his reading of secondary materials. Benedetto Croce mentions Cuoco怎 term in the preface to his own book on the Neapolitan revolution； see B. Croce, La rivoluzione napoletana del 1799, 4th rev. ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1926), pp. ix-x. On p. 771 of the manuscript of Notebook 8/ Gramsci made a list of thirteen books based on information he derived from diverse sources； one of the books he listed was a small selection of writings by Cuoco, Storia, politica e pedagogia (Torino: Paravia, n.d.)z edited by Domenico Bulferetti and published in the series Scrittori italiani (Italian writers). There is no evidence anywhere that Gramsci ever asked for or received a copy of this book.

On Vincenzo Cuoco, see Notebook iz §44, n. 2.

Unlike most other canceled notes, this one is not incorporated into a later notebook.

§58. [Popularliterature]

i. This bibliographic entry was probably extracted from the "Semaine bibliographique,/ section of Nouvelles Littéraires 9, no. 380 (January 25, 1930): 11.

§59. [History of the subaltern classes]

1. Gramsci probably extracted the information on this edition of Antonio Rosmini's booklet on communism and socialism (originally titled II comuniSmo e il socialismo and first published in 1849) from a brief review of it by Giuseppe Tarozzi that appeared in LItalia Che Scrive 13, no. 8 (August 工 930): 278.

On Antonio Rosmini, see Notebook iz §51, n. 1.

2. Gramsci had a copy of the text of the Syllabus and of Pius IX's encyclicals； see Notebook 1, §iz n. 2.

3. Gramsci seems to be referring to the opening sentences of the preamble of the Communist Manifesto. See K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers； 1976), 6:481: 〃A spectre is haunting Europe—the spectre of Communism. All the Powers of old Europe have entered into a holy alliance to exorcise this spectre: Pope and Czar, Metternich and Guizot, French Radicals and German police-spies/7

4. See Gaetano Salvemini, Mazzini (Rome: Editrice La Voce, 1920). Gramsci owned a copy of this book prior to his arrest and in a letter of March 25, 1929, he asked Tatiana Schucht to send it to him in prison. The ^bibliographical chapter" to which he refers is in fact appendix B (pp. 171-74) in Salvemini's book； it is entitled 〃La paura del socialismo fra il 1847 e il 1860〃(The fear of socialism between 1847 and i860). This z/bib-liographical chapter”—which contains a reference to Rosmini's booklet on socialism and communism―was reproduced by Gramsci in the second (and last) batch of study materials he prepared for the correspondence course of the short-lived "Party School" that he had set up in 1925.

On Gaetano Salvemini, Notebook if §25； n. 19.

§60. Cultural topics

1. Gramsci makes reference to Giuseppe Salvioli's book on capitalism in antiquity, Il capitalismo antico: Storia dell"economia romana (of which he had a copy), in Notebook 2/ §99. He also discusses this book at some length in a February 10, 1930, letter to his wife, Julia Schucht. For a translation of the relevant passage from Gramsci's letter and for notes on Saivioli and his work, see Notebook 2, §99, nn. 1 and 2.

2. Por notes on Corrado Barbagallo and his polemic with Giovanni Sanna, see Notebook 1, §25, nn. 17 and 18.

Gramsci also discusses Barbagallo7s Loro e il fuoco in Notebook 3, §112.

3. Antonio Labriola, 〃Da un secolo alPaltro: Considerazioni retrospet* tive e presagi" (From one century to the other: Retrospections and foreshadowings), an unfinished work included in. A. Labriola, Saggi intorno alla concezione materialistica della storia, ed. Luigi Dal Pane (Bologna: Cappelli, 1925), pp. 40-42 and especially pp. 45-46, where Labriola observed: Z/The reasons behind the decree [establishing the French revolutionary calendar] are a striking testimony to the fully conscious way in which those responsible for the great uprising severed themselves entirely from the past and set down a date of origin for the whole great revolution that to this day continues to stir the Western world/7

Gramsci had a copy of this work by Labriola both prior to his arrest and later on in prison as well. He refers to it in a March 25/ 1929/ letter to Tatiana Schucht.                                              .

4. The polemic started with a note by Corrado Barbagallo in his review of a book on recent Italian history by Domenico Petrini, Lultimo cinquantennio di stona, in Nuova Rivista Storica 12, no. 4 (July-September 1928): 420-26. Barbagallo's note on Benedetto Croce is on pp. 422-23. Croce responded with a letter that was published, together with Barbagallo's counter-response, under the title "Intorno all storia eticopolitica” (On ethico-political history) in Nuova Rivista Storica 12, no. 5-6 (September-December 1928): 626-29. The polemic carried over into the next issue of the same journal； see "Intorno all storia etico-politica: Discussione sec-ondaz, (On ethico-political history: Second part of the discussion), Nuova Rivista Storica 13, no. i (January-February 1929): 130-33. It ended with a brief letter by Croce in Nuova Rivista Storica 13, no. 2 (March-April 1929): 221.

5. Gramsci places the work of both Guglielmo Ferrero and Corrado Barbagallo within the category of Lorianism in Notebook r, §25.

On Guglielmo Ferrero, see Notebook iz §25, n. 17.

6. On Luigi Einaudi, see Notebook 1, §n, n. 1.

7. Mario Borsa, Londra (Milan: G. Agnelli, 1929). Gramsci probably read a review of this book by Carlo Linati in LItalia Letteraria 1, no.工 3 (June 30, 1929).

Mario Borsa (1870-1952), a journalist and essayist, started his career as a drama critic. For fifteen years he was the London correspondent for the Milan newspaper, Il Secolo. Later he worked for II Corriere della Sera and served for over two decades (1918-40) as the Milan correspondent for the London. Times. He wrote extensively on British history and culture.

8. Angelo Crespi, La funzione storica dell'impero britannico, pref, by Thomas Okey (Milan: Treves, 1918). Gramsci may have read this book prior to his arrest and imprisonment.

Both Mario Borsa and Angelo Crespi contributed to a volume of essays on Britain that Gramsci owned (it is preserved among his books) but did not have with him in prison； see Giovanni Ansaldo, C. Ariaghi, Mario Borsa, Angelo Crespi, Guido De Ruggiero, C.R., and F. P. Giordani, Che cos'è F Inghilterra (Turin: Piero Gobetti Editore, 1924).

9. All the information on the speech by the president of the Westminster Bank is derived from a short article signed R.A., “I discorsi annuali dei banchieri inglesi” (The annual speeches of the English bankers), in the ^Informazioni economiche e finanziarie” (Economie and financial news) section of Rivista di Politica Economica 20, no. 3 (March 31, 1930): 293-96； see especially p. 294. Gramsci reproduces a section of R.A.'s article almost verbatim, except for one small inaccuracy: the speech to which he refers was delivered at the bank's annual general meeting of 1930 (not 1929).

§61. Philosophy-ideology, science-doctrine

I. Gramsci's source of information on Gaetan Pirou's Doctrines sociales et science économique (Paris: Librairie du Recueil Sirey, 1929), as he himself points out later in this note, is an article by Alfonso De Pietri-Tbnelli in the "Rassegna delle pubblicazioni economiche” (Review of publications on economics) section of Rivista di Politica Economica 20, no. 3 (March 31, 1930): 328.

On Alfonso De Pietri-Tonelli, see Notebook 1, §146,11. 1.

§62. Military and political craft

i. The three quotations are taken from an article by Giovanni Carano-Donvito, 〃La scienze della militare economia del marchese Palmieri” (The military economic science of the marquis Palmieri), in Rivista di Politica Economica io, no. 3 (March 34 1930): 237, 238, and 23911. Carano-Donvito's article discusses and paraphrases the military-economic ideas expounded in book 5 of volume 2 of Riflessioni critiche sull'arte della guerra (Critical reflections on the art of war) by Giuseppe Palmieri.

Giuseppe Palmieri (1721-94), an economist, was made the general director of finance of the Kingdom of Naples by the Bourbon monarch Ferdinand I.

Pietro Colletta (1775-1831)/ to whom the last of the three quoted maxims is attributed, started his militaiy career in the Bourbon army but subsequently fell out of favor with the monarchy and spent the last eight years of his life in Florence, where he devoted his time to the writing of memoirs and historical studies.

§63. The Sorel-Croce correspondence

i. Guglielmo Oberdan (1858-82), born in Trieste, which was under Austrian rule at the time, left his birthplace in 1878 to escape military service and moved to Rome where he joined the "irredentist" movement— i.e. the Italia Irredenta Association founded in 1877 and dedicated to freeing the ^unredeemed lands” (primarily Trent and Trieste) from Austrian rule and incorporation into Italy« In mid-September 1882, Oberdan was on his way to Trieste—with a plot to assassinate the emperor Franz Josef during a scheduled visit to the area later that month一when he was arrested by the Austrian police and charged with attempted regicide. He was tried, convicted, and sentenced to death by hanging. His execution. on December 20, 1882/ provided the irredentist movement with a martyr and a wave of popular support.

Gramsci is referring to a letter from Georges Sorel to Benedetto Croce dated December 25, 1914, which was published in La Critica 27, no. 2 (March 20, 1929): 115-16. In his letter, Sorel does not mention Guglielmo Oberdan by name, but the reference to him is quite obvious: "Les demonstrations que Pon fait en Italie en Phonneur dxun régicide qui parait avoir été assez simple ^esprit, me plongent dans Fétonnement； est-ce que Pltalie va revenir aux legendes des bons brigands, des héroiques assassins et des personnages de romans? Un pareil dénouement à une longue péri-ode de relèvement intellectuel porte à désespérer de Pesprit humain./, Croce怎 comments on this passage in a note that appears on the same pages as Sorel's letter:

Sorel failed to appreciate fully the spirit of sacrifice that induced Oberdan to act as he did: he was not driven. by hatred and savagery but by the need to offer himself as a martyr to the irredentist cause. The new Italy had been quite severe with regicides； in Naples they always resisted proposals to commemorate or to name a street for Agesilao Milano, in spite of the fact that he was the most dramatic and, one might say, the most chivalrous of regicides, for, in the course of a military parade and in the midst of thousands of soldiers in formation, he broke ranks and attacked Ferdinand II, who was surrounded by his officers, with his bayonet, knowing that he was condemning himself to certain death.

Croce had also commented on the significance of Guglielmo Oberdan's action in an earlier work (which Gramsci owned and read in prison), namely his Storia d'Italia dal i8ji al 1915 (Bari: Laterza, 1928), which has been translated into English as A History of Italy: 1^71-2915 (New York: Russell and Russell, 1963). The marked difference between Croce's views and SoreFs on this matter can be seen from the following passage in A History of Italy:

The myth of Italia irredenta embodied, in the spasmodic and despairing form which the times had imposed, the principle of the independence and freedom of nations, which inspired the Italian Risorgimento and which revolted and protested against the hated 〃Bismarckism〃 and the sordid and grasping policy dominant in Europe. The protest became violent when. it was seen at the Congress of Berlin how all the European powers seized territories to their military and commercial advantage and Italy alone remained with empty hands, Italy who coveted nothing save that which was her right as a nation, who did not desire to rob, but only to continue her work of introducing into the world a little more justice. This was certainly not practical politics’ but the speech of unarmed prophets is never practical politics. A nation, however, has need of both practical and unpractical politicians； and if the first are deemed wise and the last foolish, it has need of both wise men and fools； and woe to the nation that has only wise politicians, for it usually belongs to the foolish to plant and cultivate the seeds of future policy. When Irredentism gained its martyr, when in 1882 the young Oberdan thought to perform an act of heroism, and to make of his sacrifice an unforgettable barrier between Italy and Austria, he created in Italy a frame of mind which, all alliances notwithstanding, did in fact make it impossible for Italy, save in the most exceptional and desperate circumstances, to enter the field at the side of the Austrians. Thus was preserved the spark of an ideal which, although statesmen of the Right and the Left might hold as an article of faith the necessity for Italy of the existence of an Austro-Hungarian Empire, led ultimately to the break-up of that Empire, (pp. 119-20)

§64. "History and Antihistory"

I. There is no evidence that Gramsci had a copy of Goethe's novel Wilhelm Meister during his time in prison. This quotation is, in all likelihood, extracted from a secondary source (which, however, has not been traced), Gramsci did translate parts of other works by Goethe from German into Italian； they are all in Notebook C, a notebook devoted entirely to translation exercises.

The quotation here is not a literal translation of the Italian version transcribed by Gramsci but is taken from Thomas Carlyle's 1824 translation: Wilhelm Meister (London: Everyman, 1912).

§65. Past and present

1. All efforts to find a copy of the article by Salvatore Di Giacomo mentioned here by Gramsci have been unsuccessful.

Salvatore Di Giacomo (1860-1934) was a prolific Neapolitan writer who published many articles, poems, and short stories in major newspapers and periodicals. He produced a substantial body of poetry and drama in dialect, which he also used extensively in his narrative works. Di Giacomo's fiction, with its rich local color and its portrayal of characters from the lower walks of life； has many of the characteristics associated with the verismo literary movement (of which Giovanni Verga was the most renowned exponent), which Gramsci describes, in Notebook 23, §56, as "Italian naturalism or provincial realism/7

2. This anecdote is also mentioned in Notebook 2, §10. On Ruggero Bonghi, see Notebook 2, §8, n. 1.

§66. The military element in politics

1. See Notebook i, §43.

2. Petar Zivkovic (1879-1947) first achieved prominence in the military； King Alexander I of Yugoslavia appointed him commander of the Palace Guards in 1921. He was made prime minister in 1929 and remained in office until 1932. With the support (and at the instigation) of the monarch he installed a dictatorial system, eliminating political parties and persecuting opponents of his regime. Zivkovic justified his actions as necessary measures to combat the threat of communism.

Aleksandr Zankov played a major role in the coup d'état of June 1923 in Bulgaria that toppled the government of Aleksandr Stamboliyski. (Stam-boliyski himself, who had led the revolutionary Peasant Party to power in 1919/ was assassinated.) Following the coup, Zankov became prime minister； his government, which was effectively controlled by the military, the agrarian landowners, and the monarchy, immediately set out to repress all dissident movements, but it was especially harsh in its persecution of communists. Zankov's premiership ended in 1926, but he continued to be active in politics for several more years. His followers were among the organizers of a fascist movement in Bulgaria in the mid-:1:930s.

§67. The relative greatness of powerful nations

i. On this issue, Gramsci raises an interesting question in the opening paragraph of Notebook 9, §132.

§68. Il libro di don Chisciotte by E. Scarfoglio

1. Edoardo Scarfoglio's II libro di don Chisciotte (The book of Don Quixote) was first published in 1885. Gramsci owned the revised and amplified edition of it published by Mondadori of Milan in 1925； it is among the z/Books Delivered to Tatiana on 15 June 1930〃 listed on p. 162 of the manuscript of Notebook 2 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:528).

Edoardo Scarfoglio (1860-1917) distinguished himself early as a literary critic. He was a member of the inner circle of aesthetes and litterateurs associated with the short-lived but tremendously successful journal Cronaca Bizantina. The bizantini^ as they were known, regarded themselves as a vanguard； great admirers of Giosuè Carducci, they shunned the dominant literary conventions and expressed a special disdain for romanticism. In Scarfoglioxs critical essays, the best of which were collected in II libro di don. Chisciotte (1884), the influence of Carducci is quite evident. (Gramsci alludes to Scarfoglio's friendship with Carducci in Notebook 1, §44.) His most effective pieces deal with new literary currents and innovative contemporary writers like Verga and Capuana. While still in his twenties Scarfoglio shifted his interest to political journalism. Together with his wife, the novelist Matilde Serao, he founded the Corriere di Napoli in 1888. Differences with their financial backer forced Scarfoglio and Serao to abandon II Coniare, but in 1892 they launched a new paper. Il Mattino, which quickly became one of Italy's most influential and conservative dailies. (The political views that Edoardo Scarfoglio and later his sons promoted through II Mattino are discussed by Gramsci in Notebook i, §44).

2. Alfredo Oriani (1852-1909) studied law but quickly forsook a career in jurisprudence and spent almost his entire life secluded in his rural villa in Romagna, where he devoted all his energies to writing. His many novels are animated by a romantic sense of malaise and frustration that often expresses itself in sentimental forms of anguished, violent revolt. In his political and historical writings, Oriani inveighed against Italy's weak-nessz corruption, lack of idealism, and the country's consequent failure to fulfill her destiny. The national ideal and revolutionary warfaring spirit that inspired the Risorgimento/ he believed, had been betrayed by the political pragmatism and cultural positivism of postunification Italy. His best known political-historical work. La lotta politica in Italia: Origini della lotta attuale (The political struggle in Italy: The origins of the current struggle), first published in 1892, comprises an idiosyncratic panoramic view of Italian history (starting from as far back as the fifth century) coupled with an identification of the different currents of thought一or, in Oriani's pseudo-Hegelian. vocabulary, "idea-forces”—and tendencies that made Italy alternately strong and weak. Through this work Oriani enjoined Italy to resume its civilizing mission by revitalizing its national spirit and embarking on an imperial mission to colonize Africa. In his own time, however, Oriani remained a marginal figure and had little or no impact on the political scene. His fortunes were revived posthumously when the Nationalists and the Fascists claimed him as a precursor； Mussolini himself edited Oriani's Opera omnia, 30 vols. (Bologna: Cappelli, 1923-33).

Gramsci comments on La lotta politica in. Italia in Notebook 9/ §io6, and the corresponding C text, Notebook 工9, §5. On Oriani, see also Notebook 6, §68, and Notebook 8Z §165.

3. Scarfoglio, Il libro di don Chisciotte, p. 231.

4. Quoted in ibid., p. 228. (Alfredo Oriani's Quartetto was first published in 1883 by Galli of Milan,)

§69. On political parties

i. For an extensive discussion. of charisma and political leadership, see Notebook 2, §75.

§70. Sorel, the Jacobins, violence

I. The letter to which Gramsci alludes was later reproduced as the introduction to Georges Sorel； Reflexions sur la violence (1908). For an English translation, see ^Introduction: Letter to Daniel Halevy/7 in Georges Sorel, Reflections on Violence, trans. T. E. Hulme and J. Roth (Glencoe, Ill.: Free Press, 1950), pp, 31-73. Most of the contents of SorePs Reflexions appeared for the first time as a series of essays published from January to June 1906 in Mouvement Socialiste.

§73. Lorianism

i. Corso Bovio had been a socialist parliamentary deputy and an editor of Avanti! In July 1925 he published an article in the Fascist periodical

Roma, UUnità immediately drew attention to this in its July 29, 1925, issue, with an unsigned editorial article entitled/zCorso Bovio filofascista" (Corso Bovio, Fascist sympathizer). Bovio was expelled from the Italian Socialist Party (psi) on September 12, 1925. An unsigned editorial comment (perhaps written by Gramsci himself) on Bovio怎 expulsion appeared in LUnità of September 13, 1925:

Avanti! and the maximalist [i.e.z the psi, as opposed to the reformist socialists of the Partito Socialista Unitario] leadership have tossed the deputy Corso Bovio into the ocean. In truth, Avanti! has taken a rather long time to throw this strange type of invertebrate amphibian back into the ocean, which is why one can say that, in effect, it was the "lit・ tie Corso" who tossed Avanti! into the ocean. The story of this maximalist honorable deputy is of great interest to the working masses. In brief: at the beginning of the war he was an absolute neutralist. He then had scruples and crossed over to Turati's camp. After that he left the [Socialist] Party and became an interventionist. Once the war was over he ran for election on the Democrats' list. . . . Afterward he became a proelections communist, and as such he was among the candidates elected from the joint lists of the left, and for a while he supported the extreme left wing of the psi, following the Livorno Congress. When it came to expelling the Third Internationalists, Corso Bovio was in favor； in his speech at the Milan Congress (1923), he was one of those who defended the expulsion of the Third Internationalists on the basis of a counterrevolutionary Marxism. In order to reward him for his efforts, Nenni and his associates gave him a secure position with the maximalist newspaper, entrusting him with a regular column in which he indulged himself for quite some time writing mythic riddles and political stupidities that were awkward to deal with. Every article of his was a calculated blow against the politics of class； he was an insult to the working class. But the people at Avanti! liked him because he was a member of the clique that had kicked out the Third Internationalists: those guilty of being upright and consistent. Now this little clown has abandoned Avanti! and gone over to the Fascists. The maximalists pretend that they have kicked him out. The truth is that they are the ones who cultivated him, and his petty meanness is the outcome of their own greater vileness.

Gramsci referred to "the Bovio case" in his article "Nenni e Pindul-genza della direzione massimalista” (Nenni and the indulgence of the maximalist leadership), UUnità, June 30, 1926.

A copy of Corso Bovio's Giovanni Bovio nella vita intima: Con lettere e documenti inediti (Milan: Società Editrice Avanti, n.d.) is preserved among the books once owned by Gramsci, but there is no evidence that he had it while in prison.

§74. G. B. Angioletti

l The documents mentioned here by Gramsci were published without a title in ^Italia Letteraria 2f no. 20 (May i8/ 1930): 2. A brief prefatory note explains that    30 April 1930, the newspaper La Quarta Roma pub

lished an. article by its editor-in-chief, Mr. Guglielmo Danzi, which attacked one of our editors-in-chiefz G. B. Angioletti, with outrageous insults and calumniesZ7 The note is followed by a reproduction of documents meant to rebut Danzi's accusations. Among other things, the documents set out to prove that Angioletti was never hostile to Fascism.

On Giovanni Battista Angioletti, the coeditor of Eltalia Letteraria, see Notebook i, §8, n. 1.

2. Adone Nosari (1875-1957), an editor of the Giornale d'Italia, was also the author of several novels； short stories, and a study of literary life in Rome.

On Giuseppe Ungaretti, a contributor to LItalia Letteraria and a friend of Angioletti^/ see Notebook 3, §7, n. 2.

3. The note Angioletti consigned to his backers and published in LItalia Letteraria states, among other things: "Participation, in 1919, with the students of the Milan Polytechnic in the first action against the communists (15 April).〃

On April 15, 1919^ during a general strike in Milan, groups of Fascists and other right-wing squads set fire to the offices of the socialist newspaper Avanti! It was only one of the first of many similar violent attacks on socialist clubs, offices, and so on.

4. In 1923 Mussolini honored Bernardo Barbiellini by naming him “ras” (i.e.z chief) of the Fascists in Piacenza. The title (derived from the term for Ethiopian chieftains) was conferred on individuals who played leading roles in the organization and command of Fascist paramilitary squads in the provinces: i.e., the armed squads who often, engaged in violent actions in their campaigns of intimidation against socialists and leftist sympathizers.

§75. Past and present

1. The term "totalitarian" here and elsewhere in Gramsci means "unified” and ^all-embracing.^

2. Piero Gobetti had touched on the question of religion with reference to the Russian revolution in some essays he wrote in the early 1920s. Mario Missiroli had put forward* the thesis that the weaknesses of Italy as a nation were attributable to the fact that the country had never gone through a Protestant reformation. Gramsci discusses these issues at some length in Notebook 工4, §26, where, among other things, he characterizes Missiroli's thesis as a mechanical application to Italy of ideas derived from Renan and Sorel, whose views pertained specifically to French culture.

On Piero Gobetti, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 29； and on Mario Missiroliz see Notebook i, §43, n. 12.

§76. Vittorio Macchioro and America

1. There is no evidence that Gramsci ever had direct access to Vittorio Macchioro^ book on the religion of the Romans, Roma capta: Saggio intorno alla religione romana (Messina: Casa Editrice G. Principato, 1928)； in all likelihood, he had gathered some information about it from a secondary source, which, however, has not been traced.

2. The passage from Vittorio Macchioro's article in II Mattino was reproduced under the title "America“ in the "Rassegna della stampa77 (Review of the press) section of LItalia Letteraria 2, no. 11 (March 16, 1930).

§77. Types of periodicals

I, On this issue, see also, inter alia, Notebook 4, §71.

Canto 10 of the Inferno

i. Gramsci's interest in and careful reading of Dante's Divine Comedy date back to his student days. In the very first letter he wrote after his arrest—the letter was withheld by the prison authorities—he asked his landlady to send him a German grammar book and a linguistics handbook from among the books he had in his room and then added a request: H1 would be most grateful if you would send me an inexpensive copy of the Divine Comedy because I have loaned my copy/7 From the moment he obtained permission to write in. his prison cell, Gramsci planned to articulate his views on "Cavalcante Cavalcanti: his position in the structure and art of the Divine Comedy" (see the fifth item in the list of "Main Topics" on the first page of Notebook 1), He communicated his interest in this topic to Tatiana Schucht for the first time in his letter of August 26, 1929:

I've made a little discovery about this canto by Dante [i.e.z canto 10 of the Inferno] that I believe is interesting and that would in part correct B. Croce's thesis on the Divine Comedy, which is too absolute. I won't describe the argument here because it would take too much space., .. Then [i.e.z after reading the most recent scholarship on the subject] Ell write my "Dante commenM and quite possibly Fll send it to you with the author's compliments, indited in very beautiful calligraphy. I say this just for fun, for in order to write a comment of this kind, I would have to review a certain amount of material... that can be found only in the largest libraries. ... I will however write some notes and perhaps sketch the preparatory draft for a future comment.

A year later Gramsci reiterated his intention to write on Dante in a September 7, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht: one of my future letters I will summarize the contents of an essay on canto 10 of Dante's Inferno, so that you may forward this outline to Professor Cosmo, who, as an expert in Dante studies, will be able to tell me whether I have made a false discovery or whether it is really worth being transformed into a contribution, a trifle to be added to the millions upon millions of similar notes that have already been written/7 About two weeks later, in his letter of September 20, [93 L Gramsci was ready to provide Tatiana Schucht with a rather detailed account of his "little discovery“I will write to you briefly on personal matters, because today I want to try to draft the outline on canto 10 to be forwarded so as to get some advice from my old university professor [i.e., Umberto Cosmo]； if I don't do it today I will never do it." Except for the opening paragraph and the concluding remarks, which are devoted to personal and family matters, the whole letter consists of a relatively detailed exposition of his original interpretation of the tenth canto of the Inferno. At the end of his exposition, Gramsci reiterates his wish to have Umberto Cosmo review his ideas: "Professor Cosmo might be able to tell me whether what we have here is a new discovery of the umbrella or whether my outline contains an idea that I might develop in a short comment, just to pass the time." Tatiana Schucht transcribed the relevant section of the letter for Piero Sraffa, who sent it on to Umberto Cosmo. Cosmo responded with a December 29, 1931, letter to Sraffa, who transmitted its contents to Tatiana Schucht； she in turn transcribed it ina March 9/ 1932, letter to Gramsci. Gramsci reproduces a substantial segment of Cosmo's letter in Notebook 4, §86.

For a careful critical study of Gramsci's analysis of the tenth canto of the Inferno that also supplies the pertinent background and context for this cluster of notes, see Frank Rosengarten,z/Gramsci's little discovery7: Gramsci's Interpretation of Canto X of Dante's Inf emo" boundary 2 14, no. 3 (spring 1986): 71-90. Rosengarten also provides the following useful synopsis of canto 10:

The scene is the sixth circle, the first of four that comprise the city of Dis in lower Hell. In this circle are punished the founders and fol-

lowers of all heretical beliefs, but the heretics who occupy the center of Dante怎 attention are the Epicureans, those 〃who make the soul die with the body/7 They, like all other heretics’ are buried in uncovered fiery tombs. As Dante passes by with his guide Virgil, one of the damned, Farinata degli Ubertiz a leader of the Tuscan Ghibellines, calls out to him. The majesty of his bearing is impressive, his defiance of hell awesome in its perverse integrity. After recognizing each other as members of opposed factions. Farinata and Dante begin to discuss politics, but are interrupted by another shade who rises from the same tomb. It is Cavalcante de，Cavalcanti, father of Guido, Dante's friend and fellow poet. [Cavalcanti is also related to Parinata by marriage, since his son, Guido, is married to Farinatazs daughter.] Cavalcante inquires about his son, asking why, if poetic genius accounts for Dante's great journey, his son is not with him. Cavalcante mistakenly infers from Dante怎 reply that Guido is dead, and falls back in despair into the flames. Farinata then resumes the speech he had begun before Cavalcante^ appearance, and prophesies Dante's banishment from Florence. In answer to a question from Dante, he explains how it is that the damned can foresee the future but have no laiowledge of the present. He also names others who share his fate in hell. Dante takes his leave with a sense of respect for his proud enemy, pausing only long enough to ask Farinata to tell Cavalcante that his son is still alive, (p. 75)

§78. The question of "structure and poetry" in the Divine Comedy...

i. Gramscfs summary of his project in his September 20, 1934 letter to Tatiana Schucht (which he intended for his old professor, Umberto Cosmo, to read) helps explain why he regarded his interpretation of canto 10 of the Inferno primarily as a contribution to the understanding of the relationship between "structure and poetry" in the Divine Comedy, a relationship that, in his view, Benedetto Croce and other commentators had misunderstood. Familiarity with this letter is indispensable for grasping the main thrust of Gramsci's argument, which is expounded in a somewhat disjointed or fragmentary way in the cluster of notes he composed under the rubric z/Canto 10 of the Infeino/f:

I will now try to summarize the famous project. Cavalcante and Farinata. (1) In his essay on Farinata, De Sanctis remarks on the harshness that characterizes the tenth canto of Dante's Inferno because Farinata, after having been depicted heroically in the first part of the episode, in the final part becomes a pedagogue； that is, to use Crocean terms, Farinata after having been poetry becomes structure. Traditionally, the tenth canto is Farinata^ canto, hence the harshness noted by De Sanctis has always appeared plausible. I maintain that two dramas are played out in the tenth canto: Farinata怎 and Cavalcante^ and not Farinata^ drama alone. (2) It is strange that Dante hermeneutics, though so minute and Byzantine, has never noticed that among the Epicureans of the fiery tombs, Cavalcante alone is truly punished—I say punished with an immediate and personal punishment—and that Farinata closely participates in this punishment but also in this instance "as if he had great scorn of heaven." The law of retribution for Cavalcante and Farinata is this: for having wished to see into the future, they (theoretically) are deprived of the knowledge of earthly things for a certain specific period of time； that is, they live in a cone of darkness from whose center they can look both into the past and the future but only beyond a certain perimeter. When Dante approaches them, the position of Cavalcante and Farinata is this: they see Guido alive in the past, but they see him dead in the future. But is Guido dead or alive at that given moment? We can see here the difference between Cavalcante and Farinata. When the latter hears Florentine spoken, he becomes a partisan again, the Ghibbeline hero, while Cavalcante thinks only of Guido and on hearing Florentine spoken rises up to find out whether Guido is alive or dead at that moment (they can be informed by newcomers). The drama involving Cavalcante directly is extremely rapid but of inexpressible intensity. He immediately asks about Guido, hoping that he might be with Dante, but when from the poet, who is not exactly aware of the punishment, he hears the words "he had”—that is, the verb in the past tense—after a heartrending cry he 〃fell back supine and did not rise again.” (3) In. the first part of the episode, "Guido's disdain" became the focus of the studies of all the fashioners of hypotheses and contributions, just as in the second part, Farinata^ prediction concerning Dante's exile absorbed all the attention. I would say that the importance of the second part lies especially in the fact that it casts light on Cavalcante^ drama, providing all the essential elements for the reader to relive it. Does that mean it is a poem of the ineffable, the unexpressed? I don't think so. Dante does not pass up the opportunity to represent the drama directly, for this is precisely his way of representing it. We have here a "mode of expression/' and I think that "modes of expres-sion〃 can change in time just as the language itself changes....

I remember that in 1912, when I was attending Professor Toesca's [1877-1962] course in art history [at the University of Turin], I saw a reproduction of the Pompeian painting in which Medea is present at the murder of the sons she had with Jason； she stands there with her eyes blindfolded, and I think I remember Toesca saying that this was one way in which the ancients expressed themselves and that Lessing in Laokoön (I quote these lectures from memory) did not consider this a device typical of the powerless but rather the best means to convey the impression of a parent's infinite sorrow, which if represented materially would have become crystallized in a grimace. Even Ugolino's expression "Then fasting did more than grief had done,z [Inferno, canto 33/ line 75] belongs to this mode of expression, and people generally have understood it as a veil drawn over the father as he devours his son. . . . Indeed, the fact that Farinata's disquisition. is closely linked to Cavalcante^ drama is stated by Dante himself when he concludes: 〃Now you shall say to that fallen man, that his son is still among the living” (Farinata^ daughter is also among the living, but Farinata is so deeply involved in the partisan struggle that he has not given any sign of distress over the news conveyed by that "he had” i.e., that Guido was dead； Cavalcante was the one most punished and for him that 〃he had" meant the end of the agony of doubt as to whether Guido at that moment was alive or dead). (4) It seems to me that this interpretation mortally wounds Croce's thesis on the poetry and structure of the Divine Comedy. Without structure there would be no poetry, and therefore the structure also has a poetic value.

But a further question is linked to this: what is the importance of stage directions in works for the theater? The recent innovations in performance art that give ever-greater importance to the director pose the question in ever-sharper form. The author of the play struggles with actors and director by means of the stage directions, which allow him to define his characters better； the author wants his share in the spectacle to be respected, and he wants the interpretation of the play by the actors and director (who are translators from one art to another and critics at the same time) to remain true to his vision. In Man and Superman, G. B. Shaw provides in an appendix a small manual written by John Tanner, the protagonist, to define the protagonist's character better and help the actor to be more faithful to his image. A theatrical work without stage directions is lyricism rather than the depiction of living people in a dramatic conflict； stage directions have in part incorporated the old monologues, etc. If in the theater the work of art is the result of the collaboration of writer and actors unified aesthetically by the director of the performance, in this creative process stage directions have an essential importance insofar as they limit the arbitrary decisions of the actors and director. The entire structure of the Divine Comedy is devoted to this exalted function, and if it is right to make distinctions, one must be very cautious at each particular instance.

Shaw's appendix to his Man and Superman (1906) is entitled "The Revolutionist's Handbook and Pocket Companion by John Tanner.John Tanner, the principal character in Shaw's play (translated into Italian as Don Giovanni), is a young revolutionist and a Don Juan figure.

2. Gramsci is referring to critical works he had access to and read, as he indicates in his September 20, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht: 〃I do have De Sanctis's essays and Croce's Dante. In the 1928 Leonardo I read part of Luigi Russo's study that was published in Barbi's review and that (in the part that I read) makes reference to Croce's thesis. I also have the issue of La Critica with Croce's reply. But I haven't seen this material for some time—that is, before I thought of the main core of this project—because it lies at the bottom of a box in the storeroom/7 See Benedetto Croce； La poesia di Dante, 3d rev. ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1922), especially the chapter struttura della Commedia e la poesia/7 pp. 53-71. This work is available in English: The Poetry of Dante, trans. D. Ainslie (New York: Henry Holt, 工922)7 chap. 3/ "The Structure and Poetry of the Comedy/' is on pp. 73-101. Luigi Russo怎 /zCritica dantesca^ (Dante criticism) appeared in. Leonardo 3, no. 12 (December 2O, 1927): 305-11. For Croce's response to Russo's reading of Dante, see La Critica 26, no. 2 (March 20,1928): 122-25.

On Luigi Russo, see Notebook 1, §35, n. 2.

3. Gramsci discusses Vincenzo Morello's interpretation of canto 10 in a separate note； see Notebook 4, §83.

4. Fedele Romani, Il canto X delFlnferno (Prato-Florence, 1906), an offprint from Giornale Dantesco 13/ no. i (1906).

Fedele Romani (1855-1910), in addition to critical essays on. major authors such as Dante, Petrarch, Manzoni, Homer, and Virgil, also wrote some volumes of memoirs and produced a series of introductory books on different Italian dialects, including one on Sardinian.

5. Francesco De Sanctis's essay 〃I1 Farinata di Dante" appeared in the three-volume collection of his critical essays edited by Paolo Arcari, Saggi critici (Milan: Treves, 1924), 2:202-26. Gramsci had a copy of this work in prison. The essay is translated as "Farinata" in De Sanctis on Dante, ed. and trans. Joseph Rossi and Alfred Galpin. (Madison: University of Wisconsin Press, 1957), pp. 53-86.

On Francesco De Sanctis, see Notebook i, §96, n. 3.

6. Gramsci uses the word 11 didascalie/1 which in addition to "stage directions" also means ^explanations/7 "explanatory passages,or z/com-mentaries./,

7. For more on the function of stage directions in dramatic works and the relevance of that function to the question of the relation between "structure and poetry," see Notebook 4/ §78, n. 1.

8. See Notebook 4, §78, n. i, above. Gramsci also refers to this picture in an earlier letter to Tatiana Schucht, dated August 26, 1929, where he raises for the first time the possibility of writing a "Dante comment〃：

In order to write a comment of this kind, I would have to review a certain amount of material (for example, the reproductions of the Pompeian paintings) that can be found only in. the largest libraries. That is, I would have to collect historical elements that prove how by tradition, from classical art until the Middle Ages, painters refused to depict sorrow in its most elementary and profound forms (maternal sorrow): in the Pompeian wall paintings, Medea, while cutting the throats of the children she had with Jason, is depicted with her face covered by a veil, because the painter considers it superhuman and mhuman to give an expression to her face.

In his essay, "Gramsci's 'little discovery' 〃： Gramsci's Interpretation of Canto X of Dante,s Inferno/7 boundary 2 14., no. 3 (spring 1986), Frank Rosengarten makes the following pertinent observations:

Drawing on various readings and memories of lectures in art history at the University of Turin, Gramsci mentions the often cited case of the painter Timanthes who, according to Pliny, after demonstrating his ability to express human suffering in the faces of all the people who were about to witness the sacrifice of Iphigenia, chose to cover the face of Iphigenia's father, Agamemnon/ with a cloak, since such elemental and unspeakable pain was better left unrevealed. Gramsci correctly cites the fresco at Pompeii, presumably derived from the original by Timanthes, that shows Agamemnon with his face covered moments before the sacrifice is consummated. But it is curious and psychologically significant perhaps that Gramsci cites another analogy with veiled suffering in painting that turns out to be incorrect: on four occasions in the text of his analysis he mentions the Pompeii fresco of Medea "whose face is veiled as she kills the children she has had with Jason." But the frescoes at Pompeii do not show Medea in the act of killing her children. In one, she is seated in a somber contemplative mood as she appears to lament her destiny as mother； in another she is standing near her children, with a rather vacant, expressionless stare. In neither of these frescoes is her face veiled, (pp, 81-82)

9. One of Farinata^ daughters, Beatrice (Bice), was betrothed to Cavalcanti^ son, Guido (whom she subsequently married), in 1267/ three years after Farinata's death. This matrimonial arrangement was part of an attempt to heal the bitter divisions between the Ghibellines and the Guelfs.

10. Isidoro Del Lungo, Dino Compagni e la sua Cronica, 3 vols. (Florence: Le Monnier, :[879-87), especially 1:187-88 and mi-15 and 2:98. See Gramsci's letter to Tatiana Schucht, February 22, 1932: 〃What you write to me about my outline for the Farinata canto reminds me that in fact I may have spoken of it to someone in past years. I remember now that the first time I thought of this interpretation was while reading Isidoro Del Lungc/s weighty opus on Dino Compagni怎 Cronaca fiorentina [Florentine chronicle], in which Del Lungo for the first time fixed the date of Guido Cavalcanti's death/7

In addition to his scholarly edition of Dino Compagni^ Florentine chronicles, Isidoro Del Lungo (1841-1927) produced a number of important studies on Dante, some of which Gramsci mentions in Notebook 4/ 8i. An influential scholar and literary historian, Del Lungo served as president of the Dante Society of Italy and was a highly prominent member of the prestigious Crusca Academy.

11. The entire encounter between Dante's narrative persona and Cavalcanti in canto 10 of the Inferno is as brief as it is poignant； it occupies only about twenty lines (52-72). The Divine Comedy: Inferno, trans, with commentary by Charles S. Singleton (Princeton, NJ.: Princeton University Press, 1977), provides a reliable, close, prose translation:

Then there arose to sight alongside of him a shade, visible to the chin: I think he had raised himself on his knees. He looked round about me as though he wished to see whether someone was with me, but when his expectation. was quite spent, he said, weeping, "If you go through this blind'prison by reason of high genius, where is my son, and why is h.e not with you?〃

And I to him, ,rl come not of myself. He who waits yonder, whom perhaps your Guido had in disdain, is leading me through here/'

Already his words and the manner of his punishment had read his name to me: hence was my answer so full.

Suddenly straightening up, he cried, 〃How? Did you say 'he had7? Does h.e not still live? Does the sweet light not strike his eyes?” And when he perceived that I made some delay in answering, he fell supine again and showed himself no more. (1:103)

§79. Criticism of the "unexpressed"I

1. See Alessandro Manzoni, Ipromessi sposi {The Betrothed), chap. 17. The emphases are Gramsci's.

2. Gramsci made similar remarks about Manzoni in his September 20, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht: "These Dantean modes of expression have nothing in common with some of Manzoni's. When Renzo thinks of Lucia after crossing the Veneto border, Manzoni writes: 'We will not venture to describe his feelings； the reader knows the circumstances, and he can use his own imagination/ But Manzoni had already declared that in order to reproduce our revered species, there was more than enough love in the world for there to be any need to talk of it also in books. In. fact, Manzoni renounced representing love for practical or ideological reasons

3. Count Ugolino's final remark in Inferno, canto 33, line 75, "Poscia, più che '1 dolor, potè fì digiuno,"—which in Charles Singleton's translation, The Divine Comedy: Inferno (Princeton, NJ.: Princeton University Press, 1977), is rendered as "Then fasting did more than grief had done,/ (1:353)一pithily conveys the tragic fate suffered by Ugolinoz for whom death by grief would have been merciful as he witnessed his sons (who were imprisoned with him) starve to death； instead, he was forced to experience the horror of groping blindly in his cell over the corpses of his sons until finally lack of food killed him too. The line has sometimes been taken to suggest that hunger finally drove Ugolino to feed on the bodies of his sons. Gramsci also alludes to this line in his September 20, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht.

The story of Myrrha (or Smyrna)； who deceitfully succeeded in consummating her incestuous love for her father, Cinyras, king of Cyprus, is recounted in considerable detail by Ovid in Metamorphoses (book io, lines 298-513). In Inferno, canto 30, lines 38-39, Dante describes her as “Mirra scellerata, che divenne/al padre, fuor del dritto amore, amica”； Singleton translates this as "infamous Myrrha, who became loving of her father beyond rightful love77 (p. 317).

4. Benedetto Croce, Alessandro Manzoni: Saggi e discussioni (Bari: Laterza, 1930), pp. 24-25. Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison.

5. Giuseppe Citanna, “I promessi sposi sono un'opera di poesia?” (Is The Betrothed a work of poetry?). La Nuova Italia i, no. 6 (June 20, 1930): 225-31, especially p. 230.

§80. Pliny records that when Timanthes of Sicyon painted ...

1. See Pliny (the Elder), Natural History, book 35, 73-74.

2. See Gotthold Ephraim Lessing, Laokoon (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1965), p, 67.

3. Gramsci read the synopsis of Paolo Enrico Arias's essay, which appeared under the title monumenti dzIfigenia in Aulide〃 (The monuments of Iphigenia at Aulis), in the "Marginalia" section of II Marzocco 3 5, no. 28 (July 13, 1930).

4. Many of Gramsci's remarks in this note are based on his memory of the lectures on art history he heard Pietro Toesca deliver at the University of Turin in 1912； see his August 26, 1929, and September 20, 1931, letters to Tatiana Schucht, both of which. are quoted above, in Notebook 4, §78, rm. I and 8.

§81. The date of Guido Cavalcanti^ death ...

i. On Isidoro Del Lungc/s work, see Notebook 4, §78, n. 10.

In this note, Gramsci uses information extracted from an article by Pio Rajna, "Del Lungo e la Cronica di D. Compagni" in II Marzocco 32, no. 20 (May 15,

§82. Guido's disdain.

1. Enrico Sicardi怎 book on the Italian language in Dante, La lingua italiana in Dante (Rome: Casa Editrice Optima, 1929) was reviewed by Giuseppe S. Gargàno in an article entitled "La lingua nei tempi di Dante e Pinterpretazione della poesia” (The language in Dante's times and the interpretation. of poetry) in II Marzocco 34/ no. 15 (April 14, 1929).

Giuseppe Gargàno (1859-1930), a literary critic, belonged to the group of literati that founded the journal II Marzocco in 1896.

2. Le., "whom," in "whom perhaps your Guido had in disdain” [Inferno, canto 10, line 63). 〃Cui" can also mean "which.〃

3. I.e.? 〃with.〃

4. I.e., 〃had in disdain."

5. See Inferno, canto 10, line 61: Z/I come not of myself."

6. I.e., "coming."

7. Le., “to come/7

8. The emphasis is Gramsci's.

9. See Inferno, canto io, line 59.

10.1.e., “had.〃

11. On the issues raised in this note, see also Gramsci's September 20, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht.

§83. Vincenzo Morello. Dante, Farinata, Cavalcante

1. In the passages quoted from this work the emphases and parenthetical exclamations are Gramsci's.

Gramsci owned a copy of Morello's booklet prior to his arrest. It is among the books he requested Tatiana Schucht to send to him in his letter of December 工7, 1928. He reminded Tatiana Schucht of his request in his letter of August 26, 1929* Obviously, she sent it to him, and he had it beside him when he composed this note. Almost as soon as he was finished with it he bundled it with the "Books Delivered to Carlo on 13 March 193i,z； the list is on pp. 163-64 of the manuscript of Notebook 2 (see Description of the Manuscript, 1:529).

On Vincenzo Morello, see Notebook i, n6z n. 13.

2. The quotation is from Ugo Foscolo怎 detailed study on the Divine Comedy, "Discorso sul testo della Commedia di Dante” (1825), now in volume 9, part iz of the "Edizione nazionale" of Foscolo's complete works； see U. Foscolo, Studi su Dante, ed. Giovanni Da Pozzo (Florence: Le Monnier, 1979), p. 424.

3. Morello quotes from Francesco De Sanctis's essay /ZI1 Farinata di Dante” (1869), with which Gramsci was very familiar. See De Sanctis on Dante, ed. and trans. Joseph Rossi and Alfred Galpin (Madison: University of Wisconsin Press, 1957)； p. 82. "The badly learned art" echoes a comment made by the wayfaring Dante to Farinata (Inferno, canto 10, line 51 ) that alludes to the Ghibellines7 inability to return from exile successfully, a comment that disturbs Farinata sufficiently to make him return to it the moment Cavalcanti leaves the scene (Inferno, canto io, line 77).

4. See Inferno, canto 10, lines 103-5.

5. On Giovanni Rosinizs La monaca di Monza, see Notebook 3, §78, n. 11.

6. See Paradiso, canto 17, line 69.

7. Gramsci comments on "Dante's political position" in the context of his times in Notebook 6f §85, and Notebook 28, §7,

§84. The ^renunciations of description^ in the Divine Comedy

1. Luigi Russo, "Per la poesia del Taradiso? dantesco” (Concerning the poetry of Dante's Paradiso), Leonardo 3, no. 8 (August 20, 1927): 200-202.

On Luigi Russo, see Notebook i, §35/ n. 2.

2. It appears that Russo's article was Gramsci's only source of information on the contents of Augusto Guzzo's essay.

3. See Paradiso, canto 14, line 103, and canto 23, line 55.

4. Russo, “Per la poesia del 'Paradiso' dantesco/7 p. 202.

5. Luigi Russo, 〃I1 Dante del Vossler e Punita poetica della Commedia” (Vossler^ Dante and the poetic unity of the Divine Comedy), Studi Danteschi 12 (1927): 5-29.

Michele Barbi (1867-1941), a philologist and literary historian, was one of the most prominent Dante scholars of his time. In addition to writing many books on Dante and on some other major Italian authors. Barbi edited Studi Danteschi which he founded in 1920,

§85. One of the z/Sotto la Molen columns, entitled 〃I1 cieco Tiresia/? ...

i. Gramsci is referring to an article of his, "Il cieco Tiresia” (The blind Tiresias), in the column z/Sotto la Mole" of the Piedmont edition of Avanti!, April 18, 1918:

La Stampa reports the story of a poor blind boy from Ostria, in Marche, who has prophesied that the war will end before 1918 is over. The little prophet was not blind prior to the prophecy； his blindness, however, was indissolubly linked with his newly acquired ability. He went blind immediately after he had cheered people with the happy news that they would soon be freed from the bloody nightmare.

Ostria is in Marche (near Sinigallia, La Stampa points out)； the Cottolengo Institute [for the sick and the derelict] is in Turin. Two weeks ago it was announced that at the charitable institution of Cottolengo, a girl endowed with the spirit of prophecy started foreseeing a whole series of minor events. Suddenly she stated that she knew when. the war would end but refused to reveal the date because she was convinced that she would go blind. Like the boy from Ostria (the report goes on) she was examined by specialists, who declared her eyes immune from anything that could lead to blindness. She was induced to talk； she made her prophecy and immediately lost her eyesight. Turin-Ostria； just as in 1916 Turin-Padua-St. Anthony and the friar in the Capuchin convent. Each year a prophecy； each year a peace. In 1918/ however, the popular mind has appropriated the tradition； it has embellished it with the naive poetry that enlivens its spontaneous creations. The quality of being a prophet was reconnected with the misfortune of blindness. The Greek Tiresias was blind； the sheer clarity of his thinking was trapped in an opaque body; blocked from all impressions of actuality. It is the ineluctable price that nature exacts from its exceptions: there is a principle of the idea of justice. It is an atrocious fate, like that of Cassandra, who was not believed: she knows the events of the future, she sees them approaching, she knows who will be swept away, she cries and she speaks out, only to find skeptical, indifferent people who make no provision for the future and do not struggle against fate. Cassandra experiences a rather more particular drama； she is the creation of refined poetry that is already polished in a literary sense. Tiresias is popular； he is concrete. Misfortune assumes an external aspect in his figure； his drama is first and foremost physical and more than. internal: the feeling of pity is immediate； it is aroused even without reflection and reasoning. It seems like a small thing, but in reality it is a tremendous experience that only the popular tradition could successfully feel and concretize. The tenth canto of Dante's Inferno—the reception it has received in criticism and on the popular level—depends on this experience. Farinata and Cavalcante are punished for having wanted to see too far into the world beyond and hence transgressing Catholic discipline: their punishment is the inability to know the present. But criticism has failed to grasp this drama. Farinata is admired for his statuesque attitude of pride, for standing tall in the midst of the horrors of hell. Cavalcante is ignored； yet he is leveled by a word—“he had”一 which makes him think that his son is dead. He does not know the present； he sees the future, and in the future his son is dead: but in the present? Tormenting doubt； a terrible punishment in this doubt, the highest drama that is consummated in a few words. But a difficult drama, complicated, that can only be understood with reflection and reasoning； a drama that is horrifyingly chilling in its rapidity and intensity, but only after critical analysis. Cavalcante does not see, but he is not blind； he does not have concrete, corporeal evidence of his misfortune. Dante is a refined poet in this case. The popular tradition wants concreteness, its poetry is simpler and more direct.

The boy from Ostria and the girl from the Casa del Cottolengo are, in fact, two cantos of popular poetry: poetry, nothing other than poetry...

§86. I am transcribing some passages on the topic of Cavalcanti and Farinata ...

i. The ideas on canto 10 of the Inferno that Gramsci sketched in his letter to Tatiana Schucht on September 20, 1931, were sent to Umberto Cosmo for his comments by Piero Sraffa (who had received a transcription of Gramsci's letter from Tatiana Schucht). Cosmo responded to Gramsci's interpretation with a letter to Piero Sraffa on December 29, 1931. Sraffa attached a copy of Cosmo's comments to a letter to Tatiana Schucht on March i, 1932, and Tatiana Schucht, in turn, promptly transcribed them in a letter to Gramsci on March 9/ 1932. In this note Gramsci transcribes Cosmo's letter in its entirety, except for some opening and concluding epistolary niceties.

On Umberto Cosmo, see Notebook 1, §44/ n. 27.

Gramsci wrote at some length about Umberto Cosmo in two of his letters to Tatiana Schucht. The letter of February 23, 1931, contains some very interesting information about the relationship between, the two, which dated back to Gramsci's student years in Turin:

Sometime ago I received Vita di Dante [Life of Dante], by Professor Umberto Cosmo, which Piero [Sraffa] thought might interest me. I must say that from it I've drawn less satisfaction than I had thought, for various reasons, but especially because I got the impression that Cosmc/s scientific and moral personality has rather deteriorated. He must have become terribly religious in the positive sense of the word, that is, he must have undergone (certainly in a sincere and not a snobbish or careerist manner) the crisis that is taking place, it would seem, in many academic intellectuals following the creation of the University of the Sacred Heart, a crisis that would double and triple its victims if other Catholic universities were to open, with many more chairs for neoconverts from Crocean and Gentilian idealism. At the first opportunity ask Piero to tell you what is going on. I still remember, during my first year at the university, a fierce discussion between Cosmo, who was substituting for Arturo Graf in the course of Italian literature, and a student from Canton Ticino, Pietro Gerosa, a fanatical Rosminian and Augustinian, concerning the judgment delivered by De Sanctis on Cesare Cantù. Gerosa was immovable in asserting that De Sanctis's negative opinion was determined by political and religious sectarianism, because Cantù was Catholic and a federalist-republican (neo-Guelf)； while De Sanctis was Hegelian and a unification-monarchist ... and poor Professor Cosmo tried in vain to persuade him that De Sanctis was an impartial and objective scholar. For Cerosa, who had the temper of an inquisitor, Cosmo, too, was a diabolical Hegelian, dipped in the same infernal pitch as De Sanctis, and he did not hesitate to assert this openly with ample quotations from Rosmini and St. Augustine. About a year ago I saw that Cosmo and Gerosa had worked together to compile an anthology of Latin Christian writers of the first centuries, which made me decide that Hegel had capitulated to St. Augustine, through the good offices of Dante and especially St. Francis； of whom Cosmo has always been a fervent student. In any event, when I saw Cosmo the last time, in May 1922 (he was then secretary or counselor at the Italian embassy in Berlin), he still insisted that I write a study of Machiavelli or Machiavellianism； this had been a fixed idea of his since 1917—that I had to write a study of Machiavelli—and he reminded me of it at every occasion, although Machiavelli doesn't go very well with St. Francis and St. Augustine. With all that, I preserve a memory full of affection for Cosmo, and I would even say veneration, if this word did not have a meaning that does not suit my feelings； he was and I think still is a man of great sincerity and moral righteousness with many a streak of that inborn naiveté that is typical of great learned men and scholars. I will always remember our encounter in 1922 in the majestic entrance hall of the Italian embassy in Berlin. In November 19201 had written a very violent and cruel article against Cosmo such as one is able to write only at certain critical moments of the political struggle； I heard that he had begun to weep like a child and remained shut away at home for several days. Our personal cordial relations of teacher and former student broke off. When in 1922 the solemn doorman of the embassy deigned to telephone Cosmo in his diplomatic office that a certain Gramsci wished to be received, his ceremonial soul was thunderstruck when Cosmo descended the stairs at a run. and flung himself at me, inundating me with tears and beard saying again and again: "You understand why! You understand why!” He was in the throes of an emotion that astounded me but made me understand how much distress I must have caused him in 1920 and what his friendship with his students meant to him. Just look how many memories have sprung from this Vita di Dante [Life of Dante] and the remark by Piero (who, after all, was introduced to me for the first time precisely by Professor Cosmo).

Tatiana Schucht transcribed this letter for Piero Sraffa, who wrote to Cosmo, informing him that Gramsci wished to have news of his old professor and quoting some parts of Gramsci's letter. Cosmo responded with a letter to Piero Sraffa, August 10,1931, in which—after explaining that he had not responded more promptly because he had been sick—he reminisces briefly about his former students Gramsci and Gerosa, describes some of his recent scholarly work, and asks Sraffa to communicate his feelings of affection and admiration to Gramsci. (One of Cosmo's remarks is particularly interesting: he states that two of his favorite students, Gramsci and Gerosa, had z/opposite minds/1 2 3 4 5 6 7 but they resembled each other in one thing, namely, that when it came to the study of literature, they both "attached greater importance to the religious, social, and political element than to the aesthetic.”) Sraffa immediately sent a transcription of Cosmo's letter to Tatiana Schucht, who just as promptly copied its contents in a letter to Gramsci, dated August 13/ 1931. Gramsci怎 reflections on reading Cosmo's letter are recorded in an August 17, 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht:

lectuals of the time (that is to say, during the first fifteen years of the century)/ found ourselves on a common ground that was as follows: we were participating wholly or in part in the movement of moral and intellectual reform initiated in Italy by Benedetto Croce, whose first point was this: that modem man can and must live without reE-gionz and that means without religion revealed, positive, mythological, or whatever else you want to call it. This point seems to me even today the major contribution to world culture made by modem Italian intellectuals, and I regard it as a civic achievement that must not be lost, and so that somewhat apologetic tone displeased me and gave rise to that doubt. I would regret it now if my old professor had been. hurt because of me, also because it appears from his letter that he has been seriously ill. Despite everything, I hope to be able to see him again. and get caught up in one of those long discussions we used to have from time to time during the war years, strolling at night through the streets of Turin.

2. The parenthetical exclamation. point and question mark are Gramsci's.

3. Full citations of Umberto Cosmo's bibliographical references follow: Luigi Russo, Pioblemi di metodo (Bari: Laterza, 1929), a book on the problems of method in criticism； Vladimiro Arangio Ruiz, "Il problema estetico della Commedia” (The aesthetic problem of the Divine Comedy), La Critica 20 (1922): 340-57； Mario Botti, "Per lo studio della genesi della poesia dantesca. La seconda cantica: poesia e struttura nel poema” (For a study of the genesis of Dante怎 poetry. The second canticle: Poetry and structure in the poem). Annali dell"Istruzione Media (1930): 432-73； Michele Barbi, "Nuovi problemi della critica dantesca” (New problems in Dante criticism). Studi Danteschi 16 (1932), especially parts 2 and 3 of the essay: "Poesia e struttura nella Divina Commediaff (Poetry and structure in the Divine Comedy), pp. 47-5 6/ and Z/Per la genesi delPispirazione centrale della Divina Commedia,, (On the genesis of the central inspiration of the Divine Comedy]f pp. 56-67； Michele Barbi, “Con Dante e coi suoi interpreti^ (With Dante and his interpreters). Stadi Danteschi 15 (1931): 5-42； Michele Barbi, "Il canto di Farinata” (The Farinata canto), Studi Danteschi 8 (1924): 87-109.

4. Gramsci comments on Cosmo's response to his views on canto 10 of the Inferno in a March 21, 1932, letter to Tatiana Schucht:

I've read Professor Cosmo's remarks about the canto of Dante's Inferno. I thank him for his suggestions and his bibliographical indications. However, I do not believe it woidd be worthwhile to buy the issues of the periodicals he lists； for what purpose? If I wanted to write an essay for publication, these writings would not be sufficient

(or at least wouldn't seem sufficient to me and might give rise to an inhibited and dissatisfied state of mind)； in order to write something for myself, to while away the time, there's no point in importuning such solemn monuments as Michele Barbi怎 Studi Danteschi, which, quite possibly, on being read do not offer any necessary or indirectly useful ideas. The literature on Dante is so plethoric and prolix that the only justification for writing something on the subject would, it seems to me, be that of saying something truly new, with the greatest possible precision and the fewest possible words. I feel that Professor Cosmo himself suffers somewhat from the professional disease of the Dante specialists； if his suggestions were followed to the letter, one would have to write an entire book. Fm satisfied to know that the interpretation of the canto I have outlined is relatively new and worthy of treatment； for my humanity as an incarcerated man this is enough to encourage me to distill a few pages of notes that will not a priori seem a superfluity to me.

§87. Since one should not care a hoot about the solemn task ...

i. "Rastignac" was the pseudonym used by Vincenzo Morello. On Vincenzo Morello's small book on Dante (one half of which consists of the text of a lecture he delivered at the Casa di Dante in Rome), see Notebook 4, 83, and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§88. Shaw and Gordon Craig

i. See Aldo Sorani, /zGordon Craig e il teatro77 (Gordon Craig and the Theater), Il Marzocco, 1 November 1931 (XXXVI, 44).

This note ends on the second line of p. yv of the manuscript of Notebook 4； the rest of the page is left blank.

§90. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists

1. On Ugo Mioni, see Gramsci's comments in Notebook 3, §63； n. 17 in the corresponding Notes to the Text； and §100.

2. Unsigned review of Ugo Mion] Manuale di Sociologia (Turin: Marietti, 1932), in La Civiltà Cattolica 83 (August 20, 1932): 391-92.

On the Catholic integralists and the Jesuits, see, inter alia, Notebook 5, I, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. The social weeks of France (semaines sociales de France) are annual institutes in which courses and workshops are conducted by experts in theology, philosophy, and the social sciences, for the purpose of developing among the Catholic laity an awareness of and an approach to problems of social justice. The founding of the "social weeks" in 1904 was inspired primarily by the social doctrines enunciated in Pope Leo XIIFs encyclical Rerum novaium. Similaisocial weeks" have also been organized in Italy and in some other countries besides France.

4. Ferdinando Cavallera, Precis de la doctrine sociale catholique (Paris: Editions Spes, n.dj, p. 129.

§91. The cosmopolitan character of Italian intellectuals

1. Arturo Pompeati, “Tre secoli di italianismo in Europa” (Three centuries of Italianism in Europe), Il Marzocco 37, no. io (March 6, 1932). Pompeati's article consists of a discussion of Antero Meozzi's book on. the influence and dissemination of Italian literature in Europe from the fifteenth through the seventeenth century, Azione e diffusione della letteratura italiana in Emopa: Sec. XV-XVII (Pisa: Vallerini/ 1932), but it does not contain the bibliographical data recorded here by Gramsci； instead, Gramsci derived the details from a review of the same book by Benedetto Croce, which he mentions and quotes later in the note.

Arturo Pompeati (1880-1961), a literary critic who wrote monographs on Dante and Ariosto as well as essays on the relation of some modern writers to music, is best known for his authorship of a multivolume history of Italian literature.

2. The three chapters into which Meozzi's book is divided deal respectively with. Italian writers abroad, foreign writers in Italy, and the channels of dissemination of what he calls //Italianism./,

3. Benedetto Croce, review of Meozzix Azione e diffusione della letteratura italiana in Europa, La Critica 30, no. 3 (May 20, 1932): 217-18.

§92. Cultural topics

1. Ezio Levi, Castelli di Spagna (Milan: Treves, 1931),

Ezio Levi (1884-1941) wrote several books on Italian and Spanish poetry from the early Middle Ages through the Renaissance. In his writings he also dealt with the influence of the Arabic tradition on Spanish culture. Gramsci makes other references to Ezio Levi's work in Notebook 5, §42 and §123.

2. Angel Gonzalez Palencia's work on the legacy of Islam was reviewed by Ezio Levi in an article entitled luce della mezzaluna” (The light of the crescent) in II Marzocco 37, no. 22 (May 29/ 1932).

§93. Intellectuals. Brief notes on English culture

i. Guido Ferrando, “Libri nuovi e nuove tendenze nella cultura inglese” (New books and new currents in English culture), Il Marzocco 37/ no. 16 (Aprii 17, 1932).

For another note on English culture that is based on a different article by Guido Ferrando, see Notebook 9, §87.

§94. Concordat

i. The bibliographical information on Raffaele Jacuziozs commentary on the new laws that were enacted in Italy in conjunction with the concordat is extracted from an unsigned review in La Civiltà Cattolica 83 (September 3, 1932): 492-93. The quotation, too, is from this source.

On the concordat, see Notebook 4, §53, n. 1.

On Catholic Action, see Notebook i, “Notes and Jottings/7 n. 2/ 1:373.

On Alfredo Rocco, see Notebook i, §25, n. 1.

§95. History of the subaltern classes

I. Gramsci's source of information on Pietro Ellero's book on social issues was an unsigned article, “Il pensiero sociale dì S. Agostino: La funzione disciplinatrice del cristianesimo” (The social thought of St. Augustine: The disciplinary function of Christianity)； in La Civiltà Cattolica 83 (September 3/ 1932): 434-47. Gramsci's attention may have been attracted by the following passage in the article: 〃In his book on La quistione sociale [The social question]—which has fallen into oblivion™ Pietro Ellero asserts that the Gospel was animated by the antipolitical principle that formed those kinds of citizens who 'would never have been able to become magistrates, or soldiers, or courtiers, or subject, or rebels7 〃 (p. 435),

NOTEBOOK 5 (1930-32)
DESCRIPTION OF THE MANUSCRIPT

A ruled school notebook (14.7x19.8 cm) with hard black covers and a yellow spine. A label on the front cover carries the imprint of the stationer: "Gius. Laterza e figli, Bari." Inside the blank space of the label, Gramsci's prison number (7047) is written in black pencil. After Gramsci's death, Tatiana Schucht glued another label on the upper right-hand corner of the front cover, and on it she wrote: /zCompleto—da pg. 1 a 152. IX〃 (Complete—from p. 1 to 152. IX). The Roman numerals indicate the number that Tatiana Schucht assigned to the notebook according to the cataloging system she had devised when organizing Gramsci's papers soon after his death. This notebook has the same external characteristics as Notebook 3.

The notebook consists of seventy-six leaves with twenty-one lines on each side and unlined endpapers in front and back. The recto side of the front endpaper is stamped with the prison seal and with the seal of the prison warden. A signature directly underneath the latter is indecipherable； it probably belongs to one of the warden^ substitutes. The recto sides of the leaves are numbered (1-76) in blue ink and stamped with the prison seal: "Casa penale speciale di Turi” (Special prison of Turi}. The recto side of the endpaper inside the back cover is also numbered (77) but not stamped with the prison seal； it is otherwise blank. Gramsci wrote on both sides of the lined leaves and filled them entirely with his notes； this notebook thus contains 152 manuscript pages. In all, the notebook comprises 161 notes or sections. Of these, 16 notes are crossed out, but they remain perfectly legible (following Valentino Gerratana's denomination, these are called A texts), and all of them were incorporated by Gramsci in other notebooks. The other 145 notes are B texts: they are neither crossed out nor used again in other notebooks.

Most of the entries on miscellaneous topics in this notebook are the product of Gramsci's systematic review of periodicals he had received earlier in prison. A substantial number of notes refer to the 1928-29 issues of La Civiltà Cattolica and the 1929 issues of Nuova Antologia. The context of the composition of this notebook (and others from the same period) is provided by Gramsci himself in a letter to Tatiana Schucht, dated November 17, 1930: "For the time being you must not send me any books. Put the ones you have aside, and wait for me to tell you to ship them. I first want to get rid of all the old periodicals that have accumulated over four years: before sending them away I go through them again and take notes on the subjects that interest me most, and naturally this takes up a good part of my day, because the scholarly notes are accompanied by references, comments, etc.〃

Toward the end of §14 (on p. 9V of the manuscript), Gramsci writes: 〃To this day (October 1930), Father Rosa has not. . In all likelihood, then, Gramsci started this notebook sometime in very late September or in October 1930. The last few pages of the notebook were probably written during the last few months of 1931 and the beginning of 1932. In §146 (p. 721 of the manuscript) Gramsci makes an indirect reference to an article that appeared in the Nuova Antologia of August 16f 1931. The penultimate note, §160 (pp. 76r-76v in the manuscript), is based on a reading of a book by

G. Toffanin, Che cosa fu ^umanesimo, which Gramsci asked Tatiana Schucht to send to him in a letter of November 23, 1931.

In ^officina gramsciana: Ipotesi sulla struttura dei "Quaderni del carcere" (Naples: Bibliopolis,工984), p. 141, Gianni Francioni offers the following chronology of the composition of Notebook 5:

§§   1-14: October 1930

15-96: between October and November 1930

97: November 1930

98-135: between November and December 1930

136-45: December 1930

146-59: December 1930 (or between August 1931 and the beginning of 1932?)

160-61: early in 1932

NOTES TO THE TEXT

§1. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists

1. Catholic integralism had its roots in the early eighteenth centxiry. It arose as a reaction against the Enlightenment and the growth of rationalism and developed into an implacable enemy of Uberai politics and secular thought. The integralists found their initial inspiration in the early writings of Hughes-Félicité-Robert de Lamennais, which advocated a revival of Catholicism based on an uncompromising affirmation of the supreme authority of the papacy and a subordination of social and political life to Catholic doctrinal principles. (Lamennais subsequently modified his views drastically and broke with the church. On Lamennais, whose ideas had a strong influence on Italian religious and political thinkers, see Notebook 1, §71, n< 1.) In the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries, Catholic integralism gained considerable momentum as many elements of the church conducted an intransigent struggle against all forms of religious reform, liberalism, and secularism (which were often lumped together indiscriminately under the label of modernism). An especially important point of reference for the integralists was Pius IX, who formally condemned liberalism and the "errors" of modern thought in his encyclical Quanta cura (1864) and the Syllabus.

2. Pius X's papacy lasted a little over a decade (1903-14) and was characterized by an unqualified hostility toward all currents of modernization both within and outside the Catholic Church. Pius X sought to stamp out modernism, prohibited Catholics from forming social movements or popular action groups and thus participating in political life, and did everything he could to block the separation of church and state.

3. Umberto Benigni (1862-1934), a priest who attained the rank of monsignor, started his engagement in journalism early in his career. In 1891, having already spent some years editing a regional Catholic newspaper, he founded a periodical devoted to social issues, La Rassegna Sociale, which ceased publication in 1903. He taught church history at ecclesiastical institutions and for a time edited Miscellanea di Storia Ecclesiastica, which was open to some of the progressive ideas he would later denounce. His interest in politics and his conservative views were already evident in a book he published in 1897, Die Getreidepolitik der Päpiste, a defense of the Vatican's opposition to agrarian reform. From 1900 to 1904 he was editor in chief of Voce della Verità, a journal through which he gave full expression to his fierce and unyielding opposition to liberal political currents and modernism in general. He also wrote several volumes of church history and helped launch other conservative publica-tions, including two influential newsletters, La Corrispondenza in 1909 and Agence Internationale de Rome in 1912. Benigni held official positions in a number of different Vatican commissions and secretariats, and eventually he was attached to the Vatican's press office- These positions enabled him to assume a promment role in the battle against modernism during the pontificates of Leo XIII and Pius X and to lend his support to French monarchists and nationalists associated with Charles Maturasi Action Fran^aise.

Umberto Benigni founded the Sodalitium Pianum? or Sodality of St. Pius V (also known as 〃Sapini§re/〃 from the initials S and P] in 1909. The sodality was a shady organization controlled by die-hard integralists whose secret activities were aimed at undermining the authority of anyone一including reputable scholars, theologians； and high-ranking ecclesiastics—whom they deemed insufficiently committed to the all-out war against modernism and to the defense of the strictest Catholic orthodoxy. During World War 1, the German occupying forces in Ghent, Belgium, discovered a cache of documents that revealed the underhanded and conspiratorial methods employed by the integralists of the sodality against their enemies. The documents were transmitted to the Vatican authorities in i92i? and that same year the sodality was officially suppressed by the Holy See. Many adherents of the sodality continued to militate for the conservative cause within the ranks of the Action Fian^aise movement. Gramsci alludes to some of the nefarious activities of the Sodalitium Pianum in Notebook 5, §14.

In the later (C text) version of this note—i.e., Notebook 20, §4— Gramsci specifies that the Sodalitium Pianum was named after Pius V. His source of information on this detail was a book he had in prison, as he cites explicitly in Notebook 5, §14: Nicolas Fontaine, Saint-Siege, "Action Fran^aise" et ^Catholiques intégraux": Histoire critique, suivie, entre autres documents, d'un memoire sur le "Sodalitium Pianum" et de la MLettre du Gouverneur Smith" (Paris: Librairie Universitaire J. Gamber, 1928), p. 140.

4. Umberto Benigni, Storia sociale della Chiesa (Milan: Vallar di, 1906-30). A fifth volume of the same work was brought out by the same publisher in 1933.

5. The periodical Sillon was the organ of a progressive Catholic social movement known by the same name. It was founded in Paris in 1894 by the leading French Christian Democrat, Marc Sangnier. Pius X condemned the Sillon movement in 1910 because of its modernist heretical tendencies. (See also Gramsci^ passing reference to Marc Sangnier and Sillon in Notebook 勾 §73.)

6. Enrico Rosa, z/Risposta ad 'Una polemica senza onestà e senza legge7 (Reply to "A dishonest and unfounded polemic"), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (July 21, 1928}: 158-67. As its title indicates, this article by the Jesuit father Rosa is a rebuttal of the attack published against him by Ernesto Buonaiuti under the heading 〃Una polemica senza onestà e senza legge: Lettera aperta al P. Enrico Rosa SJ.〃 (A dishonest and unfounded polemic: An open letter to Father Rosa SJ.) in Ricerche Religiose 4 (1928): 329ff. Rosa怎 article is the direct source of the information. recorded by Gramsci in the rest of this note.

7. Umberto Benigni's polemical pamphlet Di fronte alla calunnia (Faced with slander) was published in Rome in 1928.

8. For additional remarks on the conservative Catholic weekly Fede e Ragione^ published in Florence, see Notebook 7, §107.

9. Ernesto Buonaiuti (1881-1956), a priest and an expert in the history of Christianity, was one of the most prominent and active modernist intellectuals in Italy. He was excommunicated in 1926 and forced to discontinue teaching the history of religion. at the University of Rome. In 1931 Buonaiuti was one of thirteen university professors who refused to take the mandatory oath of allegiance to Fascism and were compelled to resign from their academic positions. For five years (1905-10) he edited Rivista Storico-Critica delle Scienze Teologiche, a scholarly review he had founded that was devoted to historical and critical approaches to theology. In 1908 he published Lettere di un prete modernista (Letters of a modernist priest), an influential work in which he set forth his modernist views and displayed a somewhat open-minded attitude toward socialism. That same year he founded another periodical, Nova et Vetera, which was quickly condemned by the Catholic Church for the modernist positions it sought to advance. Buonaiuti was also a regular contributor to Studi Religiosi, which between 1901 and 1907, under the editorship of another priest, Salvatore Minocclii, became the primary vehicle for the dissemination in Italy of the modernist theories of the Irish Jesuit George Tyrrell (1861-1909) and the Frenchmen Maurice Blondel, Lucien Laberthonnière, and Alfred Loisy. Tyrrell translated Buonaiutizs booklet II programma dei modernisti (1907) into English； see The Programme of Modernism: A Reply to the Encyclical of Pius X, "Pascendi Dominici Gregis, " with the Text of the Encyclical in English, trans. G. Tyrrell, with an introduction by A. Leslie Lilley (London.: Putnam, 1908).

10. See Ernesto Buonaiuti, Le modernismi catholique, trans. René Monnot (Paris: Rieder, 1927). In his article, Enrico Rosa cites this work by Buonaiuti, but he does not indicate that it was published as part of the series //Christianisme/,； Gramsci must have had another source for this detailed information. In fact, Gramsci owned another book published in the "Christianisme" series (under the general editorship of P. L. Couchoud): namely, Louis Coulange^ La Messe (Paris: Rieder, 1927). Sometime after he wrote this note (probably during his time in Formia), Gramsci obtained a copy of Buonaiuti^ Le modernisme catholique, as can be seen from his remarks in the C text of this same note (Notebook 20, §4) and from the fact that it is conserved among his books. Gramsci also owned a copy of another work by Buonaiuti, Gesù il Cristo: Profilo (Rome: Formiggini, 1926)； see Notebook 2, Description of the Manuscript, 1:530.

ix. In his encyclical of September 8, 1907, Pascendi dominici gregis (Feeding the Lord's flock), Pius X formally condemned modernism, describing it as 〃the résumé of all heresies."

12. See Buonaiuti, "Una polemica senza onestà e senza legge/7 p. 335.

§2. Rotary Club

1. Gramsci uses the English phrase "open shop/7 As editor of the Ordine Nuovo he had published in the July 5 , 1921, issue a short article by Piero Sraffa (who was writing from England) entitled z/Lettere dalFes-tero: 'Open Shop Drive7 〃 (Letters from abroad: The open shop drive). Among other things, Sraffa wrote: "Most people take 'open shop' to mean the following: that workers must be employed regardless of whether they are organized or not. In reality, however, almost all the industrialists, as a rule, do not employ workers whom they know to be members of a trade union."

2. With a few exceptions, most notably the concluding remarks enclosed in parentheses, the contents of the rest of this note are extracted from an unsigned article, "Rotary Club e Massoneria” (The Rotary Club and Freemasonry), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (July 21, 1928): 97-109.

3. The civilian service club known as "Rotary" was founded in 1905 by a Chicago lawyer, Paul P Harris. In 1912 its name was changed to ^International Association of Rotary Clubs/7 and in 1922 it adopted the name by which it is still known today, "Rotary International/'

4. The article Rotary Club e Massoneria77 contains no reference to the review Realtà, edited by Giuseppe Bevione.

On Giuseppe Bevione, see Notebook if §25/ n. 1.

§3. Owen, Saint-Simon, and Ferrante Aporti's infant schools

1. The quotations as well as the other information contained in this note are all extracted from questione delle scuole infantili e dell'abate Aporti secondo nuovi documenti(The question of the infant schools and Abbé Aporti in the light of new documents), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (August 4, 1928): 219-32.

2. Gramsci also comments on Ferrante Aporti怎 infant schools in Notebook i, §46.

On Ferrante Aporti, see Notebook i, §46, n. 3.

3. On Raffaello Lambruschini, see Notebook 2, §5, and the accompanying Notes to the Text.

§4. Saint-Simonism, Freemasonry, Rotary Club

i. Gramsci expresses an interest in examinmg the influence of Saint-Simonism in Italy in Notebook 7, §59.

§5，Catholic social action

i. "La conferenza internazionale del lavoro/7 La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (August 4/ 1928): 233-43/ summarizes Albert Thomas怎 speech on pp. 239-43. Although the article is unsigned, it was in fact written by the Jesuit priest Angelo Brucculeri. Gramsci comments on another article by Brucculeri that discusses Albert Thomas in Notebook 2/ §n8.

On Albert Thomas, the French labor leader who was the first director of the International Labor Conference, see Notebook 1, §128, n. 2,

§6. Past and present

1, In two articles published in the Catholic newspaper of Turin, Il Corriere, on July 6 and July 8/ 1:926, Carlo Lovera di Castiglione expressed his support of an initiative undertaken by the Catholic periodical II Lavoratore to send a delegation of Catholic workers on a foreign study trip to the Soviet Union. Lovera?s articles sparked a fierce polemic； he was attacked not only by the Fascist press but also by a number of Catholic publications, including the Roman newspaper II Corriere d'Italia. An article published in II Corriere d'Italia on July 11, 1926 elicited a response from Lovera, published in II Corriere of Turin on July 13, 1926/ under the title Antifascisti ostinati o popolari in ritardo?” (Stubborn anti-Fascists or belated popularists?). Il Corriere dTItalia retorted with another, yet more vicious attack on Lovera: an article entitled "Gli sviluppi nelFin-voluzione antifascista" (The further decline of anti-Fascism), published on July 14, 1926. Extensive reports on Carlo Lovera di Castiglione怎 articles and on the polemics that surrounded them appeared in various issues of UUnità in July 1926.

2. The book title provided by Gramsci is incorrect. He is certainly referring to Guido MigliolVs Una storia e una idea (Turin: Tipografia C. Accame, 1926). Migliali怎 book is based on the author's observations and the information he gathered during a study trip he made to the Soviet Union. Gramsci had a copy of this book, and he refers to it again in Notebook io, II, §22.

Guido Miglioli (1879-1954), a lawyer by training, played a very active role in Catholic social movements. Prior to the war he was deeply engaged in the formation and leadership of peasant organizations. These activities as well as his opposition to Italian intervention in the war set him apart from mainstream Catholic politics. After the war he joined the Popular Party but retained his leftist leanings； among other things, he favored collaboration with the socialists and argued for an unqualified repudiation of Fascism. Conservatives denounced Miglioli (who was a member of parliament from 1913 to 1923) as a Christian revolutionist^ and a "white Bolshevik/' His house was destroyed by Fascist thugs in July 1922. Two years later, in an interview published in UUnità on December 1 iz 1924/ he suggested that workers of all political stripes should form a common front against Fascism. That led to his expulsion from the Popular Party. Miglioli fled into exile in 1926 but continued to combat Fascism and later managed to return to Italy and join the Resistance.

3. An article entitled "Neocattolici estetizzanti^ (Neo-Catholics with aesthetic attitudes), published in Piero Gobetti's journal Rivoluzione Liberale on April i6, 1922, contained a critical attack against Arte e Vita, a Catholic periodical published in Turin, of which Carlo Lovera di Castiglione was one of the editors (see Rivoluzione Liberale i, no. 9). Lovera responded by sending an article to Gobetti； it was published (with a short editorial comment) in the ''Esperienza liberale” (The liberal experience) section of Rivoluzione Liberale iz nos. 11-12 (May 4, 1922).

On. Piero Gobetti, see Notebook i, §44, n. 29.

Il Davide, a short-lived Catholic journal of philosophy and the arts edited by Giuseppe Gorgerino, was published in Turin； its first issue appeared on January 15, 1926.                        '

4. On Count Clemente Solaro della Margarita, see Notebook 2/ §62/ n. 4.

5. This last observation is based on information gleaned from an. unsigned article, "Visita del Solaro della Margarita a Pio IX nel 1846: Documenti inediti” (Solaro della Maragrita^ visit to Pius IX in 1846: Previously unpublished documents), that appeared in La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September 15, 1928): 497-515. Onp. 498, the author points out that in his research he used documents from the Solaro Archive 〃to which we had access thanks to the courtesy of the owner. Count Lovera di Castiglione/7

§7. On Catholic "social thought" ...

i. Pensiero e attività sociali” (Social thought and social action), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September iz 1928): 414-24. This unsigned article (which, in fact, is by the Jesuit priest Angelo Bmcculeri) discusses a number of different publications, among them, Albert Muller's Notes d'é-conomie politique, on. pp. 414-16. Gramsci uses information extracted from this article in the next three notes.

§8. America and the Mediterranean.

i. Gramsci's source of information on Giuseppe Frisella Vella's book (which discusses trade routes between America and Asia going through the Mediterranean) is the unsigned article (by Angelo Brucculeri), "Pensiero e attività sociali” (Social thought and social action), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September i,工928): 414-24； see especially pp. 416-19.

§9. Lucien Romier and Catholic Action in Fiance

1. For more on the social weeks of France {semaines sociales de France}, see Notebook 4, §9。《il 3.

On Lucien Romier, see Notebook 1, §6i； n. 7.

2. Pietro Gasparri (1852-1934) was made cardinal in 1907, and in 1914 Pope Benedict XV appointed him papal secretary of state, a position he held until 1931. Gasparri, who wielded extraordinary power within the church, was the principal Vatican negotiator with the Italian government in the discussions that led to the signing (by him and Mussolini) of the Lateran Pact in 1929.

3. Except for the bibliographic reference enclosed in square brackets, which Gramsci inserted between the lines at a later time, the information contained in this note is derived from the unsigned article (by Angelo Brucculeri)z "Pensiero e attività sociali" (Social thought and social action), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September 1, 1928): 414-24； see especially pp. 419-21.

§10. Catholic Action in Belgium

i. The data recorded in this note are taken from the unsigned article (by Angelo Brucculeri), "Pensiero e attività sociali” (Social thought and social action), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September iz 1928): 414-24； see especially pp.422-23.

§11. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists

1. Por other remarks by Gramsci on the conservative Catholic weekly Fede e Ragione, published in Florence, see Notebook 7, §107.

On the Catholic integralists, see Notebook $, §iz n. 1.

2. The questions raised by Gramsci in this note were probably stimulated by an unsigned article, “La recente calunnia dì Fede e Ragione con-tro La Civiltà Cattolica'1 (The recent calumny by Fede e Ragione against La Civiltà Cattolica}, in. La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September 15, 1928): 527-3l

§12. The Risorgimento. Solaro della Margarita

1. Gramsci alludes to Count Clemente Solaro della Margarita怎 Memorandum storico-polìtico (1851) in Notebook 2, §62； see also n. 4 in the corresponding Notes to the Text. The republication. of the Memorandum in 1930 elicited the remarks made by Gramsci in Notebook 6, §176.

On Count Clemente Solaro della Margarita, see Notebook 2, §6勾 n. 4.

2. “Visita del Solaro della Margarita a Pio IX nel 1846: Documenti inediti” (Solaro della Margarita's Visit to Pius IX in 1846: Previously unpublished documents), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (September 工5, 1928): 497-515

3 ・ In December 1845 the seven Catholic cantons of Switzerland formed a defense union—which their opponents labeled Sonderbund (Separatist League)—to oppose the anti-Catholic measures that were being taken by the other Protestant and liberal cantons. In August 1847 the Swiss Diet voted to disband the Sonderbund, expel the Jesuits, and draft a new federal constitution. A civil war ensued in November 1847； it lasted eighteen days and ended with the total defeat of the Sonderbund forces.

§13. Catholic Action

i. The bibliographical information. on this volume of writings by Pope Leo XIII on Catholic social doctrine is extracted from a notice that appeared in the "Bibliografia" section of La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (November 3, 1928): 265.

§14. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists

1. Unsigned article (in fact by the Jesuit father Enrico Rosa), Z/Uequilibrio della verità fra gli estremi dell,errore/, (The equilibrium of truth between the extremes of error), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (November 3, 1928): 193-203.

2. Nicolas Fontaine, Saint-Siège, "Action Fran^aise" et "catholiques intégiam": Histoire ciitique, suivie, entre autres documents, d'un mem-oire sur le ^Sodalitium Pianura" et de la "Lettre du Gouverneur Smith" (Paris: Librairie Universitaire J. Gamber, 1928). Gramsci received a copy of this book while he was at the Turi di Bari prison.

3. Le., the Sodalitium Pianum, or the Sodality of St, Pius’ also known, as Sapinière； see Notebook 5, §i, and n. 3 of the corresponding Notes to the Text.

4. ^Lequilibrio della verità/7 p. 19311.

5. Pope Pius XI publicly condemned the Action Fran^aise movement in 1926； the group's paper as well as various writings by its principal ideologues were placed on the Index of Forbidden Books.

On the relationship between Catholic integralism and the papacy of Pius X, see Notebook 5, §1, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 2.

6. The pontificate of Pius XI lasted from 1922 to 1939. He is best remembered for having signed the Lateran Accords with Mussolini怎 government in 1929.

7. On Charles Maurras, the most prominent leader of the Action Fran^aise movement, see Notebook 1, §14, n. 1.

8. ^Lequilibrio della verità/7 p. 194. The emphases are Gramsci's.

9. Ibid., p. 196. The emphasis and the parenthetical question mark are Gramsci's.

10. Louis Billot (1846-1931), born in Metz, was ordained as a priest in 1869 and joined the Jesuit order soon after. In 1885 he moved to Rome, where he taught dogmatic theology at the Gregorian University until 1911, when he was made a cardinal. A traditional Thomist with strong conservative views, Billot was uncompromisingly opposed to modernism and had very close ties with the Action Fran^aise movement. Soon after the latter was formally condemned by the pope, Billot gave up the office of cardinal and in 1927 retired to the Jesuit novitiate of Galloro, in Rome, where he spent the rest of his years in seclusion. One of Louis Billot's books attacking liberalism is available in English: Liberalism: A Cnticism of Its Basic Principles and Diverse Foims (Beatty, Pa.: Archabbey, 1922).

11. On Umberto Benigni (who sometimes published under the name of G. M. Mataloni), see Notebook 5/ §i, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially, n. 3.

The author of ''L'equilibrio della verità fra gli estremi dell'errore” claims, on p. 197 of his article, that the libelous anti-Jesuit writings that Abbé Boulin published under the pseudonym of Roger Duguet were often cited and reproduced by the activists of the Action Fran^aise and their allies.

12. See ''L'equilibrio della yerita/' pp. 197-98.

13. Ibid., p. 200. The emphases are Gramsci's.

工4. Pope Benedict XV's encyclical Ad beatissimi was published in La Civiltà Cattolica 65 (December 5, 1914): 513-43.

15. As examples of the anti-Jesuit publications compiled by Abbé Boulin under the pseudonym of I. de Recalde, see Histoire inténeure de la Compagnie de Jésus d'après les documents adaptés par I. de Récalde du récent ouvrage espagnol de Miguel Mir, vol. 1, Les principes (Paris: Librairie Moderne,工 922), and Ecrits des cures de Paris contre la politique et la morale des 佗suites (1:6587659) une étude sur la querelle du laxisme (Paris: Editions et Librairies, 1921).

16. "L'equilibrio della verità, " p. 20L

17. La Ronda, a monthly literary review, was founded in 1919 by a group of young writers (among them, Riccardo Bacchelli) reacting against the experimentalism and avant-garde currents of their time. The La Ronda writers cultivated technical and formal elegance and regarded themselves as the defenders of literary purity and autonomy. They affected a disdain for politics while seeking to recuperate the glories of national literary tradition, especially in prose. La Ronda ceased publication in 1923. In Notebook 23/ §33, Gramsci describes La Ronda as "a manifestation of Jesuitism in the arts/7

18. The parenthetical sic is Gramsci's.

19. "L'equilibrio della verità/7 p. 202.

20. Ibid., p. 20311.

21. Ibid., p. 203.

22. See the unsigned article ^Internazionalismo e nazionalismo nelle difamazioni di un'agenzia clandestina” (Internationalism and nationalism in the calumnies of a clandestine agency). La Civiltà Cattolica 78 (December 30, 1927): 385-400.

§15. Lucien Romier and Catholic Action in France

i. On Lucien Romier, see Notebook 1, §61, n. 7； see also Notebook 5, §9.

On Edouard Herriot, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 6.

§16. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists

1. Gramsci's source of information on Havard de la Montagne and on Rome, the French-language weekly published in the Italian capital, is Nicolas Fontaine, Saìnt-Siège, ^Action Frangais^ et ^Catholiques mté-graux”: Histoire critique, suivie, entre autres documents, dfun mémoire sur le "Sodalitium Pianum " et de la "Lettre du Gouverneur Smith(Paris: Librairie Universitaire J. Gamber, 1928)； see especially pp. 58-61. Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison.

2. On the Catholic integralistsz see Notebook 5, §i, n. 1.

On Charles Maurras, see Notebook i, §14/ n. 1.

§17. The Pan-Christian movement

1. On the "social weeks/7 which originated in France but were subsequently duplicated in other countries, see Notebook 4, §90, n. 3.

2. The proceedings of the fifteenth social week of Milan were published as La vera unità religiosa (Milan: Società Editrice Vita e Pensiero, 1928).

Gramsci derived the bibliographical data and other information used in this note from an unsigned article, 〃Gli atti della quindicesimo settimana sociale di Milano” (The Proceedings of the fifteenth social week of Milan), mLa Civiltà Cattolica 79 (November 17, 1928): 338-44.

3. Pius XTs encyclical Mortalium animos (1928) dealt specifically with the question of religious unity.

§18. Catholic social thought

1.  Autorità e ;opportunismo politico7 〃 (Authority and Apolitical opportunism^), La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (December i, 1928): 385-96.

2. On the Codice sociale (Social code), a handbook of Catholic social thought strongly influenced by the teachings of Pope Leo XIII, see Notebook 1, n. 2.

3. During the pontificate of the conservative and authoritarian Pius IX, the relationship between the Catholic Church and the secular governments of many countries in. Europe and elsewhere had become very strained. Many Catholics were alienated and isolated from the political and cultural life of modern secular society. Leo XIII, who was elected to succeed Pius IX in 1878, adopted a more conciliatory policy toward the civil authorities of certain states and, on occasion, a somewhat less rigid approach to the thorny question of the separation of state and church. (None of this, however, applied to Italy.) In Germany, for example, a policy of rapprochement with Bismarck brought an end to the bitter Kulturkampf. In addition, Leo XIII contributed to the reintegration of French Catholics into the life of the state when he enjoined them to support or to rally behind the republic (whence Gramsci's reference). For more, see Notebook x, §77, n. 2.

4. Louis Napoleon, who was elected president of France on December io, 1848, reinforced his hold on power with the successful coup d'etat of December 2,1851. He became Emperor Napoleon III on December 2,1852.

§19. Catholic Action in Italy

i. A summary of the unsigned article "Precisazioni” (Clarifications) originally published in the Vatican newspaper ^Osservatole Romano on November 17, 1928, appeared in the "Cose italiane” (Italian affairs) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (December rf 1928): 468-70.

§20. Machiavelli and Emanuele Filiberto

i. "Emanuele Filiberto di Savoia nel IV centenario della nascita” (Emanuele Filiberto of Savoy on the fourth centenary of his birth). La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (December 15, 1928): 485.

On Emanuele Filiberto, see also Notebook 2, §60 and §61, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§21. For the history of the Italian workers' movement

i. The bibliographical data on Agostino Gori's brief, posthumously published memoir, Ricordo (Florence: Tipografia M. Ricci, 1927) and the other information recorded in this note are extracted from a notice in the “Bibliografia" section of La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (December 15,1928): 553.

§22. Catholic Action in Germany

i. The information on Erhard Schlund怎 book on documents pertaining to Catholic Action and on its activities, Die Katholische Aktion: Matenelen und Akten (Munich: Verlag Josef Kosel and Friedrich Pustet, 1928), and on the first volume of Maximilian Kaller's study of the Catholic lay apostolato, Unser Laienapostolat (Leusterdorf am Rhein: Verlag des Johaimesbund, 1927), is extracted from a short article, “L'Azione Cattolica in Germania” (Catholic Action in Germany), in the "Rivista della stampa” (Review of the press) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (December 15, 1928): 536-39.

§23. Brief notes on Chinese culture

1. For Gramsci's views on Esperanto； see Notebook i, §73, n. 2, as well as Notebook 3, §73, n. 4, and §76, n. 3.

2. Gramsci discusses Middle Latin at some length in Notebook 3, §76.

3. Sun Yat-sen (1866-1925) was born in the South Chinese province of Kwangtung but spent some of his youth in Hawaii before graduating from medical school in Hong Kong in 1892. He soon abandoned medicine in favor of a political career, and by 1894 he was back in Hawaii, where he established the Revive China Society to oppose the Ch?ing dynasty and struggle for the modernization of China. During the crisis that ensued following China's defeat in the Sino-Japanese war in 1895/ Sun Yat-sen returned to Hong Kong with a plan to stage an uprising in Canton. The plot went awry, and he went into exile for sixteen years, during which period he lived in various countries, most notably England, the United States, Canada, and Japan. Wherever he went, he continued working incessantly to construct a political and financial base for his revolutionary movement (in 1905, at a conference held in Tokyo, he was named head of the Alliance Society, a coalition of revolutionary groups operating from within China and abroad). From the many years he spent in exile, he also acquired a profound understanding of Western politics, society, and culture.

Sun Yat-sen rushed back to China from the United States in December 1911, when the revolution that would overthrow the Manchu dynasty was already under way； that same month he was elected provisional president of the Republic of China, a position he held only until February 12, 1912. In the turbulent years that followed, his political fortunes fluctuated greatly. During this period the loosely organized Alliance Society was refashioned into a political party that called itself the Kuomintang (Nationalist Party). Sun Yat-sen finally succeeded in gaining control of the country in 1923, when he installed himself as generalissimo. The backing he received from the Soviet Union enabled him in no small measure to consolidate his hold on power. Among other things, the Soviets enjoined the Chinese Communist Party to support and cooperate with the Kuomintang. Sun Yat-sen, for his part, set about reorganizing the Kuomintang, which not only came to resemble the Soviet Communist Party in its structure but also agreed to elect three communists to its central executive committee. After his death. Sun Yat-sen came to be regarded as a great modernizer and a pioneer of the Chinese revolution. The major political document bequeathed by Sun. Yat-sen is a set of sixteen lectures on what he called the "Three Principles of the People”—i.e., nationalism {min-tsu chu-i}f democracy {min-ch'üan. chu-i)f and the people's livelihood, or the regulation of private capital and landed property {min-sheng chu-i]. The text of this work is available in English； see Sun Yat-sen, San Min Chu I: The Three Principles of the People, trans. Frank W. Price and ed. L. T. Chen (Shanghai: Commercial Press, 1927； reprint. New York: Da Capo, 1975). Gramsci writes about the "Three Principles of the People77 in Notebook 5, §51 and §122.

4. Prospero Intorcetta (1625-96), Christian Herdtrich (1625-84、 Francois Rougemont (1624-76), and Phillipe Couplet (1622-92) were all Jesuit priests who spent many years as missionaries in China. Each wrote books on diverse topics pertaining to China； theirs were among the earliest writings to provide European readers with more or less reliable works on. specific aspects of Chinese history, language, and culture. All four missionaries collaborated on one major project, an edition and translation (from Chinese into Latin) of a selection of Confucian texts: Confucius Sinarum philosophus, sive scientia Sinensis Latine exposita (Paris: D. Horthemels, 1687). The volume contains translations of Lun yü (Analects) and of two separate chapters from Li chi (Record of rights): namely, Ta hsüeh (Great learning) and Chung yang (Doctrine of the Mean). These three Confucian texts, together with Meng-tzu (Mencius), are known as the Ssu shu (Four books)； they were originally published in 1190 by the Neo-Confucian philosopher Chu Hsiz whose commentaries are regarded as fundamentally important for the study of the Confucian canon. The edition of selected Confucian texts in Latin by Intorcetta and his collaborators attracted considerable attention among European scholars, and within a few years an abridged version of it was translated into English； see The Morals of Confucius, a Chinese Philosopher, Who Flourished above Five Hundred Years Before the Coming of Our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ: Being One of the Most Choicest Pieces of Learning Remaining of That Nation. (London: Randal Taylor, 1691).

5. The magnum opus of Jean-Baptiste du Halde (1674-1743), a Jesuit missionary who traveled widely in China and other parts of the Far East, was in fact first published in 1735, in a lavish four-volume edition with several copperplate engravings and folded maps； see J.-B. du Halde, Description géographique, histozique, chronologique7 politique, et physique de Fempire de la Chine et de la Tartaric chinoise, 4 vols. (Paris: P. G. Lemercier, 1735). It was almost immediately translated into English: The General History of China: Containing a Geographical, Historical, Chronological, Political, and Physical Description of the Empire of China, Chinese-Tartary, Corea, 4 vols., trans. Richard Brookes (London: J. Watts, 1736).

6. Etienne Fourmont (1683-1745) received his formal training in philology and biblical exegesis. In 1715 he became a professor of Arabic and later also of Hebrew at the Collège de France. He became engaged in the study of Far Eastern languages in 1722, when he was put in charge of oriental manuscripts at the royal library. He never visited China and acquired knowledge of the Chinese language with the help of a young man from Canton who was brought to France by a missionary priest, Fourmont's main contribution to eighteenth-century sinology was his work on Chinese script and syntax, Linguae Sinarum mandarincae hiero-glyphicae grammatica (Paris: H. L. Guerin, 1742).

Joseph-Henri de Prémare (1666-1736), a Jesuit missionary in China, is best remembered for his posthumously published writings on the Chinese language and religion； see Notitia linguae sinicae (Malacca: Academiae Anglo-Sinensis, 1831) and the booklet Letties inédites du P. Prémare sur le monothéisme des chinois (Paris, 1861).

7. The chair of Chinese language and literature at the Collège de France was created by the minister of the interior, Abbé Francois Montesquiou-Fezensac, who appointed Abel Rémusat (1788-1832) to it on November 9, 1814. Rémusat's inaugural lecture, delivered on January 16,1815, is reproduced in the booklet Programme du coms de langue et de littératme chinoises et de tartare-mandchou (Paris: Charles, 1815) In 1822 he founded the Société Asiatique of Paris, and in 1824 he was named administrator of the oriental manuscripts collection in the royal library. Rémusat produced a large body of work on Chinese language, history, religion, and literature. He also edited and translated numerous texts from Chinese and other oriental languages into French. His major books include Recheiches sur les langues tartares； ou, Mémoires sur différents points de la grammaire et de la littérature des Mantchoux, des Ouigours, et des Thibétains (Paris: Imprimerie Royale, 1820) and Elements de la grammaire chinoise； ou7 Principes généraux du Kou-wen, ou style antique, et du Kouan-hoa, c"està-dire, de la langue commune généralement usitée dans Fempire chinois (Paris: Imprimerie Royale, 1822).

8. Stanislas Julien (1799-1873) had already distinguished himself as a student of modern languages at the Collège de France when in 1824 he decided to study oriental languages with Abel Rémusat. Within a few years he established himself as the leading sinologist of his generation, and in 1832 he succeeded Rémusat as professor of Chinese language and literature at his alma mater. He also taught at the Ecole des Langues Orientales. Julien translated (often supplying explanatory notes and commentary) an impressive number of literary and philosophical texts from Chinese into French, including Lao-tzu's Tao-te Ching (The way and the power), which appeared as Le livre de la voie et de la vertu (Paris: Imprimerie Royale, 1842)； he also wrote extensively on various aspects of Chinese history and culture. His studies on Chinese grammar and lexicography were used by sinologists and linguists throughout Europe, Julien's last major publication was Syntaxe nowelle de la langue chinoise fondée sur la position des mots, suivie de deux traités sur les particules et les principaux termes de grammaire, d'une table des idiotismes； de tables, de legendes et d'apologue, traduit mot à motf 2 vols. (Paris: Librairie de Maisonneuve, 1869-70).

9. Gramsci is referring to Franz Nikolaus Finck, Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises, 3d ed. (Leipzig-Berlin: Teubner, 1923). He had ordered a copy of this book (first published in 1909) when he was in prison in Milan awaiting trial. A different book by Finck~~Die Haupttypen des Sprachbaus (Leipzig: Teubner, 1910)—was sent to him by mistake. He wrote to Tatiana Schucht, October 3, 1927:

I had ordered a small book by Finck from the Sperling and Kupfe了 bookstore (Via Larga 23)； since I didn't remember the title, instead of the book I wanted they've sent me one that might be rather interest； ing for a person who wants to study Chinese, Lap, Turkish, Georgian, Samoan, and the dialect of the Negroes of Zambia, but it is not yet of interest to me, since I have not as yet decided to undertake such arduous labors. The exact title of the book I want is: F. N. Finck, Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises, published by Teubner, in Leipzig, in the series "Aus Natur und GeistesweltThis is a classification of all the languages in the world, but the subject of the book is only the classification and not the separate study of the languages. Instead, the book I received is definitely devoted to the basic grammatical eie-merits of the languages I mentioned above (as well as Arabic and modern Greek), together with a selection of texts.

A short time later, Gramsci received a copy of the third edition of Finck's Die Sprachstämme des Erdkreises^ as he informed Tatiana in his letter of November 14, 1927. After he got permission to write in his cell, following his transfer to the prison of Turi di Bari, Gramsci translated Finck's book in. its entirety (Translation Notebooks B and C).

Franz Nikolaus Finck (1867-1910), whose early work dealt with Celtic dialects, produced an impressive number of studies on an extraordinarily broad range of languages and literatures: Arabic, Coptic, Armenian, Slavic, Baltic, and several others.

10. Alberto Castellani, "Prima sinologia” (Early sinology), Il Marzocco 34, no. 8 (February 24, 1929).

11. See Alberto Castellani, 〃Una valutazione sintetica della letteratura cinese” (A concise assessment of Chinese literature), Il Marzocco 32/ no. 30 (July 24/ i9^7)>

12. The Neo-Confucian philosopher, Chu Hsi (1130-1200), was the preeminent Chinese philosopher of this millennium. His moral philosophy stressed the importance of self-cultivatioii/ while his own ability to combine the life of a scholar with a career in. public service was for long held to be exemplary. For centuries, study of his commentaries on the classical texts was mandatory for anyone pursuing higher education in China.

13. Léon Wieger, La Chine à travers les ages, 2d ed. (Hien-hien, 1924).

14. Alberto Castellani, “Filosofia cinese in veste europea e . . . giapponese^ (Chinese philosophy in European and Japanese guise), Il Marzocco 32, no. 43 (October 23, 1927).

15. Alfred Forke (1867-1944), a renowned German sinologist, produced important studies on various aspects of Chinese culture. Among other works he translated several dramatic and poetic texts from Chinese into German. Above all, Forke contributed significantly to the appreciation and understanding of Chinese philosophy； among his many publications on the subject, see The World Conception of the Chinese: Their Astronomical, Cosmological, and Physico-Philosophical Speculations (London: A. Probsthain, 1925).

16. Hu Shih (1919-62) received a formal Chinese education, with its traditional emphasis on the Confucian classics and orthodox literary form, before attending university in the United States. He obtained his Ph.D. in. philosophy in 1917 from Columbia University, where he wrote his doctoral thesis under the direction of the pragmatist philosopher John Dewey. The thesis was later published in both Chinese and English； see The Development Method of the Logical Method in Ancient China (Shanghai: Oriental Book Co., 1922). When he returned to China, Hu Shih joined the faculty of Peking National University and became a leader in the movement for cultural and educational reform. He worked hard to promote and disseminate vernacular literature； a literature accessible to the masses. (The vernacular became the official national language by government decree in 1920.) In his writings he also made a strong case for the critical reevaluation of the Chinese classical tradition in literature, philosophy, and historiography. One of his important early works in this regard is the book on the history of Chinese philosophy mentioned by Gramsci (which has not been translated into English): Chung-kuo che-hsüeh shih ta-kang (Shanghai, 1919). In 1933 Hu Shih delivered the Haskell Lectures in Comparative Religion, which were then published in a volume entitled The Chinese Renaissance {Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1934). Between 1938 and 1942 Hu Shih resided in Washington, D.C.； he returned to China after the war and in 1945 was appointed chancellor of Peking National University. Hu Shih left China in 1949 and went to live in New York City, where he remained until 1958, when he moved to Taiwan.

17. Gramsci obtained the bibliographical information on Alberto Castellani^ book outlining the doctrine of Taoism, La dottrina del Tao ricostruita sui testi ed esposta integralmente (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1927), and his book on the celestial rule" of Lao-Tzu, La regola celeste di Lao-Tse (Florence: Sansoni, 1927), from an article by Adolfo Faggi, Sapere cinese” (Chinese knowledge), Il Marzocco 32, no. 24 (June 12, 1927).

18. Le.? the provincial military rulers who operated like warlords.

§24. Past and present. Respect for the national artistic heritage

1. Luca Beltrami, “Difesa d'arte in luoghi sacri e profani^ (Protection of art in secular and religious sites), Il Marzocco 32, no. 20 (May 15, 1927).

On Luca Beltrami, see Notebook i, §24/ n. 2.

2. The "episodes of vulgar ostentation" mentioned here are related to a banquet followed by a ball that was held at the Castel Sforzesco museum in. Milan.

§25. Machiavelli and Manzoni

i. Tommaseo^ book consists of Tommaseo^ account of his conversations with the novelist Alessandro Manzoni, whom the author befriended during a sojourn in Milan.

Niccolò Tommaseo (1802-74) produced an enormous body of work on a great diversity of subjects: history, literature, education, politics, religion. He also wrote poetry and a novel, in addition to compiling two die-tionaries. Although a steadfast Catholic, he had profound liberal convictions and strong nationalist sentiments. Because of his political views he was compelled to spend several years in exile. He also spent several months in jail in Venice (in 1847-48) for publicly campaigning for freedom of the press.

2. See Giuseppe S. Gargàno, "Manzoni in Tommaseo” (Manzoni in Tommaseo怎 work), Il Marzocco 34, no. 5 (February 3, 1929).

§26. Father Bresciani's progeny. Alfredo Fanzini

1. Alfredo Panzini's translation of Hesiod's Wozks and Days was published as Le opere e i giorni (Milan: Treves, 1928).

On Fanzini, about whom Gramsci makes many derogatory comments scattered throughout the notebooks, see Notebook i, §13, n. 1.

2. Angiolo Orvieto, "Da Esiodo al Fanzini,II Marzocco 34, no. 5 (February 3, 1929).

3，The Fascist government tried extremely hard to halt the exodus of peasants from the countryside and from unproductive regions to the cities and the industrial centers. It launched an ambitious land reclamation program and attempted to enhance the life of the rural population by improving agricultural productivity. The Ministry of Public Works formed a permanent Committee on. Internal Migrations in 1926, and an Office of Migrations and Internal Colonization was created in 1928. And as part of its campaign to stem internal migration, the government propaganda machine sought to generate and disseminate an attractive, quasi-idyllic image of rural life.

§27. Father Bresciani's progeny

i. Enrico Corradini's play Carlotta Corday Was reprinted with a preface by the author in 1928/ in the drama series "Collezione teatrale" put out by the Florentine publisher Barbèra. Gramsci's observations are based on an article by the pseudonymous Gaio: ^Carlotta Corday di Enrico Corradini// Il Marzocco 34/ no. 5 (February 3, 1929}.

On Enrico Corradini, see Notebook 4 §58, n. 3.

§28. Ideology, psychologism, positivism

l Gramsci probably wrote this note after reading an article by Adolfo Faggi, 〃L'ultimo degli psicologisti: G. Brandes^ (The last of the psychologists: G. Brandes), in II Marzocco 32, no. 23 (June 5, 1927). Faggi wrote, among other things: "Psychologism was already linked to eighteenth-century French "ideology/ and having been amplified and integrated with the theory of milieu, it was supported and reinforced by nineteenth-century positivism. Its decline in our time explains why Brandes's work has faded into relative obscurity."

Georg Brandes (1842-1927), the Danish scholar who wrote extensively on nineteenth- and early twentieth-century literature and philosophy, was strongly influenced during his formative years by the ideas of Taine, Renan, and John Stuart Mill, all three of whom he met in Paris. His major work in literary history and criticism is Hovedstromninger i det aarhundredes littezatur (1871-87)； for an English translation, see Main Currents in Nineteenth-Century Literature, 6 vols., trans. D. White and M. Morison (New York: Heinemann, 1901-5).

In many of his writings, the scholar and critic Hippolyte Taine (1828-93), one of the most powerful exponents of positivism in France, sought to counter spiritualist philosophy by applying what he regarded as "the scientific method77 to the study of literature, art, metaphysics, ethics, and psychology. In his analyses of literature, Taine took pains to demonstrate that the production and character of literary texts are determined by the inherited personality ("la raceff) of their authors and by the sociocultural context               as well as the historical situation

moment"} in which they are composed. Tame's approach to literature is expounded most thoroughly in his four-volume Histoire de la littératme anglaise {1863-64)； for an English translation, see History of English Literature, 4 vols., trans, H. Van Laun (New York: Ungar, 1965). The argument for applying the scientific (ie, experimental) method to the study of psychology is laid out most systematically by Taine in his De Pintelli-gence (1870)； for an English translation, see On Intelligence, 2 vols., ed. Daniel N. Robinson, trans. T. D. Haye (Washington, D.C.: University Publications of America, 1977).

§29. East-West

i. Gramsci extracted the information on Henri Bergson's lecture and the reference to the French philosopher's book Lénergie spirituelle {Paris, 1920) from an article by Antonino Pagliaro: "Sapienza indiana” (Indian knowledge), Il Marzocco 32, no. 23 (June 5, 1927).

Antonino Pagliaro (1898-1973^ a linguist and literary critic, produced scholarly works on Aryo-European linguistics and on Persian literature. He was also an expert in semantics, and in several publications he brought his semantic theories to bear on. the interpretation of literary texts, including Dante's Divine Comedy.

The lecture to which this note alludes was deEvered by Bergson to the Society for Psychical Research in London on May 28, 1913. It is reprinted as one of the chapters in Bergson's Leneigie spirituelle. In the English translation, Mind-Energy: Lectures and Essays, trans. H. Wildon Carr (London: Macmillan, 1920)； the relevant passage appears in chap. 3, 〃 'Phantasms of the Living" and 'Psychical Research7 ":

I have sometimes asked myself what would have happened if mod* ern science, instead of setting out from mathematics to turn its direction. towards mechanics, physics and chemistry, instead of bringing all its forces to converge on the study of matter, had begun by the consideration of mind—if Kepler, Galileo and Newton, for example, had been psychologists. They would have produced a psychology of which to-day we can form no idea, just as before Galileo no one could have imagined what our physics would be—a psychology which probably would have been to our present psychology what our physics is to that of Aristotle. Foreign to every mechanistic idea, science would have studied eagerly, instead of dismissing a priori, phenomena such as those you study； perhaps "psychical research,z would have stood out as its principal preoccupation. The most general laws of mental activity once discovered (as, in fact, the fundamental principles of mechanics were discovered), science would have passed from pure mind to life.... So would have been founded, so would have developed, the science of mind-energy. But when this science, following the manifestations of mind step by step from higher to lower, passing life and organization, had come at last to inert matter, it would then have stopped abruptly, surprised and dismayed. It would have tried to apply its accustomed methods to this new object, and it would have obtained no hold on it, just as to-day the processes of calculation and measurement have no hold on the things of the mind. It is matter, and not mind, which in this case would have been the realm of mystery, (pp. 79-81)

§30. The international function of Italian intellectuals

i. The source of Gramsci怎 information for this note is a short item in the "Marginalia" section of II Marzocco 35/ no. 4 (January 26, 1930).

§31. On the Italian national tradition

i. The source of the information and quoted passages in this note is Bernardino Barbadoro's brief article "Sicilia e Italia sotto Federico II" (Sicily and Italy under Frederick II) in the "Marginalia" section of II Marzocco 33, no. 51 (December 16f 1929), in which Barbadoro cites an unsigned item, /zNel settimo anniversario della seconda lega Lombarda” (On the seventh centenary of the second Lombard League), that appeared in the "Marginalia" section of II Marzocco 31, no. 39 (September 26,0:926).

2. Quoted in Barbadoro, “Sicilia e Italia sotto Federico II.〃

Frederick I (ca. 1123-90), of the Swabian House of Hohenstaufen, whom the Italians nicknamed Barbarossa, was elected German king in 1152 and crowned emperor by Pope Adrian. IV in 1155. In his efforts to assert imperial rights fully he conducted several campaigns in Italy. The resentment aroused by his destruction of Milan in 1162 led to the formation of the Lombard League, which had the support of those who had reason to be threatened by Frederick's consolidation of power, especially the pope (Alexander 口 at the time), the Venetians, and William of Sicily.

Barbarossa^ grandson Frederick II (1194-1250), whose father Henry VI had conquered Sicily, was crowned emperor by Pope Honorius III in 1220. In his person he thus unified the Kingdom of Sicily (which extended as far north as Naples) and the empire. His assertion. of imperial authority, however, was resisted by, among others, the pope and the cities of Lombardy. The Lombard League was reconstituted in 1226 (hence the reference in this note to the /zsecond Lombard League"). Frederick II militarily defeated the Lombard League at Cortenuova in 1237. At the same time he designated his son as king of Sardinia. Fearing that his power would be subordinated to that of the emperor and that his suzerainty in the papal states would be threatened next, the pope (Gregory IX, at the time) excommunicated the emperor. Frederick's reaction was to strengthen his control over Italy (particularly in the north) and the Kingdom of Sicily. He also sent his army into central Italy, and in 1240 it entered the papal states and subsequently occupied Rome. This conflict between the empire and the papacy gave rise to the parties known as the Ghibellines {supporters of imperial rule) and the Guelfs (backers of papal authority). In 1242 negotiations between Pope Innocent IV and Frederick H ended in failure； seemingly because of disagreement concerning the status of the Lombard states. The pope took refuge in Lyons, where he convened a council in 1245 and formally deposed the emperor. The struggle for supremacy between the papacy and the emperor raged for several more years, but by the time of Fredericks death the unifying power of the empire was already in decline.

3. See Barbadoro； "Sicilia e Italia sotto Federico II.〃

§32. Ugo Foscolo and Italian literary rhetoric

i. In his best-laiown poem? Dei sepolcri (On tombs), first published in 1807, Ugo Foscolo (1778-1827) eulogizes the past glories of Italy through a series of reflections on the tombs of great men such as Machiavelli, Michelangelo, and Galileo.

2. Ugo Foscolo, responding to the French critic Sylvestre Guillon, asserted that his poetic meditation on the tombs of great men wasz indeed, politically motivated. His aim was "to inspire political emulation in Italians" by promoting "the resurrection not of bodies but of virtues" (U. Foscolo, Opere [Florence: Le Morniier, 1972], 6:518).

Gramsci's observations in this note were triggered by his reading of an article by Giuseppe Gargàno, 〃Le tombe ispiratrici e i Sepolcri del Foscolo” (The inspiring tombs and Foscolo's Dei sepolcri), Il Marzocco 32/ no. 50 (December n, 1927).

§33. M. Iskowicz, La littératuie à la lumière du matéiialisme historique

i. Gramsci must have received in prison a copy of this bulletin announcing the new books published by the Maison du Livre Frangaise (mlf), but it is not preserved among his books.

§34. Past and present

I, Gramsci's comments on Giuseppe PrezzoEni and his review La Voce are scattered throughout the notebooks. See, inter alia； Notebook i, §90. On Prezzolini, see Notebook i, §8, n. 1.

Leonardo, a cultural periodical devoted primarily to philosophy and literature, was founded in Florence in 1903 by Giovanni Papini, who coedited it with Giuseppe Prezzolini. The writers associated with the journal exhibited certain nationalistic tendencies； they saw it as their mission to revitalize Italian culture. Leonardo also came to be seen as a major proponent of pragmatist philosophy in. Italy: William James established closed contacts with Papini in 1905 and contributed significantly to the study of pragmatism in. Italy. Some of C. S. Peirce's work also was published in Leonardo (which ceased publication in 1907).

On Giovanni Papini and his avant-garde periodical Lacerba (published twice a month between 1913 and 1914 and weekly, a total of twenty-one issues, in 1915 until Italy entered the war), see Notebook i, §8/ n. 1.

On Gaetano Salvemini, the founder and editor of the political weekly Unit% see Notebook i, §25/ n. 19.

Giani Stuparich怎 Scipio Slataper (Florence: Casa Editrice La Voce, 1922) is not among the books owned by Gramsci that have been preserved. It seems unlikely that he had a copy of it during his incarceration； most probably, he had read it at an. earlier time.

Scipio Slataper (1888-1915 ) was born in Trieste and studied literature at the University of Florence. He became closely involved with La Voce, though he drifted away from it around 1913. His autobiographical work II mio Carso (1912) is regarded as one of the finest pieces of early twentiethcentury Italian prose. In it, as in some of his more overtly political writings, Slataper attacks the irredentism of certain segments of the bourgeoisie in Trieste； for him, their nationalist sentiments were little more than a veneer meant to conceal crass economic interests. Slataper, who enlisted in the army when Italy entered the war, was killed in action not far from Carso, the very same area that provided him with the setting for his finest writing. Many of Slataper怎 writings were published posthumously by Giani Stuparich.

Giani Stuparich (1891-1961), born, in Trieste, started his university studies in Prague and completed them in Florence. In 1915 he published his first book, a historical and political monograph on the Czech people. That same year he joined the army as a volunteer, and with his friend Slataper he experienced combat on the front lines in the Carso region. In addition to his biography of Sktaper, he wrote a book on his relationship with his brother (who also died in the war, on the same front) and a number of other autobiographical works related to his wartime experiences. By the early 1930s Stuparich was also making his mark as a novelist, and over the years he produced a considerable body of fiction.

§35. Risorgimento

i. On September 15, 1864, the Italian government (with Marco Minghetti as prime minister) signed a controversial treaty with France that came to be known as the September Convention. Napoleon Ut, who had assumed the role of protector of what was left of the Papal States, undertook to withdraw French troops from Rome within two years, thus giving the pope time, in theory, to assemble an international army, which was supposed to serve a purely defensive purpose. In return, Italy undertook to refrain from attacking Rome, to respect the integrity of the papal territory, and to assume part of the debts that had been incurred by the Papal States, which had since been incorporated into the new Italian nation. Furthermore, in order to demonstrate that it no longer had designs on Rome, Italy pledged to establish its new capital in a another city within six months, A special commission was appointed to select the appropriate city, and it designated Florence. The news that the government had renounced the idea of Rome as the future capital of the country was greeted with massive protests, especially in Turin, where the reaction was particularly violent. In two days of riots (on September 21-22) angry crowds looted stores, attacked newspaper offices, and tried to break into the government buildings. The police, backed by military detachments, responded with force, firing into the crowds； more than fifty people died in the clashes. The bloodshed was such that Prime

Minister Minghetti was compelled to resign. Nevertheless, in. spite of the popular discontent (and his own lack of enthusiasm for the agreement), the king, Vittorio Emanuele II, left Turin and established his residence in Florence.

2. Gramsci extracted the bibliographical data and other information on the edition of Massimo D'Azeglio's private letters to Teresa Targioni Tozzetti from an article by Giuseppe Gargàno, "D'Azeglio politico nel-(The intimate side of D'Azeglio the politician), Il Marzocco 3 5, no. 26 (June 29, 1930).

On Massimo D'Azeglio, see Notebook i, §121, n. 1.

§36. Past and present

1. 〃La prima seduta pubblica deirAccademia d'Italia” (The first public session of the Italian Academy), LItalia Letteraria 2/ no. 24 (June 15, 1930).

The Accademia dltalia, which was meant to be the Italian equivalent of the Académie Fran^aise was established by a special legislative act in 1926. It did not formally come into existence, however, until 1929, when it was inaugurated with a solemn ceremony in the Campidoglio. The first group to be inducted into the academy included the playwright Luigi Pirandello, the physicist Enrico Fermi, the composer Pietro Mascagni, and the futurist artist Filippo Tommaso Marinetti. Some eminent intellectuals, such as Benedetto Croce, refused to have any connection with the academy for fear of being seen as supporters of the Fascist regime.

2. Antonio Aniante, "Cronaca per la storia” (For the historical record), ^Italia Letteraria 2, no. 24 (June 1930).

Antonio Aniante was the pseudonym used by the novelist and playwright Antonio Rapisarda (b. 1900). In 1930 he moved to France, where he lived for several years, writing, among other things. Vie et aventures de Marco Polo, which earned a prize from the Académie Frangaise in 1938.

§37. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals

i. Stefan Zweig, “Influence du sud sur Nietzsche/' Les Nouvelles Littéraùes 9, no. 405 (July 19/ 1930). A note at the end of Zweig怎 article reads: "Traduction inèdite d^Alzir Hella et Olivier Bourn.ac.,/

§38. The non-national-popular character of Italian literature

i. Orazio Pedrazzi, “Le tradizioni antiletterarie della burocrazia ital-ianan (The antiliterary traditions of the Italian bureaucracy)； L'Italia Letteraria if no. 18 (August 4/ 1929).

§39. Skepticism

1. See Roberto Ardigò, Scritti vari, ed. Giovanni Marchesini (Florence: Le Monnier, 1922), p. 270: "Bergson's sparkling and evanescent philosophy (which contains traces of gnosticism and of the ancient Plotinus), especially when one looks exclusively at its /vitalist, aspect, is more than anything else a type of irrationalism that may give rise to new forms of Nietzschianism and social imperialism that are antithetical to socialist ethics and ideals. Where we agree with Bergson and with all idealists, however, is in those instances in which they exalt voluntarism in the face of determinism and mechanistic views of history."

Gramsci had a copy of Ardigb's Scritti Vari while he was in Turi, but he had returned it to Tatiana Schucht some months prior to writing this note； it is listed in Notebook 1 among the "Books Delivered to Tatiana at Turi on 20 May 1930〃； see Notebook if Description of the Manuscript, i：37i.

2. Especially relevant in. this context are the assertions on the relationship between traditional materialism and idealism that Marx made in. the first of his "Theses on Feuerbach” (1845):

The chief defect of all previous materialism一that of Feuerbach included—is that things [Gegenstand], reality, sensuousness are conceived only in the form of the object, or of contemplation, but not as human sensuous activity, practice, not subjectively. Hence it happened that the active side, in contradistinction to materialism was set forth by idealism―but only abstractly, since, of course, idealism does not know real, sensuous activity as such. Feuerbach wants sensuous objects, really distinct from conceptual objects’ but he does not conceive human activity itself as objective activity. In Das Wesen des Chiistenthums, he therefore regards the theoretical attitude as the only genuine human attitude, while practice is conceived and defined only in its dirty-Jewish form of appearance. Hence he does not grasp the significance of ^revolutionary,of practical-critical activity. (K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works [New York: International Publishers, 1976], p. 6)

This was one of the passages that Gramsci rendered from German into Italian in the segment of Notebook 7 he devoted to translation exercises.

§40. Pirandello

i. Benjamin Cremieux, Henry IV et la dramaturgie de Luigi Pirandello, suivi de la traduction fran^aise de Henry IV (Paris: Gallimard, 1928). It is highly unlikely that Gramsci ever had the opportunity to consult this text.

Luigi Pirandello^ play Enrico IV {Henry IV} was first performed in 1922.

On Benjamin Créinieux, see Notebook i, §73, n. 1.

§41. Vocational guidance

I. The unsigned article “L'orientazione professionale” (Vocational guidance), which was in fact written by the Jesuit priest Angelo Brucculeri, was published in three parts in La Civiltà Cattolica 79 (October 6, 1928): 40-53； (November 3/ 1928): 204-15； and (November 17, 1928): 304-13.

§42. The tradition of Rome

1. In his poem "La terra dei menti” (The land of the dead), from which Gramsci quotes a line, Giuseppe Giusti eulogizes a series of great living Italians； it is his response to Lamartine's description of Italy as "the land of the dead."

Giuseppe Giusti (1809-50) is best remembered for his satiric poetry. His targets included foreign oppressors (especially the Austrians), demagogues, intransigent revolutionaries, dictatorial governments, the Jesuits, and opportunism and hypocrisy in general. Giusti was active for many years in Florentine politics and in 1848 participated in the revolutionary uprisings in Tuscany.

Carducci^ lines are quoted from his poem "Nell/annual。della fondazione di Roma” (On the anniversary of the founding of Rome).

On Giosuè Carducci, see Notebook §44, n. 17.

On Ugo Foscolo and his poem Dei sepolcri (On tombs) see, inter alia, Gramsci's comments in Notebook 5, §32, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

2. Gramsci's source of the statement attributed to Lessing was, most probably, a remark made by Benedetto Croce in his study on nineteenthcentury Italian historiography, Storia della storiografia italiana nel secolo XIX, 2 vols. (Bari: Laterza, 1921), of which Gramsci had a copy in prison: "Lessing was taking aim against that rhetorical construction [i.e., boasting of Roman origins] with his rude epigram on the wasps (the Italians) who were born out of the carrion of a warhorse and prided themselves on being its daughters^ (1:113).

3. H. G. Wells怂 A Short History of the World (New York: Macmillan, 1922) was published in Italian as Breve storia del mondo, trans. F. E, Lorizio (Bari: Laterza, 1930). There is little doubt that Gramsci had a copy of the Italian edition of this work, even though it has not been preserved with his books. Gramsci comments on Wells怎 book in a September 28, 1931, letter to his brother Carlo:

H. G. Wells's book ... is very badly translated despite the seriousness of the Laterza publishing house. It is interesting because it tends to break with the prevailing habit of thinking that history only existed in Europe, particularly in ancient times； Wells discusses the ancient history of China, India, and the medieval history of the Mongols with the same tone he adopts in speaking of European history. He shows that from a world standpoint Europe should not be regarded as anything more than a province that considers itself the depository of all of world civilization. Another innovation introduced by Wells, which I find less attractive, is the history of the earth before the appearance of man. Also the history of the Catholic Church and its influence on the development of civilization is biased； one feels that Wells is an Anglican anti-Papist and not an unprejudiced historian.

Gramsci also expressed his views on Wells in an undated letter to his son Dello (written sometime in 1935 or, most probably, 1936):

I haven't read a lot by Wells, because I don't like his books all that much. I believe that if you, too, don't read him, it won't be a great loss for your intellectual and moral development. I didn't like his book of world history very much either, although he does try (and therein he represents a certain novelty, at least in the historical literature of Western Europe) to broaden the traditional historical horizon, attributing importance not only to the Greeks, Egyptians, and Romans, etc., but also to the Mongols, the Chinese, the Indians, etc. As an imaginative writer it seems to me that he is too mechanical, dry, and flavorless； as a historian he lacks intellectual discipline, the sense of order and method. (Antonio Gramsci, Letters from Prison, ed. F. Rosengarten, trans. R. Rosenthal [New York: Columbia University Press, 1994], 2:378)

See also Gramsci's passing remark on Wells in Notebook 14, §63.

4. Camille Jullian, Histoire de la Gaule, 8 vols. (Paris: Hachette, 1908-26).

5. This brief passage from Camille Jullian/s Histoire de la Gaule is quoted in Piero Baroncelli, 〃La figura di Roma in uno storico celtista” (A Celtic historian's view of Rome), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1368 (March 16, 1929}: 208.

6. Baroncelli, /zLa figura di Roma” p. 208. The emphasis are Gramsci's.7. Ibid., p. 225. The emphasis is Gramsci's.

8. Gramsci is alluding to a statement made by Sorel in an August 28, 1917, letter to Robert Michels: commenting on Michels's assertion in one of his speeches that Italy "is the most authentic daughter of Rome/' Sorel observed, nzy a pas de pays moins romain que Pltalie/7 Gramsci quotes the passage from SorePs letter that contains this remark in Notebook 2, §45.

9. On Ezio Levi, see Notebook 4, §92, n. 1.

§43. The episode of the arrest of the La Gala brothers in 1863

1. Tommaso Tittoni, "Ricordi personali di politica interna” (Personal recollections on internal political affairs), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1369 (April iz 1929): 304-27, (This is the first segment of an article published in two parts in consecutive issues of Nuova Antologia. The second segment is treated by Gramsci in the next note.) All the information recorded in this note is extracted from Tittoni's article.

On Tommaso Tittoni, see Notebook 2/ §6, n. 1.

On the incident involving the La Gala brothers, Cipriano and Giona, see Gramsci's remarks in Notebook 3, §164.

2. Vincenzo Tittoni (1830-1905) was exiled from the Papal States in 1859 because of his liberal views. He was able to return to Rome in 1870 when the city was seized from the pope by Italian troops. Vincenzo Tittoni served as a member of parliament from 1870 until 1886 when he was made senator.

3. The Italian National Committee was founded in London in September 1870 by Giuseppe Mazzini and his close associates. Conceived more or less as an embryonic political party, the National Committee declared its commitment to revolutionary action aimed at liberating Italy and transforming it into a unified republic.

4. The references to Isaia Ghiron怎 article, Annali d'Italia in continuazione al Muratori e al Coppi” (Annals of Italy: A supplement to Muratori and Coppi), in the Rassegna Storica del Risorgimento (1927) and to the article on the La Galla affair published by La Civiltà Cattolica in 1863 are extracted from Tittoni怎 Ricordi personali di politica interna,ft PP- 305-306.

§44. T Tittoni^ "Ricordi personali di politica interna”

1. Tommaso Tittoni, "Ricordi personali di politica interna/, (Personal recollections on internal political affairs), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1369 (April I, 1929): 304-27； no. 1370 (April x6z 1929): 44—67. This two-part article is the source of all the information, bibliographical references, and quotations (except for the parenthetical exclamation. marks inserted by Gramsci) in this note.

Gramsci also discusses Tommaso Tittoni elsewhere in the notebooks； see, inter alia, Notebook 2, §59/ and Notebook 2/ §6, n. 1.

2. The conciliation treaty (together with the concordat and the financial convention) was part of the Lateran Accords, signed February 11,1929/ that normalized relations between the Kingdom of Italy and the Holy See.

3. In September 1870 the temporal power of the pope was effectively brought to an end when Italian troops occupied Rome. The following year the capital of Italy was transferred from Florence to Rome. Pope Pius IX, however, adamantly refused to recognize the legitimacy of the Kingdom of Italy； his actions fueled anticlericalism in. Italy, but they also hardened the resolve of the conservative, pro-church elements.

4. The papal non expedit forbade Catholics from voting and from presenting themselves as candidates in national elections, but it did not apply to regional and local elections. A group of prominent Catholic politicians formed the Roman Union in order to participate in the administrative elections of 1871. Occupying as it did a middle position between the liberals and the intransigent clerical conservatives, the Roman Union obtained good electoral results； however, the Vatican's reluctance to sanction the participation of Catholics in national mainstream politics prevented it from developing into a larger, more widespread movement.

5. Paolo Campello della Spina (1829-1917) was one of the founders of the Roman Union, which he served as vice president and later as president. In 1879 he also played a leading role in the efforts to establish a Catholic political party that was to be called the National Conservative Association. The idea was quashed by the Pope Leo XIII, who not only remained opposed to any rapprochement between the church and the Italian state but also repeatedly reaffirmed the non expedit.

6. Auguste Comte, Cours de philosophic positive, 6 vols. (Paris: Bachelier, 1830-42), translated into English as The Positive Philosophy, 2 vols. (London: Trubner, 1875).

7. Auguste Comte, Catechisme positivista (Paris, 1852｝； for an English translation, see The Catechism of Positive Religion, 3d rev. ed., trans. Richard Congreve (Clifton, N.J.: A. M. Kelley, 1973).

8. On Emile Littré, see Notebook 3, §76/ n. 8.

9. In 1898 long-simmering popular discontent over the continuing rise of the price of bread exploded into street demonstrations and riots in many parts of Italy. The conservative prime minister Antonio Starabba di Rudini reacted with very severe repressive measures. More than eighty people were killed in just three days of disturbances (May 6-9) in Milan alone. The show of force was accompanied by the suppression of several newspapers and the arrest of many oppositional figures. Rudini also tried to enact laws aimed at limiting the freedom of the press, the right to strike, and other civil liberties. He was compelled to resign； Luigi Pelloux, a general who had earlier served in one of Rudini's cabinets, succeeded him on June 29, 1898. Within a few months of becoming prime minister, Pelloux introduced a number of bills that differed little from the measures proposed by Rudini and had the same intent: namely, to weaken leftist opposition and deprive it of popular support. The stiff opposition of the Left and Pelloux's efforts to implement the restrictive bills by decree led to a full-blown constitutional crisis that did not abate until the middle of 1900, when national elections were held and a new governing coalition was formed.

I o. Tommaso Tittoni held the office of prefect of Naples from 1900 until 1903, when he was named minister of foreign affairs by the prime minister, Giovanni Giolitti. In 1902 Naples figured prominently in parliamentary discussions that culminated in the passage of two bills providing the city with financial support to ease the very heavy burden of debts it had incurred.

11. See Gianforte Suardi "Quando e come i cattolici poterono partecipare alle elezioni politiche” (When and how Catholics could participate in national political elections), Nuova Antologia 62, no. 1335 (November 1, 1927): 118-23. Gramsci deals with this article in Notebook 3/ §25.

12. On Giorgio Sidney Sonnino, see Notebook i, §114/ n. 1.

13. On the scandal involving the priest Giovanni Riva and the nun Maria Giuseppina Fumagalli, see Notebook i, §24, and n. 3 of the corresponding Notes to the Text.

14. On June 7/ 1914, an antiwar demonstration was held in Ancona in defiance of a government ban on such protests. The carabinieri fired on the crowd, killing three demonstrators and wounding many others. The incident provoked a weeklong series of strikes, demonstrations, and clashes with the police in many Italian cities.

15. Filippo Meda (see Notebook iz §107, n. 1) and Giulio Rodino were among the prominent Catholic politicians who had played important roles in the Popular Party (founded by the priest Luigi Sturzo) since its inception in 1919. Rodino served a very brief term as minister of war in Francesco Saverio Nitti's cabinet in 1920 and was appointed minister of justice by Prime Minister Ivanoe Bonomi in 1921. Both Meda and Rodino were moderate or centrist in their politics, whereas Guido Miglioli, who had also joined the Popular Party in 1919, held decidedly more leftist views. On Miglioli, see Notebook 5, §6, n. 2.

§45. Enrico Catellani, "La libertà del mare”

I. Enrico Catellani, Z/La libertà del mare" {Freedom of the seas), Nuova Antologia 64/ no» 1369 (April i, 1929): 372-84.

§46. Claudio Faina, carburante nazionale”

1. Claudio Faina, 〃H carburante nazionale” (National gasoline), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1370 (April i6, 1929): 514-28.

2. Gramsci is referring to his comment in Notebook it §65, on Claudio Faina's earlier article "Foreste, combustibili e carburante nazionale” (Forests, fuels, and national gasoline), published in. Nuova Antologia 63/ no< 1347 (May 1, 1928): 82-106.

§47. Catholic Action

1. Gianforte Suardi, /zCostantino Nigra e il XX settembre 1870〃 (Costantino Nigra and September 20,1870), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1371 (May I, 1929)： 578-79.

2. See Gianforte Suardi "Quando e come i cattolici poterono partecipare alle elezioni politiche” (When and how Catholics could participate in national political elections), Nuova Antologia 62/ no. 1335 (November i, 1927): 118-23. See Gramsci's treatment of this article in Notebook 3/ §25.

3. Le., the Lateran Accords (or the concordat, as it is more commonly known) signed in February 1929.

4. Suardi, ^Costantino Nigra/7 p. 132.

§48. Domenico Spadoni, Z/Le società segrete nella rivoluzione milanese delPaprile 工 8 工 4 〃

1. Domenico Spadoni, 〃Le società segrete nella rivoluzione milanese delPaprile 工8工4〃 (The secret societies in the Milan revolution of 工814), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1372 (May 16, 1929): 197-211.

2. Giuseppe Prina (1766-1814), who was appointed minister of the Kingdom of Italy by Napoleon, incurred the wrath of the people because of his austere economic measures. He was also suspected of having enriched himself at the expense of the public treasury. On April 20, 1814, shortly after the defeat of Napoleon, the people of Milan rebelled, and Prina was killed by an angry mob.

§49. Bernardo Sanvisenti, 〃La questione delle Antilie”

i. Bernardo Sanvisenti, 〃La questione delle Antillez, (The question of the Antilles), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1373 (June i, 1929): 353-68.

§50. Brief notes on Japanese culture

i. Raffaele Pettazzoni, 〃La religione nazionale del Giappone e la politica religiosa dello Stato giapponese77 (The national religion of Japan and the religious policy of the Japanese state), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1373 (June I, 1929): 314-30. Raffaele Pettazzoni^ book La mitologia giapponese secondo il primo libro del Kojiki (Japanese mythology according to the first book of the Koji-ki) was brought out by the Bologna publishing house of Zanichelli in 1929 in its series "Testi e documenti per la storia della religione,, (Texts and documents on the history of religion).

2. On Sun Yat-sen, see Notebook 5, §23, n. 3. See also Gramsci's comments on Sun Yat-sen's "Three Principles of the People" elsewhere in this notebook, specifically Notebook > §5 工 and §122.

3. The Italian word used by Gramsci in this instance is ^Riforma^ (capitalized), which normally signifies the Protestant Reformation. By using this word he seems to be indicating that he perceives some analogies between the process of secularization set in motion, in Europe by the Reformation and the religious developments in Japan. He elaborates on this idea in Notebook 8, §87, where he again uses the word "nforma/' though he does not capitalize it.

§51. Brief notes on Chinese culture

1. This unsigned article was published in two parts with slightly dif-ferent titles: riformatore cinese Suen Uen e le sue teorie politiche e sociali” (The Chinese reformer Sun Yat-sen and his political and social theories). La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May 4/ 1929): 205-20； and "Le teorie politiche e sociali di Suen Uen" (Sun Yat-sen's politicai and social theo-ries)z La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May 18, 1929): 300-314.

Sun Yat-sen is sometimes referred to as Suen Uen and sometimes as Sun Wen. These variants have been left unchanged when they occur in the titles of books and articles； in the body of the translation, however, the name has been rendered consistently as Sun Yat-sen. Also, for the purposes of consistency and clarity, the Italian phrase Htriplice demismon (literally, “triple demism〃)has been translated in. all cases as "Three Principles of the People/7

On Sun Yat-sen, see Notebook 5, §23, n. 3. Gramsci makes further comments on Sun Yat-sen^ "Three Principles of the People77 in Notebook 5, §工22.

2. The Italian Jesuit priest, Pasquale D'Elia, spent many years in China and wrote on diverse aspects of Chinese culture and history. He made especially important contributions to the study of the history of Catholicism in China. Some of his works are available in English, including Catholic Native Episcopy in China. An Outline of the Formation and Growth of the Chinese Catholic Clergy: 1300-1926 (Shanghai: Tusewei Printing Press’ 1927), The Catholic Missions in China: A Short Sketch of the History of the Catholic Church in China from the Earliest Records to Our Own Days (Shanghai: Commercial Press, 1934), and Galileo in China, Relations through the Roman College Between Galileo and the Jesuit Scientist-Missionaries: 1610-1640, trans. R. Suter and M. Sciascia (Cambridge: Harvard University Press, i960).

3. Pope Leo XUFs encyclicals Rerum novarum and Immortale Dei were promulgated in 1891 and 1885, respectively. On the Codice sociale (Social code), a handbook of Catholic social thought strongly influenced by the teachings of Pope Leo XIII, see Notebook 1, §1, n. 2.

§52. Domenico Meneghini, ^Industrie chimiche italiane

i. See Domenico Meneghini, "Industrie chimiche italiane” (Italian chemical industries), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1374 (June i6f 1929): 507-22.

§53. Reformation and Renaissance. Nicholas of Cusa

1. Ludwig von Bertalanffy, 〃Un cardinale germanico (Nicolaus Cusanus)〃 (A German cardinal: Nicholas of Cusa), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1374 (June i6z 1929): 536-39. This article is, in fact, an Italian translation of the introduction Ludwig von Bertalanffy wrote for his small edition of excerpts from the works of Nicholas of Cusa translated into German； see Nikolus von Kues (Munich: G. Muller, 1928)

Nicholas of Cusa (1401-64), born in Kues, Germany, was a paradigmatic example of the Renaissance man. He had an impressive range of interests and made significant contributions to diverse fields of knowledge, including philosophy, mathematics, astronomy, and the applied sciences (especially biology). In his philosophical writings he emphasized and discussed the implications of the limits or incompleteness of human knowledge: both of God and of the universe. As a scientist, Cusa stood at the threshold of modernity, in the sense that he stressed the importance of experimentation and empirical investigation. As a prominent churchman, he argued strenuously for ecclesiastical reform. Cusa was a cardinal and bishop of Brixen (Bressanone) in Italy.

2. Paolo Rotta, a Catholic scholar, wrote extensively on ancient and medieval philosophy. His major work on Cusa, Il cardinale Nicolo di Cusa, la vita e il pensiero (Cardinal Nicholas of Cusa: His life and thought), was brought out in Milan in 1928 by the Catholic publishing house of Vita e Pensiero in its series "Pubblicazioni della Università Cattolica del Sacro Cuore."

3. Nicholas of Cusa did not participate in the Council of Constance (1414-18)； it was at the Council of Basel (1431-49) that he stood up for the reassertion of the rights of councils.

4. In 1432, at the Council of Basel, Nicholas of Cusa challenged papal authority by opposing the candidate the pope had named for the archbishopric of Trier. He followed this with a work, De concordantia catholica (i433)x in which he argued that the authority of the pope was subordinate to that of the general councils of the church. Within a few years, however, he became disillusioned about the ability of the councils to foster harmony within the church and to enact needed reforms. He not only reconciled himself with the pope, Eugenius IY but also became one of his vigorous supporters.

5. Following the seizure of Constantinople by the Turks in 1453, Nicholas of Cusa, long a proponent of religious peace, expressed the need for Christianity to cultivate a more conciliatory or tolerant attitude toward Islam. For a recent critical edition of the Latin text, with parallel German translation, of Nicholas of Cusa怎 work on the Koran, see Cribratio Alkorani/Sichtung des Koransf ed. L. Hagemann and R. Glei (Hamburg: Meiner, 1989).

6. Nicholas of Cusa怎 best-known work, De docta i^norantia, was first published in 1440. For an English translation, see Of Learned Ignoiancef trans. Germain Heron (New Haven: Yale University Press, 1954.

nCoincidenza oppositorum,f (identity of opposites) is a concept often associated with the philosophy of Nicholas of Cusa.

7. The editorial note in Nuova Antologia provides incomplete information about Michele Losacco's paper on Nicholas of Cusa^ dialectics, 〃La dialettica del Cusano.〃 In fact, as Gramsci surmised, the paper was presented at the Lincei Academy in Rome and published in the academy怎 own periodical report, Rendiconti della R Accademia Nazionale dei Lincei 4, no. 4 (1928): 309-44.

§54. Father Bresciani 's progeny

1. The poet Giosuè Carducci (on whom see Notebook i, §44, n. 17) published three small collections of ^barbarous odes/7 as he called them: Odi barbare (1877), Nuove odi barbare (1882), and Terze odi barbare (1889). In both content and form these poems constitute a reaction against what Carducci regarded as the sentimentalism and facile versification of the late romantic poets* Through his odes Carducci was proposing a return to classical motifs and metrical forms. He termed them nbar-barous,z because there was an element of experimentation and innovation in his effort to adapt classical metrical measures to modem Italian； the results, he believed, would have sounded //barbarous,/ to the ears of the ancients.

2. For other comments by Gramsci on the "narcotic" effects of certain forms of popular literature, see Notebook 6, §28 and §134.

§55，Romagna and its role in Italian history

1. Luigi Cavina, ^Fiorentini e Veneziani in Romagna,? (Florentines and Venetians in Romagna), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1374 (June i6, 1929): 442-56.

2. With the help of the French, Duke Valentino (i.e., Cesare Borgia, the son of Pope Alexander VI) conducted a series of military campaigns between 1499 and 1503 that enabled him to take control of the whole of Romagna, subjugating the fractious nobles of the region and firmly reasserting the pope's suzerainty over the entire territory. Machiavelli first met Valentino in 1502, when he was sent to him on a diplomatic mission from Florence. Following the death of Pope Alexander VI in 1503, Valentino's power collapsed. Taking advantage of the power vacuum, Venice added Romagna to the already extensive territories under its control. In 1508 Pope Julius II, determined to regain possession of the Papal States, joined an alliance—known as the League of Cambrai—that included virtually everyone who had lost territory to Venice, namely the emperor Maximilian I, Louis XII of France, Ferdinand II of Aragon, and the cities of Mantua and Ferrara. The league enjoyed an early success when the French defeated the Venetians at the battle of Agnadello (near Milan), in 1509. By the end of 1510, however, the alliance had crumbled. Pope Julius IIZ having recovered the cities of Romagna, formed the Holy League with Venice (now weakened and no longer a threat) and Ferdinand of Aragon in 1511. His ultimate aim was to drive the French out of Italy and possibly establish the papacy as the dominant ruling power in the entire peninsula.

3. It is important to bear in mind the context in which Machiavelli makes this statement:

We owe them [i.ev the church and the priests] an even greater debt, which is the second cause of our ruin； namely, that the church has kept and continues to keep this country divided. For in truth, no country has ever been united and happy unless it has submitted itself wholly to the jurisdiction of a single republic or a single prince, as was the case with France and Spain. And the only reason Italy is not in the same position, and is not governed by either one republic or one prince is the church. For although the church is based in Italy and has temporal power, it has never been sufficiently powerful nor had enough courage to seize power in Italy and rule it. On the other hand, the church has not been, so weak that when threatened with the loss of temporal power it could not call on one of the powers to defend it against an Italian state that had become too powerful.... The church, then, lacking the power to occupy all Italy and forbidding anyone else from occupying it has been the cause why Italy could not come under one head but has been under many princes and signori who were responsible for such disunity and weakness that Italy has now become the prey not only of barbarian potentates but of anyone who attacks it. For this, we Italians have none other than the church to thank. (Niccolò Machiavelli, The Discourses, book i, §12)

4. Cavina, "Fiorentini e Veneziani in Romagna,pp. 448-49.

5. See especially Notebook iz §150, and Notebook 3, §n8, as well as the many notes on the cosmopolitan character of Italian intellectuals.

6. Niccolò Machiavelli, The Prince, chap. 3.

7. I.e., the Lateran Accords, more commonly known as the concordat.

8. Bernard Groethuysen, Ongines de Fesprit bourgeois en France, vol. I, Leglise et la bourgeoisie (Paris: Gallimard, 1927). For a condensed English translation of this volume, see The Bourgeois: Catholicism vs. Capitalism in Eighteenth-Century France, trans. Mary Ilford (New York: Holt, Rinehart, and Winston, 1968).

Gramsci received a copy of Groethuysen's work while he was at the San Vittore prison in Milan, where he wrote to his friend Giuseppe Berti about it on August 8,1927: /ZI am now reading Leglise et la bourgeoisie, volume one (300 pages in octavo) in Origines de Vesprit bourgeois &n France by a certain Groethuysen. The author, with whom I am not familiar but who must be a follower of Paulhan's sociological school, has had the patience to carry out a molecular analysis of the collections of sermons and devotional books published before 1789, so as to reconstruct the points of view, beliefs, and attitudes of the new ruling class that was then being formed. Gramsci also comments on Groethuysen's work in an April 22, 1929, letter to Tatiana Schucht, quoted on 1:15-16.

9. Leon. Battista Alberti (1404-72), a Renaissance humanist, possessed such a wide-ranging intellect and made so many important contributions to diverse fields of knowledge that he is sometimes compared to Leonardo da Vinci. His book on painting, De piotar a (1435), set forth the basic principles of the science of perspective, while his work on architecture, De re aedificatoria (1450), became the fundamental text for architectural design and engineering during the Renaissance (Alberti was himself a successful architect). A brilliant mathematician, he also did pioneering work in cryptography and cartography. Furthermore/ he produced a substantial body of literary work in both Latin and Italian and wrote what is probably the earliest grammar of the Italian language, or, to be more precise, of the Tuscan vernacular. Alberti's most important writings on morals and ethics include Intercoenales, composed in Latin over many years； the four volumes of Della famiglia (On the family), published in Italian between 1437 and 1438； and the work he completed just before his death, De iciarcha (Alberti himself explained that he derived the term "iciarch" from the Greek and that it signifies "the man of excellence and the primary ruler of his family"). In Della famigli^ written in the form of dialogues, Alberti offers reflections on the value of family, on education, on husbandry, on the fickleness of fortune, on civic duty, and on. other matters. De iciaxchi, also in dialogue form, extols the humanist ideals of civic involvement, productive activity, and achievement. For English translations of Intercoenales and Della famiglia, see, respectively, Dinner Pieces, trans. David Marsh (Binghamton, N.Y.: Medieval and Renaissance Texts and Studies, 1987), and The Albertis of Florence: Leon Battista Alberti 怎 Della famiglia, trans. Guido. A. Guarino (Lewisburg, Pa.: Bucknell University Press, 1971).

10. Baldassare Castiglione {1478-1529), was linked throughout his career to the courts of powerful dukes, whom he served mostly as a diplomat. He was a member of the court of Guidobaldo da Montefeltro, duke of Urbino, when he started writing II cortegiano in 1513. In that work, which he completed in 1518 and published in 1528, Castiglione draws a portrait, in dialogic form, of the ideal courtier: an aristocratic ideal based on. elegance of comportment and of language and on refinement in poetry, music, connoisseurship, and the military arts. The book quickly became one of the best-known works of its time, the authoritative handbook of aristocratic manners and the art of chivalry. It was soon translated into several languages； the first English version. The Comtyer, translated by Sir Thomas Hoby, was published in 1561. For a modern translation, see The Book of the Courtier, trans. George Bull (Baltimore: Penguin, 1976).

11. The major political works of Francesco Guicciardini (1483-1540) include, among other titles, Dialogo del reggimento di Firenze (1^26} and Considerazioni intorno ai "Discorsi" del Machiavelli (written sometime between 1528 and 1530). For the respective English translations, see Dialogue on the Government of Florence, ed. and trans. Alison Brown (New York: Cambridge University Press, 1994)； and ^Considerations on the 'Discourses' of Machiavelli," in Selected Writings, ed. Cecil Grayson and trans. Margaret Grayson (New York: Oxford University Press, 1965), Of course, Guicciardini's historiographical writings, particularly his masterpiece Storia d'Italia, are in many respects important works of political analysis as well. For an English translation of Storia d'Italia, see The History of Italy, ed. and trans. Sidney Alexander (Princeton, N.J.: Princeton University Press, 1984).

§56. Catholic Action

1. See the unsigned article (in fact written by the Jesuit priest Angelo Brucculeri), “Verso la pace industriale” (Toward peace in industrial relations), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (January 5, 1929): 29-40.

2. Le., the Bureau Internationale de Travail (International Labor Office).

3. See Angelo Brucculeri, Problemi odierni del lavoro (Rome: Editrice La Civiltà Cattolica, 1929).

4. On the Office of Malines and the Codice sociale, see Notebook i, §i, n. 2.

§57. Catholic Action in the United States

1. 〃La campagna elettorale degli Stati Uniti e le sue lezioni” (The electoral campaign in the United States and its lessons), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (January 5, 1929): 86-93.

2. In 1928 Alfred E. Smith, who had served four terms as governor of New York, was chosen by the Democratic Party to run as its candidate for the presidency of the United States. His Republican opponent was Herbert Hoover, who won the election in a landslide. Nothing contributed more to Smith's defeat than his opposition to prohibition and the fact that he was Catholic. He was totally rebuffed by conservative Protestant voters and suffered his heaviest defeats in the southern states, where the Ku Klux Klan was only one of the groups that mounted campaigns against him.

3. In the course of his campaign, Alfred Smith published an open letter to rebut charges that his Catholic faith rendered him unsuitable for the presidency. The fact that he was Catholic, Smith explained, did not make him any less loyal to the Constitution. He also reaffirmed his belief in the principle of the separation of church and state. Papal encyclicals and declarations (such as Pius DCs Syllabus) that condemned the notion of the secular state, Smith argued, are not binding statements of faith and dogma. The text of Smith's open letter is reproduced (in French translation) in a book Gramsci had in prison: Nicolas Fontaine, Saint-Siege, tfAction fran^aise" et ^Catholiques intégrauxff (Paris: Librairie Universitaire J. Gamber, 1928^ pp. 177-88.

§58. Catholic Action

i. Gramsci brings up the same issue in a July 27, 1931, letter to his wife； Julia:

In a few days Delio will be seven years old, and at the end of the month Giuliano will be five. The date is important for Delio, because seven years is considered an important stage in the development of a personaEty. The Catholic Church, which undoubtedly is the world organism that possesses the greatest accumulation of organizational and propaganda experience, has fixed at seven years, through the first communion, a person's solemn entry into the religious community, which presupposes in the young child the first responsibility for the choice of an ideology that should leave the imprint of an indelible, lifelong memory. I don't know whether you will give Delio's birthday a particular character that will leave in his memory a deeper and more lasting imprint than other anniversaries. If Giuliano were not just five years old and if it were not impossible, at least within certain limits, to distinguish between Delio and Giuliano, I believe that this would be the moment to explain to Delio that I am in prison and why. I believe that such an explanation, together with the fact that he is now considered capable of a certain sense of responsibility, would make a great impression on him and would unquestionably mark a date in his development.

2. Gramsci had mentioned the same episode from Fogazzaro's novel in his article "L'appello ai pargoli" (The appeal to little children) published in the Sotto la Mole" section of the Piedmont edition of Avanti! July 31, 1916.

On Antonio Fogazzaro, see Notebook i, §44/ n. 6, and §72, n. 3.

For an English translation of Fogazzaro^ novel Piccolo mondo antico (which was first published in 1895 J, see The Little World of the Past, trans. W. J. Strachan, intro, by Tommaso Gallarati Scotti (London: Oxford University Press, 1962).

3. Gramsci extracted the publication information from an unsigned review article, "Il decreto sull'età per la prima comunione commentato da Mons. Segr. della S. C. dei Sacramenti” (The decree on the age of First Communion with a commentary by the monsignor secretary of the Holy Congregation of the Sacraments), in the "Rivista della stampa” (Review of the press) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (January 19, 1929): 150-54,

On Cardinal Pietro Gasparri, see Notebook 5, §9, n. 2.

§59. Catholic Action in Germany

1. See the unsigned article "La lega di pace dei cattolici tedeschi” (The German Catholic League for Peace)z La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (January 19, 1929): 165-70.

2. See "Lettera del S. Padre allTminentissimo Cardinal Bertram (Letter from the Holy Father to His Eminence Cardinal Bertram) in La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (January 19, 1929): 102-4.

§60. "La schiavitù del lavoro indigeno” (by A. Brucculeri)

i. See the unsigned article (in fact written by the Jesuit priest Angelo Brucculeri), 〃La schiavitù del lavoro indigeno(The slavery of indigenous labor), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (February 2/ 1929): 202-16.

§61. Rotary Club

1. “Ancora Rotary Club e Massoneria” (More about the Rotary Club and Freemasonry), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (February i6, 1929): 337-46.

2. According to "Ancora Rotary Club e Massoneria/' the Spanish bishop to whom Gramsci refers was the archbishop of Toledo, Cardinal Pietro Segura y Saenz, who condemned the Rotary Club in his pastoral letter of January 23, 1929.

§62. The editorial staff of La Civiltà Cattolica

1. Most of the articles in La Civiltà Cattolica are unsigned. In all likeli-hoodx Gramsci obtained the information about the authorship of various articles from the Indice analìtico delle annate 工926-1930 (Analytic index of the issues from 1926 to 1930) compiled by Giuseppe Del Chiaro and brought out by the publishing house of La Civiltà Cattolica in Rome in 1931.

2. See Angelo Brucculeri^ book on the major labor issues of the time, Problemi odierni del lavoro (Rome: Editrice La Civiltà Cattolica, 1929). Gramsci discussed several of the articles in this volume in different parts of his notebooks: on ''L'organizzazione internazionale(The international organization [of labor]), see Notebook 2, §128, and Notebook s, §5； on "L'orientazione professionale^ (Vocational guidance), see Notebook 5, §41； on "Verso la pace industriale77 (Toward peace in industrial relations), see Notebook sz §56； and on "La schiavitù del lavoro indigeno(The slavery of indigenous labor), see Notebook 5, §60.

3. See the following books by Angelo Brucculeri, published by Editrice La Civiltà Cattolica: on wage scales and workers' participation, Salariato e compartecipazione (19^0)； on. the problem of land ownership and distribution, Il problema della terra, id ed. (1921)； on the history of strikes from ethical and economical perspectives, Lo sciopero nella storia, nella morale, nel?economia, 2d ed. (1922)； on establishing limits on working hours and the principle of the eight-hour workday, La limitazione della giornata di lavoio e il principio delle otto ore, 2d ed, (1923)； on. the Malthusian problem. Sul problema di Malthus. Rilievi (1928).

§63. Father Bresciani 's progeny

i. All the information recorded in this note on Giovanni Casati' dictionary of living Italian Catholic writers, Scrittori cattolici italiani viventi: Dizionario bio-bibliografico ed indice analtico delle opere (Milan: Romolo Ghirlanda, 1928) is extracted from the "Rivista della stampa” (Review of the press) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (March 2, 1929): 437-42. Gramsci had already learned about the publication of Casati's work from a listing in LItalia Che Scrive； see Notebook 3, §136.

On Filippo Meda, who contributed the preface to Casati's work, see Notebook i, §107, and n. 1 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

2. The article in La Civiltà Cattolica provided no publication information regarding the A-B volume of Giovanni Casati's Scrittori d'Italia dalle origini fino ai viventi (Italian writers: From the earliest to those still living).

3. See Giovanni Casati's book on literary works that were condemned by the Catholic Church and placed on its Index of Forbidden Books, I libri letterari condannati dall"Indice: Saggi, pref, by Pietro Maffi (Milan: Ghirlanda, 1922).

4. On Gaetano De Sanctis, see Notebook 3, §86, n. 3； and on Pietro Fedele, see Notebook 3, §9, n. 4.

5. On Giovanni Papiniz who is discussed by Gramsci in various places throughout the notebooks, see Notebook i, §8, n. 1； on Domenico Giuliotti, see Notebook 1, §72, n. 1； and on Pietro Mignosi, see Notebook I, §75, n. i.

6. Pier Silvio Rivetta used the pseudonym Toddi for his contributions to the Rome satirical weekly II Travaso delle Idee.

§64. Church and state in Italy before the conciliation

1. "La Conciliazione fra lo Stato italiano e la Chiesa—cenni edonistici'' (The reconcilation between the Italian state and the church~~references in the news coverage), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (March 2, 1929): 451-67. The reconciliation took place formally on 11 February 1929 with the signing of the Lateran Pacts.

2. On the /zsocial weeks/7 which originated in France but were subsequently duplicated in other countries, see Notebook 4, §90, n. 3.

3. Benedict XV, who was elected pope in 1914, died on January 22/ 1922. Among other things, he lifted the non expedit that had forbidden Catholics from participating in national politics, and he permitted the formation of a Catholic political party: the Popular Party, founded by the priest Luigi Sturzo.

The Civiltà Cattolica article cited at the beginning of Gramsci's note reproduced (in a footnote on p. 453) Senator Alfredo Petrillo^ account as follows:

"Benedict XV had died/7 Senator Petrillo recounts in the Popolo dltalia ( 17 February), "and the Bonomi cabinet was agonizing about what to do, even though—or perhaps because—it was receiving spiritual guidance from Don Sturzo. In the Chamber [of Deputies] there was great agitation, not because of the upcoming conclave [to elect a new pope] but because a government crisis was imminent. The groups were permanently in session. The group of the Right, presided over by the Hon, Salandra, had completed its meeting； the Hon. Salandra was still in the meeting room with the Hon. Ricci, myself, and a few others. The Fascist group was gathered in an adjacent room. The door connecting the two room was opened and in walked the Hon. Mussolini, followed by the Hon. Acerbo and, if I remember correctly, the Hon. Federzoni. He walked straight toward Salandra and told him, resolutely and tersely: yI believe it is politically very important that the Italian Chamber should commemorate the Pontiff. You, Hon. Salandra, would be the most suitable person to make a speech/ The Hon. Salandra remained perplexed, surprised by the unexpected proposal. 7Yes/ he replied, perhaps more out of deference than conviction, 'yes, the commemoration has its importance/ He paused, then added: ZI cannot be the orator, for what I would have to say is not appropriate for a commemoration.f The Hon. Salandra, evidently, was looking at the past, even the recent past； Mussolini was already working for the future, even if it were still a distant future. Benedict XV was not commemorated in the chamber."

4. On Ivanoe Bonomi, who was prime minister between. 1921 and 1922 and had three Popular Party members in his cabinet, see Notebook i, §43, n. 21.

5. Nicola Bombacci (1879-1945) was a prominent figure in the Communist Party and a member of parliament at the time. Expelled from the party in 1927, Bombacci drifted increasingly closer to the Fascists and eventually became a member of Mussolini's innermost circle and one of his most loyal supporters.

On Giuseppe Bevione, see Notebook 2, §25, n. 1.

§65. Risorgimento. The historical conjuncture of 1848-49

1. The unsigned article "Il P. Saverio Bettinelli e l'abate Vincenzo Gioberti” (Father Saverion Bettinelli and Abbé Vincenzo Gioberti) was published in two parts in La Civilità Cattolica 80 (March 2/1929): 408-21； and (March 16, 1929): 504-21.

2. On Vincenzo Gioberti, see Notebook i, §46, n. 1.

3. “Il P. Saverio Bettinelli e l'abate Vincenzo Gioberti," part 2, p. 511. On Count Clemente Solaio della Margarita, see Notebook 2/ §6& n. 4.

4. On Antonio Bruers, see Notebook 1, §99, n. 1.

5. Umberto Padovani was a professor at the Università del Sacro Cuore, the Catholic university in Milan.

6. On Antonio Salandra, see Notebook 1, §43, n. 20.

§66. Father Bresciani's progeny. Ugo Ojetti and the Jesuits

1. Ugo Ojetti published his open letter to the Jesuit priest Enrico Rosa, ^Lettera al reverendo Padre Enrico Rosa, SJ./Z in his journal Pègaso (iz no. 3 [March 1929]: 344-47). The open letter was reprinted together with a lengthy response by Father Rosa under the title ^Intorno alla Conciliazione (Concerning the conciliation) in La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (April 6, 1929): 3-19. Gramsci also comments briefly on Ojetti's open letter and Father Rosa's response in Notebook 1, §42.

On Ugo Ojetti, see Notebook 1, §24, n. 4.

2. The Lateran Pacts between the Italian state and the Catholic Church were formally signed on February n, 1929.

3. The parenthetical remark is Gramsci's.

4. The aside enclosed in parenthesis is Gramsci's.

5. All the question marks, exclamation points and comments enclosed in parentheses are inserted by Gramsci, except for "(and if it is eternal, how can it be reconciled? J/7 which is in Ojetti's original text,

§67. Catholic Action

1. The Annuario pontificio (Papal yearbook) of 1929 was reviewed in the "Bibliografia" section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May 4, 1929}: 252.

2. The Almanacco cattolico (Catholic almanac) was brought out by the Milan publishing house of the Catholic periodical Vita e Pensiero.

§68. Monsignor Francesco Lanzoni, Le Diocesi d'Italia ...

1. Francesco Lanzoni's detailed two-volume study Le Diocesi dltalia dalle origini al principio del secolo VII (anno 604) (Italian dioceses from their origins to the beginning of the seventh century—604 a.dJ was published by Faenza怎 F Lega publishing house in 1927, in the Studi e testi” (Studies and texts) series of the Biblioteca Apostolica Vaticana. Gramsci derived the bibliographical data and all other information on Lanzoni怎 book (as well as the references to the writings of Duchesne and Harnack mentioned later in the note) from an unsigned review-essay, ^Uorigine delle antiche Diocesi in Italia secondo la leggenda e secondo la critica stor~ ica〃 (The origins of the old Italian dioceses according to legend and according to historical criticism)z in La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May 18, 1929): 327-42.

2, Gramsci had a copy of Henri Pirenne's Les villes du Moyen Ages: Essai d'histoire économìque et sociale (Brussels: M. Lamertin, 1927). For an English translation, see Medieval Cities: Their Origins and the Revival of Trade, trans. Frank D. Halsey (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1946). The contents of this work are based on a series of lectures delivered by the renowned Belgian medievalist Henri Pirenne (1862-1935) at various universities in the United States in 1922.

3. For Louis Duchesne's studies on Italian. bishoprics at the time of the invasion of Lombardy and on episcopal sees in the old Duchy of Rome, see, respectively, "Les évèches dltalie et ^invasion Lombard。" which was first published by the Ecole Frangaise de Rome as volume 23 of Extrait de melanges d'archeologie et d'histoùe (Rome, 1903) and later incorporated into Louis Duchesne怎 Scripta minora: Etudes de topographic romaine et de géographie ecclésiastique (Rome: Ecole Fran^aise de Rome, 1973)； and "Le sedi episcopali dell'antico ducato di Roma," Archivio della Società Romana di Storia Patria 15 (1892): 457-503.

4. Adolf von Hamack, Die Mission und Ausbreitung des Christentums in den eisten drei Jdhihandeitein, 2 vols. (Leipzig: J. C. Hinrichs, 1915). For an English translation, see The Expansion of Christianity in the First Three Centuries, 2 vols., trans. James Moffatt (Freeport, N.Y.: Books for Libraries Press, 1972).

§69. Encyclopedic notions

1. The German socialist Ferdinand Lassalle (1825-64) spoke disparagingly of the liberal concept of the state as "night watchman" in his /zOffene Antwortschreiben an das Zentral-Kongresses zu Leipzig” (Open letter of reply to the central committee for the convocation of a general congress of German workers in Leipzig), which he composed in February 1863 and published in the form of a pamphlet a month later.

Gramsci returns to a discussion of the concept of the state as "night watchman" in Notebook 6, §88.

§70. The state is the church

l Ignotus, Stato fascista, Chiesa, e scuola (Rome: Libreria del Littorio, 1929), pp. 67-68. Gramsci makes a passing allusion to this polemical pamphlet on the Fascist state； the church, and education in Notebook 3, §54.

2. The text of education minister Giuseppe Belluzzo's circular, first published in the Bollettino Ufficiale (Official bulletin) of the Education Ministry, was reproduced in full in the "Cose italiane” (Italian affairs) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May 18/ 1929): 373-74.

On Giuseppe Belluzzo, see Notebook i, §32, n. 3.

3. Ignotus, Stato fascista, Chiesa, e scuola, p. 66.

4. On the reform of the national educational system designed by Giovanni Gentile (and commonly referred to as the "riforma Gentile") see, inter alia, the Notes to the Text for Notebook 4, §50, and Notebook 4/ §53/ n. 6.

5. The royal decree ^Ordinamento dei gradi scolastici e dei programmi didattici delFistruzione elementare^ (Regulations governing school grades and curricula in elementary education) was one of a series of laws enacted as part of the implementation of Gentile's reform of the educational system in Italy. Gramsci extracted the quotation from the unsigned article (in fact written by the Jesuit priest Mario Barbera) z/Religion and philosophy in the secondary schoolsin La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (June 1, 1929).

6. The quotation from the article on religious instruction in the secondary schools published by La Tribuna is taken from z/Religione e filosofia nelle scuole medie."

7. The Albertine Statute was proclaimed by King Carlo Alberto of Savoy in February 1848 in response to popular demands for the liberalization of the state. Among other things, the Statuto Albertino established the sharing of legislative power between the monarch and parliament. It also affirmed the principle of equal justice for all, guaranteed individual freedom and freedom of the press, protected the right of peaceful assembly, and asserted the inviolability of private property. The first article of the statute defined Catholicism as the "only state religion" but also expressed tolerance for other religions. In 1861 the statute became the constitution of the Kingdom of Italy. (The statute was replaced in January 1948 with the constitution of the Republic of Italy.)

The Conciliation Treaty—one of three documents that constitute the Lateran Pacts signed in February 1929—confirmed the privileged position of Roman Catholicism as the sole religion of the state in Italy.

8.  Religione e filosofia nelle scuole medie," pp. 414-27. Gramsci also touches on the contents of this article in Notebook 4, §37.

§71. The nature of the concordats

1. ''Lettera di S. S. Pio XI alFE.mo Card. Segretario di Stato” (Letter of His Holiness Pius XI to His Eminence the cardinal secretary of state), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (June 15, 1929): 483. Emphasis added by Gramsci.

On Cardinal Gasparri, see Notebook 5, §9, n. 2.

2. On the three documents that together constituted the Lateran Pacts, see Notebook 4, §53, n. 1.

§72. Past and present

i. 〃La Conciliazione fra lo Stato italiano e la Chiesa: Cenni cronis-toriciz, (The conciliation between the Italian state and the church: References in historical chronicles), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (April 6, 1929): 68-6911.

§73. Politico-military direction of the war

1. G.S., “Benes Fimmemore^ (Benes the forgetful). Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1374 (June i6z 1929): 526-27.

2. Cesare Spellanzon (1884-1957) abandoned his journalistic career during the Fascist period and devoted his energies to his other interest: namely, studying and writing about Italian history. Most of his published work deals with the history of the Risorgimento.

3. See Edvard Benes, Souvenirs de guerre et de revolution: 1914-1918 (Paris: T.eroux, 1928). For an English translation., see My War Memoirs, trans. Paul Selver (Boston: Houghton Mifflin, 1928).

EdvardBen.es (1884-1948) was one of the founders of Czechoslovakia. A member of the nationalist leadership group that established a Czechoslovak provisional government during the war. Benes became his country's foreign minister when the provisional government and its claims to Czechoslovak independence were recognized by Britain and France in 1918. He retained the position for twenty years.

§74. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals

1. All the bibliographical data and quoted passages in. this note are extracted from a review-article, 〃San Benedetto e Cassiodoro;, (St. Benedict and Cassiodorus), in the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section of Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1375 (July iz 1929): 126-29.

2. Aurelio Giuseppe Amatucci, Storia della letteratura latina cristiana (History of Christian. literature in Latin) (Bari: Laterza, 1929).

3. Cassiodorus (ca. 487-ca. 480) held several high administrative offices before he retired to his birthplace, Scylacium (Squillace), in southern Italy, sometime around 540, and established a monastery called Vivarium. There, the monks copied manuscripts under the direction of Cassiodorus, a collector of manuscripts intent on preserving Roman culture. Cassiodorus^ most important work is the Institutiones divinarum et seacularium litterarum, a part of which comprises directions to his monks on the study of scripture and the copying of manuscripts. For an English translation of the Institutiones, see An Introduction to Divine and Human Readings, ed. and trans. Leslie Webber Jones (New York: Columbia University Press, 1946).

4. Luigi Salvatorelli^ book on Saint Benedict and the Italy of his time was published by Laterza in 1929. For more on Luigi Salvatorelli, see Notebook 1, §44/ n. 27.

5. The Roman firm of Formiggini published Ermini's small book on St. Benedict in its 〃Profili〃 (Profiles) series in 1928.

On Filippo Ermini, see Notebook 3, §76/ n. 2,

§75. Maggiorino Ferraris and life in Italy from 1882 to 1926

i. See the bibliographical note entitled Scritti di M. Ferraris (Writings by M. Ferraris) in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1375 (July i, 1929): 7-10. This bibliographical note accompanies a set of articles commemorating the recently deceased Maggiorino Ferraris.

§76. On the crisis 0/1898

i. The four articles by Maggiorino Ferraris mentioned here—rincaro del pane” (The increase in the price of bread), ^Uora presente77 (The present hour), "Il nuovo rincaro del pane” (The latest increase in the price of bread), and "Politica di lavoro(labor policy)—were all published in Nuova Antologia on the dates indicated, and they are all included in the bibliographical list cited in §75, n. if above.

§77. Garibaldi's crossing from Sicily to Calabria in i860

1. When Garibaldi defeated the Neapolitan army at Milazzo on July 20, i860, thus gaining control of all of Sicily and bringing an end to Bourbon rule of the island. King Vittorio Emanuele sent him an official message asking him to stop his campaign. At the same time, the king secretly let Garibaldi know that he would not be displeased if the latter disobeyed and marched on to Naples. Garibaldi crossed the straits of Messina in midAugust and entered Naples triumphantly on September 7.

2. Maggiorino Ferraris's article, "Vittorio Emanuele e Garibaldi ed il passaggio del Faro nel i860: Da documenti storici” (Victor Emmanuel and Garibaldi and the crossing at Faro in i860: Based on historical documents), which was published in the January i, 1912, issue of Nuova Antologia, is included in the bibliographical list cited in §75/ n. i, above.

§78. Monasticism and feudalism

i. Le., the Benedictine rule

1, This whole note is based on an article by Carlo Calisse, "San Benedetto” (St. Benedict), in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1375 (July i? 1929): 11-29.

§79. A. G. Bianchi, 〃I clubs rossi durante Tassedio di Parigi”

i. Augusto Guido Bianchi, "I clubs rossi durante Passe dio di Parigi” (The red clubs during the siege of Paris), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1375 (July I, 1929)： 46-55.

2. As Gramsci correctly surmised, Les clubs rouges pendant le siège de Paris (Paris: Garnier, 1871) was written by the French journalist and political commentator Gustave de Molinari (1819-1912). Contrary to the impression conveyed by Bianchi's article, however, de Molinari's book is not a pamphlet but a volume of well over three hundred pages.

§80. Sorel and the Jacobins

1. Quoted by Augusto Guido Bianchi in his article "I clubs rossi durante l'assedio di Parigi” (The red clubs during the siege of Paris), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1375 (July i, 1929): 47.

2. Pierre-Joseph Proudhon, De la justice dans la revolution et dans l'églìse: Nouveau principe de philosophie pratique, 3 vols. (Paris: Garnier^ 1858). Some portions of this work are available in English translation in Selected Writings of Piene-foseph Proudhon, ed. Stewart Edwards, trans. Elizabeth Fraser (Garden City, N.Y,: Doubleday, Anchor Books, 1969).

§81. Past and present. Teiritorial distribution of the Italian population.

1. Gramsci extracted the data recorded in this note from the second half of a two-part article by Giorgio Mortara, '"Natalità e urbanesimo in Italia” (Birth rates and urbanism in Italy), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1374 (June 16, 1929): 485-96, and no. 1375, (July if 1929): 102-15. Other information. derived from this article is used by Gramsci in Notebook 2, §124.

2. As part of its program to centralize the state, the Fascist regime in February 1926 started to implement a law一known as the ^podestà law〃一 that was meant to transform local administrative structures radically. In the first phase, the office of mayor and the local councils were eliminated in towns of less than. five thousand inhabitants. Their functions were taken. over by the "podestà, 〃 who was appointed by the central government—thus obviating the need for local administrative elections—and who was answerable only to the administrative authorities of the relevant province. Later that same year, the nondeirLOcratic, hierarchical "podestà/， system of administration was installed, with some modifications, in more populous centers.

§82. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals

i. Antonio Panizzi (1797-1879) left Italy in 1822 to escape persecution for his revolutionary patriotic activity. Within a few years of settling in England he was appointed professor of Italian. at University College, London. He became the principal librarian of the British Museum in 1856, after serving about twenty-five years as assistant librarian. Panizzi was knighted in 1869.

2. Carlo Segrè, "Il Petrarca a Montpellier^ (Petrarch at Montpellier), Nuova Antologia 64, no, 1376 (July 16/ 1929): 137-53.

Pietro di ser Parenzo, also called Petracco, father of the great Italian poet Francesco Petrarca, or Petrarch (1304-74), was banished from Florence together with Dante and other Guelf leaders. After several years spent in other parts of Italy, including Arezzo, where Francesco was born, the family moved to France. Francesco received his early education in the village of Carpentras, near Avignon. Submitting to his father's wishes, he studied law, first at the University of Montpellier (1316-20) and then at the University of Bologna (1320-26), after which he returned to Avignon. It was in the church of Saint Claire in Avignon that, on April 6,工327, Petrarch saw Laura, the woman who would inspire his finest poetry.

3. Ibid., p. 140.

4. Piacentino (d. 1192), so called after his birthplace Piacenza, is also known as Petrus Placentinus. Trained as an exegete of Roman legal texts by the followers of the renowned glossator Irnerius (ca. 105 s-ca. 1125), he taught at Bologna and Mantua before moving to France, where he became a distinguished professor at Montpellier. Placentinus wrote several important treatises on Roman law, among them the Summa codicis and Summa institutionum.

§83. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals

1. Ferdinando Nunziante, "Gli italiani in Russia durante il secolo XVIH/, (The Italians in Russia during the eighteenth century). Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1376 (July 16, 1929): 187-210.

2. Ibid., p. 196.

3. One of the most successful members of the Panin family in Russia was Count Nikita Ivanovich Panin (1718-83), who for well over a decade was Catherine the Great's principal adviser in foreign affairs.

§84. Popular literature

1. For the judgment on H. G. Wells that Gramsci expressed in his letters, see Notebook 5, §42, n. 3.

2. Laura Torretta, ^Uultima fase di Wells” (Wells怎 final phase). Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1376 (July 16, 1929): 217-18.

3. For more comparison between H. G. Wells and Jules Verne, see Notebook 3, §149.

§85. Development of the bourgeois spirit in Italy

1. Manilo Torquato Dazzi, "Nel centenario della morte di Albertino Mussato" (On the centenary of Albertino Mussato% death), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1376 (July 16/ 1929}: 154-75.

2. Albertino Mussato (1261-1329), statesman, poet, and historian, was a member of the council of his native Padua and was entrusted with a number of important diplomatic and ambassadorial missions. He also participated in the military defense of Padua during its long war with Vicenza. For several months in 1314 he was the prisoner of Cangrande della Scala of Verona but was able to return to Padua, where he was publicly and ceremoniously crowned poet. In 1325, however, he had a falling-out with the lord of Padua, Marsilio da Carrara, and was constrained to spend his remaining years in exile. His two major contributions to historiography were the Historia Augusta de gestis Hemici VII, which recounts the emperor Henry VIPs deeds in Italy, and De gestis Italicorum post Henricum VII Caesarem, which covers the period following Henry VIPs death. (1313) up to 1329. (Although himself a Guelf, Mussato was a great admirer of Henry VII.) As a historian he modeled himself on Livy and adopted an approach distinctly different from that of the typical medieval chroniclers.

3. Giuseppe Lisio (1870-1912) was primarily a literary critic. He made significant contributions to Dante scholarship and produced a valuable critical edition of Machiavelli^ Principe, on which he also wrote an important study.

Eduard Fueter (1876-1928) wrote, among many other historical works, a history of modern historiography: Geschichte der neueren Historiographie (Munich, 1911),

Ugo Balzani (1847-1916), in addition to his archival work on medieval chronicles, wrote books on the relations between the popes and the royal house of Hohenstaufen and on Pope Sixtus V.

4. On Leon Battista Alberti, see Notebook 5, §55, n. 9.

5. See Alfredo Lensi, Palazzo Vecchio (Milan-Rome: Bestetti e Tumminelli/ 1929). Gramsci almost certainly read reviews of this book in the periodicals he received in prison, perhaps Nello Tarchiani's "Vita Vissuta in Palazzo Vecchio” (A life spent in Palazzo Vecchio), Il Marzocco 35, no. 6 (February 3, 1930) or Corrado Pavolini's review in LItalia Letteraria 2, no. 6 (February 9, 1930).

§86. England

i. This note is based on Gramsci's reading of an article by the pseudonymous Augur, “La politica della Gran Bretagna” (The policy of Great Britain), in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1376 (July i6, 1929): 211-16. For Gramsci's comments on Augur, see Notebook 2, §32.

§87. Political-military leadership in the war of 1914-18

1. Mario Caracciolo, "Il comando unico e il comando italiano nel 1918〃 (Unified command and the Italian command in 1918), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1376 (July 16, 1929): 229-40.

2. Mario Caracciolo^ book on Italian troops in France during World War I was published by the Milan firm of Mondadori in 1929.

3. Caracciolo, comando unico/7 p. 232.

4. In fact, none of the newspapers, not even Avanti! carried any reports on the disturbances in and around Palazzo Siccardi, which housed the Turin offices of the Chamber of Labor.

§88. On the Italian Risorgimento. Michele Amari and Sicilianism

1. Francesco Brandileone, "Michele Amari,Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1377 (August I, 1929): 352-59.

On Francesco Brandileone, see Notebook 3, §87, n. 3.

Michele Amari (1806-89) was born in Palermo, but his strong nationalist sentiments and open dislike of the absolutist Bourbon monarchy compelled him to seek exile in Paris. Before he left his native island he had already written and published a widely acclaimed historical study of the Sicilian Vespers revolt and the war that ensued, La guerra del Vespro siciliano (1842). While in Paris he studied Arabic and started gathering materials for a history of Arab rule in Sicily. With the revolution of 1848 he was able to return to Sicily, where he served briefly as minister of finance. The revolution soon collapsed, however； and Amari was back in exile, concentrating on his research. During this period he started to publish his monumental multivolume work on Sicily under the Arabs, Storia dei Musulmani di Sicilia (1854-72). Amari returned to the Italian mainland in 1859 and a year later was back in Sicily, where Garibaldi appointed him minister of education and of public works. After the unification of Italy he was elected senator and served for some time as minister of education. In 1864 he moved to Florence and devoted the rest of his life to historical research. Amari's writings constitute one of the most important bodies of work on Sicilian medieval history. His book on the Sicilian Vespers was translated into English: History of the War of the Sicilian. Vespers, 3 vols., trans. Francis Egerton (London: R. Bentley, 1850).

2. Emanuele Orlando怎 edition of Amari's writings was published by the Milan firm of Treves in 1928.

On Vittorio Emanuele Orlando, prime minister of Italy from 1917 to 1919 and, like Amari, a native of Palermo, see Notebook i, §n6z n. 17,

3. Gramsci is referring tp a speech made by Vittorio Emanuele Orlando in Palermo on July 28, 1925. Responding to the Fascists, who had accused him of promoting the interests of the Mafia by supporting the candidates of the opposition in local elections, Orlando said (according to a report in Avanti! July 29, 1925): "If by Mafia one understands the help that one friend extends to another, if by Mafia one understands the self-esteem of a people, if by Mafia one understands affection. carried even to the limits of paroxysm or loyalty carried even to the point of exasperation, then I say as one native of Palermo to another: I am the first among the Mafiosi/7

4. When Naples was taken over by Napoleon. in 1806, the Bourbon king Ferdinand fled to Sicily, where the British, who propped up his rule over the island, pressured him into attenuating his absolutism and granting the Sicilians a constitution in 1812. In 1816, following the fall of Napoleon, Ferdinand returned to Naples, and, restored as the king of the Two Sicilies, he reverted to absolutist rule. As a consequence, Sicily lost whatever autonomy it had gained. The Kingdom of the Two Sicilies erupted into open rebellion in 1820； in Naples the rebels demanded a constitution, whereas in Sicily, and especially in the revolutionary stronghold of Palermo, the populace clamored for a return to the 1812 constitution and Sicilian independence. The Neapolitan leaders of the uprising succeeded in obtaining a liberal constitution from the king, but far from being sympathetic to the Sicilian cause, they sent General Pepe to the island, and he crushed the rebellious forces mercilessly.

5. Brandileone, /zMichele Aman/7 p. 353.

6. Alessandro D'Ancona's edition of Michele Amari's correspondence is cited in a footnote on p. 358 of Brandileone^ "Michele Amari."

7. Quoted in Brandileone, "Michele Amari," p. 355.

8. Brandileone, "Michele Amari" p. 358. Brandileone is referring to a passage in Benedetto Croce's introduction to his Storia del regno di Napoli (Bari: Laterza, 1925). See the English translation of Crocei work, History of the Kingdom of Naples, trans. Frances Frenaye (Chicago: Chicago University Press, 1970): "The supporters of regional autonomy, in i860 and after, in order to intensify the expression of their dismay and sorrow for the fall of the old Kingdom of Naples, were always mouthing a pompous but unrealistic reference to the "glorious reign of Roger/ The fact is that the Norman-Swabian story is ours only in small part, practically not at all. Norman-Swabian politics and culture had no indigenous and national character" (p. 16).

§89. Gabriele Gabbrielli, "India ribelle"

1. Gabriele Gabbrielli, "India ribelle” (Rebel India), Nuova Antologia 65/ no. 1377 (August I, 1929): 375*4.

2. //Ispolcom,/ is the acronym, also used by Gabbrielli in his article, for the executive committee of the Communist International.

3. In his article, Gabbrielli uses the unabbreviated title of the organization /yEntente contre la Troisième Internationale^ that was formed in Geneva to combat Ispolcom.

4. Gramsci had a copy of a book by the French Catholic conservative Henri Massis, Defense de roccident (Paris: Pion, 1927). He read it during the period of his imprisonment in Milan and commented on it in an August 8, 1927, letter to his friend Giuseppe Berti:

I had a great intellectual disappointment with the highly touted book by Henri Massis, Defense de Foccident)I think that either Filippo Crispolti or Egilberto Martire [both of them journalists, conservative Catholics, and Fascist supporters] would have written a sparer book if the subject had occurred to them. What makes me laugh is that the eminent Massis, who is dreadfully afraid that Tagore's and GandhVs Asiatic ideology might destroy French Catholic rationalism, does not realize that Paris has already become a semicolony of Senegalese intellectualism and that in France the number of people of mixed race is increasing by leaps and bounds. One might, just for a laugh, maintain that, if Germany is the extreme outcrop of ideological Asianism, France is the beginning of darkest Africa, and the jazz band is just the first molecule of a new Euro-African civilization!

For an English translation of Henri Massis's book, see Defence of the West, trans. F. S. Flint, pref, by G. K. Chesterton (New York: Harcourt Brace, 1928).

See also Gramsci's remarks on Henri Massis in Notebook 5, §141, and Notebook 6f §195.

5. See Notebook 5, §66.

6. See Gabbrielli, “India ribelle," p. 377 n. 2.

§90. Brief notes on Islamic culture

1. Bruno Ducati, santi delFlslam77 (The saints of Islam), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1377 (August iz 1929): 360-74.

2. The parenthesis is Gramsci's.

§91. Renaissance and Reformation

1. Fortunato Rizzi's book on the spirit of the sixteenth century and Italian vernacular (as opposed to Latin) poetry was published by Treves, in Milan, in 1928).

2. See Notebook iz §14, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. Alfredo Galletti, “La lirica volgare del Cinquecento e Panima del Rinascimentoz, (The sixteenth-century vernacular lyric and the spirit of the Renaissance), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1377 (August i, 1929): 273-92.

Alfredo Galletti (1872-1962), a literary historian, was strongly influenced by the positivist school of criticism. He expressed his opposition to idealism in some writings that were severely critical of Croce. (These are probably the writings ^overflowing with recriminationsto which Gramsci alludes later in this note.) Galletti wrote books on the history of rhetoric from the classical period to the sixteenth century, on eighteenthcentury Italian drama, and on nineteenth-century literature, as well as monographs on Pascoli and Manzoni.

4. On Gaetano Salvemini, see Notebook i, §25/ n. 19； and on Leonida Bissolati, see Notebook 1, §157, n. 2.

5. Galletti, "La lirica volgare del Cinquecento," p. 277. The parenthetical exclamation points and question marks are Gramsci's.

6. Gramsci is reiterating a point he expressed a few pages earlier in this same notebook； see Notebook 5, §55, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially nn. 9 and 10.

§92. Italian diplomacy

i. Gramsci mentions this same incident in Notebook 2, §59.

1. Alberto Lumbroso^ two-volume work on the economic and diplomatic causes of the first World War~Le origini economiche e diplomatiche della guena mondiale, voi. if La vittoria delPimperialismo anglosassone； voi. 2, Limperalisrao britannico dagli albori dell'ottocento allo scoppio della guerra (Milan: Mondadori, 1926-28)—is devoted in large part to a discussion of the history of Britain's imperial expansion； Lnmbroso mentions Tommaso Tittoni's role in the diplomatic incident involving the two French ships Carthage and Manouba on 2:370-71. Gramsci had a copy of this book, which contains many reference to Tommaso Tittoni.

For more on Alberto Lumbroso, whom Gramsci classifies as a Lorian in Notebook i, §32, see Notebook i, §32, n. 1.

3. See Veracissimus (a pseudonym sometimes used by Tommaso Tittoni), “I documenti diplomatici francesi:工9工工一3:912” (French diplomatic documents: 1911-1912), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1378 (August i6, 1929): 456-68.

Gramsci may have been thinking of Tommaso Tittoni's book on. Italian foreign and domestic policy, Nuovi scritti di politica interna ed estera (Milan: Treves, 1930). This book comprises some speeches Tittoni made in the Italian senate and a number of essays that had been previously published in Nuova Antologia^ however, it does not include the article (〃I documenti diplomatici francesi: I9ii-i9i2,z) mentioned here.

On Tommaso Tittoni, see Notebook 2/ §6/ n. 1»

§93. Eighteenth-century Italian morals

1. Alessandro Giulini, "Una dama avventuriera del Settecento” (An eighteenth-century adventuress). Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1378 (August 16, 1929)： 499-5。6.

2. Giuseppe Parimi incomplete satiric poem II Giorno, written in mock-heroic style, portrays a day in the life of a young Milanese aristocrat. It is an indictment of the frivolity, ostentation, and general moral decadence of the upper classes during the second half of the eighteenth century.

On Giuseppe Parini, see Notebook ix §88, n. l

3. Gramsci is referring to Giuseppe Balsamo (1743-95), the charlatan and adventurer better known as Cagliostro. Bom in Sicily, he was able, for a while, to fascinate most of Europe, especially Parisian high society,

§94. The negative popular-national character of Italian literature

1. Enrico Thovez (工869-工925), a poet, literary critic, and painter, was born and died in Turin, where he was the director of the city's museum of modern art. His literary criticism constitutes an impassioned attack on the contrived literariness, technical affectation, and insincerity of the Italian poetic tradition. Gabriele D'Annunzio and Giosuè Carducci were his prime targets, whereas he held Giacomo Leopardi to be an exemplary poet. His best-known work of literary criticism is the one mentioned by Gramsci, Il pastore, il gregge, la zampogna: Dall'Inno a Satana alla "Laus Vitae" (The shepherd, the flock, and the reed-pipeFrom [Carducci^] Hymn. to Satan to [DAnnunzio旬〃Laus Vitae77), which was first published in 1910 by Ricciardi of Naples and brought out a year later by the same publisher in a new edition that included an additional chapter, "Dai cani da guardia ai critici(From the watchdogs to the critics).

2. On Francesco De Sanctis, see Notebook 1, §96, n. 3. Gramscizs esteem for De Sanctis is especially evident in Notebook 23, §1 and §3,

3. Alfonso Ricolfi, Enrico Thovez poeta e il problema della formazione artistica” (Enrico Thovez the poet and the problem of artistic formation), Nuova Antologia 74, no. 1378 (August 16, 1929): 469-83.

4. An article by Prezzolini entitled "Thovez il precursore^ (Thovez the forerunner) is mentioned (but without any bibliographical reference) in Ricolfi, "Enrico Thovez poeta/7 p. 471.

§95. Fifteenth-century and sixteenth-century man

1. On Leon Battista Alberti and Baldassare Castiglione (including his major work II Cortegiano, discussed in this note) see the Notes to the Text for Notebook 5, §55, in particular, nn. 9 and 10.

2. For a long time, the authorship of book 3 of Leon Battista Alberti's work Della famiglia was erroneously attributed to Agnolo Pandolfini.

3. Vittorio Cian's article "Il conte Baldassar Castiglione:工529—工929〃 was published in two parts in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1378 (August 16/ 1929): 409-23, and no. 1379 (September i, 1929): 3-18.

On Vittorio Cian, see Notebook 2, §31, n. 3.

4. Francesco Sansovino is quoted by Vittorio Cian in part 1 of "Il conte Baldassar Castiglione," p. 410.

5. Cian, 〃I1 conte Baldassar Castiglione/7 part 2/ pp. 8-9.

6. Ludovico Ariosto (1474-1533) published his first version of Orlando Furioso, comprising forty cantos, in. 1516. In 1521 he published a revised version with some additions and deletions as well as improvements in language and style. He published the third and final version, with forty-six cantos, in. 1532.

The first part of Miguel de Cervantes's Don Quixote was published in 1605, and the second part in 1615.

7. See Vittorio Ciati, Il cortegiano del Conte Baldesar Castiglione, 3d rev. ed. (Florence: Sansoni, 1929). Cian refers to his own edition of Castiglione's The Courtier in his article "Il conte Baldassar Castiglione, 〃 part I, p. 418 n. 7.

§96. The negative national-popular character of Italian literature

I, I migliori libri italiani consigliati da cento illustri contemporanei (The best Italian books recommended by a hundred renowned contemporaries), published by Hoepli, in Milan, 1893, is mentioned by Vittorio Cian in the second part of his article "Il conte Baldassar Castiglione: 429—1929,〃 Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1379 (September t, 1929): 4.

§97. The intellectuals

1. See Notebook 4, §50.

2. The announcement of the forthcoming publication of E. Salarisi book on the Italian academies and cultural institutes is made by Salaris himself in. a note, "La società letteraria di Verona77 (The literary society of Verona), in the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section of Nuova Antologia 64, no< 1379 (September i, 1929): 128 n. 1.

§98. Postwar history

i. Giovanni Marietti^ article "Il trattato di Versailles e la sua esecuzione” (The Versailles Treaty and its implementation) was published in two parts in Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1380 (September 16, 1929): 243-54, and no. 1382 (October 16r 1929): 500-512.

§99. German armament at the time of the armistice

i. All the information in this note is extracted from the second part of Giovanni Marietti, trattato di Versailles e la sua esecuzione77 (The Versailles Treaty and its implementation), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1382 (October 16, 1929): 506.

§100. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals

i. Ettore Lo Gatto's article "L'Italia nelle letterature slave” (Italy in Slavic Literatures) was published in three parts in Nuova Antologia 64 (September 16,1929): 232-42； (October i, 1929): 327-46； (October 16,1929): 427-39.

Ettore Lo Gatto was the director of the Institute for Eastern European Studies in Rome between 1921 and 1943. In 1931 he was named professor of Slavic literature at the University of Padua, and in 1941 be became professor of Russian literature at the University of Rome. He founded and edited the Rivista di Letterature Slave (1926-32) and coedited Europa Orientale (1921-43). Lo Gatto's books include a history of Russian literature and a detailed study on Italian artists in Russia.

§101. Father Biesciani's progeny. Filippo Crispolti

1. Filippo Crispolti, “La madre di Leopardi(Leopardi怎 mother). Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1380 (September 16/ 1929): 137-48.

On Filippo Crispolti, see Notebook 3, §37/ n. 5.

2. Giovanni Ferretti (1885-1952), a literary historian who also made some contributions to Dante studies, wrote a biography of Giacomo Leopardi—Vita di Giacomo Leopardi (Bologna: Zanichelli, 1945)—and prepared an edition of Leopardi's complete works.

3. The poet, scholar, and philosopher Giacomo Leopardi (1798-1837) was born in the small city of Recanati, in the Marches, His parents, Count Monaldo and Marquise Adelaide Antici, were aristocrats of limited means. It appears that Adelaide Antici was especially preoccupied with managing and conserving the family怎 shrunken patrimony. Physically deformed from birth, tormented by ill health, and severely limited in his actions because of lack of money, Leopardi's short life was difficult and painful. His parents7 seeming insensitivity or indifference toward him hurt him deeply, although he did enjoy happy relationships with his brother and sister during his childhood.

4. On Massimo D'Azeglio, see Notebook 1, §121, n. 1.

5. See Alessandro Varaldo, ^Pellegrinaggio a Recanatiz, (A pilgrimage to Recanati), Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1380 (September i6f 1929):159.

Alessandro Varaldo (1876-1953) was best known as a playwright and drama critic, although he also wrote novels, short stories, and poetry.

§102. Italian literature. The contribution by bureaucrats

1, See Notebook 5, §38.

2, Nazioni e minoranze etniche (Nations and ethnic minorities) was written. by Luca Pietromarchi under the pseudonym Luca dei Sabelli and published in two volumes by Zanichelli of Bologna (no date). The comment on this book that is quoted by Gramsci is extracted from the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section of Nuova Antologìa 64, no. 1380 (September 16, 1929): 267-71.

§iO3. Popular literature. Theater

1. Alberto Manzi, conte Giraud, il governo italico e la censura” (Count Giraud, the Italian government, and censorship), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1381 (October iz 1929): 359-80. The passage quoted by Gramsci is on p, 370.

2. The French playwright Jean Henri Ferdinand Lamartelìère (17611830) had such great popular success with his Robert chef de brigands that he wrote a sequel to it. Le tribunal redoutable； ou, La suite de Robert, chef de brigands. Both plays are in five acts, and the first is an. adaptation of Friedrich Schiller's Die Räuber. For an English translation of Die Räuber (1781), a tragedy in five acts, see The Robbers, trans. F. J. Lamport (New York: Penguin, 1979).

3. I. e.z "Nina Crazed by Love/7 "Chevalier de la Barre/7 and "Delirium."

4. The quotations by Alberto Manzi in his article 〃I1 conte Giraud/7 pp. 371-72/ are from a booklet by Marie Jacques Amand Boieldieu, De Vinfluence de la chaire, du theatre et du baneau, dans la société civile, et de Vimportance de leur létdblissement sur des bases qui puissent relever en France leur ancienne et veritable splendeur: Ouvrage politique et moral (Paris: Demonville, 1804).

§104. The sixteenth century

i. Emilio Lovarini's edition of La Venexiana: Commedia di ignoto cinquecentesco (The Venetian woman: A play in five acts by an unknown sixteenth-century writer) was published in 1928 by Zanichelli of Bologna as the first title in its series "Nuova scelta di curiosità letterarie inedite 0 rare" (New selection of previously unpublished or rare literary curiosities).

La Venexiana, which is partly in dialect, has come to be regarded as one of the great works of sixteenth-century Italian drama. According to a widely accepted hypothesis, it was written sometime between 153$ and 1537 by Girolamo Zanetti, a friend and admirer of Ruzzante.

Emilio Lovarini (1866-1955), a philologist and literary historian, conducted extensive research on the Paduan dialect literature and Venetian drama of the Renaissance. He was a major authority on Ruzzante.

Gramsci's source of information on Lovarini^ edition of La Venexiana is Ireneo Sanesi, nLa Venexiana," Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1381 (October I, 1929): 273-81

2. See Benedetto Croce, "Intorno alla commedia italiana del Rinasci-menton (On Italian Renaissance drama), La Critica 28, no. 2 (March 20, 1930)： 97-99

3. Sanesi, "La Venexiana" See Ireneo Sanesi, La Commedia, voi. 1 (Milan: Vallardi, 1911). The second volume of Sanesizs work on the history of Italian comedy was published in 1935.

Ireneo Sanesi (1868-1964), a literary critic and historian, taught Italian literature at the University of Pavia. In addition to his history of Italian comedy, he also produced a critical edition of Manzoni's poetry and dramatic works.

4. See Alfred Mortier, Un dramaturge populaire de la renaissance italienne: Ruzzante, 2 vols. (Paris: J. Peyronnet, 1925-26), in which Ruzzante怎 plays are "traduits pour la premiere fois de Pancien dialecte padouan rustique/7

Ruzzante (or Ruzante) was the pseudonym and stage name of Angelo Beolco (ca. 1496-1542). He wrote about a dozen comedies in a mixture of rustic dialect (for the most part Paduan) and standard Italian； when they were performed he would often play the part of the peasant Ruzzante, hence his nickname. Through his use of dialect and rustic characters, Ruzzante was able to parody the artificiality of literary language and the manners of refined society. His plays, however, were written and performed for his circle of aristocratic friends. One of Ruzzante^ plays that has been translated into English is Anconitana^ see The Woman from Ancona, trans. Nancy Dersofi (Berkeley: University of California Press, 1994).

5. The poet Ludovico Ariosto (1474-1533), best known for his Orlando Furioso, also wrote plays, including II negromante (1528), I suppositi (1529-31), and La cassaria (1531), the latter two in verse.

Bernardo Dovizi (1470-1520) is also known as Bibbiena. A diplomat close to the Medicis who was made cardinal by Pope Leo X in 1513/ he is one of the interlocutors in Castiglione^ Cortigiano. He wrote a highly regarded play, La canària (with a prologue by Castiglione), that was first performed in Urbino in 1531.

6. The reference to Adolfo Orvieto's article on La Venexiana is taken from Ireneo Sanesi's article in Nuova Antologia.

The works of the playwright Henry Becque (1837-99) are generally regarded as important examples of naturalism in drama. Some of his best plays, such as Les corbeaux (1876) and La parisienne (1885) have been translated into English； see The Vultures, The Woman of Paris, The MerryGo-Round, trans. Freeman Tildon (New York: Kennedy, 1913).

§105. Americanism

1. Carlo Linati/ "Babbitt compra il mondo” (Babbit buys the world). Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1382 (October 16, 1929): 492-99.

On Carlo Linati, see Notebook 3, §109/ n. 3.

2. Ibid., p. 492. See Edgar Ansel Mowrer, This American World (New York: J. H. Sears Co., 1928). Mowrerzs book contains chapters on, among other things, 〃The Essence of Americanism,n "Europe Before the Wai/' "Europe Becomes Americanized/' "The Limits of Americanization,1f and "The Future of the United States/7

3. Sinclair Lewis's novel Babbitt was first published in 1922. Gramsci had a copy of the French translation: Babbitt, trans. Maurice Rémon (Paris: Librairie Stock, 1930).

4. Siegfried's comparison between the Parisian artisan and the Taylor-ized worker is to be found elsewhere: namely, in Siegfried's preface to Andre Philip's, Le problème ouviiei aux Etats-Unis (Paris: Alcan, 1927), pp. xv-xvi. Gramsci had a copy of this book, and he cites it several times in various notebooks.

On Andre Siegfried, see Notebook 3, §68/ n. 3； on Andre Philip怎 book, see Notebook 1, §51, n. 4.

§106. Luigi Villari, 〃I1 governo laburista britannico”

1. Luigi Villari, “Il governo laburista britannico” (Britain's Labour government)/ Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1382 (October 16/ 1929): 467-78.

2. Gramsci is referring to Tommaso Tittoni, on whom see Notebook 2, §& n. i.

§107. Italy and Palestine

i. Romolo Tritonj, "La riforma del mandato sulla Palestina" (The revision of the [British] mandate over Palestine), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1382 (October 16, 1929): 479-91.

§108. Sicily. The Sicilian Pantheon of San Domenico

I. Gramsci learned about the Sicilian Pantheon in Palermo from an article by Romeo Vuoli, "Il generale Giacinto Carini” (General Giacinto Carini), published in two parts in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1383 (November i, 1929): 86-98/ and no. 1384 (November 16, 1929): 214-26. The Sicilian Pantheon is mentioned in the first half of the article (p. 86).

On Francesco Crispi, see Notebook 1, §43, n. 10.

Rosolino Pilo (1820-60), a Sicilian nobleman, was an ardent follower of Mazzini and a close associate of Crispi^ both of whom he met during the years he spent in exile following his participation in the Sicilian uprising in 1848. In April i860, very soon after the outbreak in Palermo of the revolt led by Francesco Riso against the Bourbon monarchy, Pilo arrived in Sicily to organize the rebels on behalf of the republican cause of Italian unification. The rebellion was all but crushed, and Pilo himself was killed by Bourbon troops in a skirmish just outside Palermo； in May, however, Garibaldi embarked on his expedition with the Thousand and before long took over the island in the name of King Vittorio Emanuele.

Giacinto Carini (1821-80), who was born in Palermo, played a prominent role in the Sicilian insurrection of 1848. In order to escape the repression that followed, Carini went into exile in Paris. He returned to Italy to join the expedition of Garibaldi's Thousand to Sicily. He distinguished himself in the conflict, and in 1862 he joined the Italian regular army and participated with distinction in its campaigns. Later he served five terms as a member of parliament.

§109. Sicily

1. Romeo Vuoli's article was published in two parts in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1383 (November 1, 1929): 86-98, and no. 1384 (November 16, 1929): 214-26. The passage quoted by Gramsci is in the first part of the article, on p. 88.

On Giacinto Carini, see Notebook 5, §108, n. 1.

2. See the book by Gabriele Colonna-Fiumedinisi and Roberto Maurigi on the biographical backgrounds of the electoral candidates from the Palermo districts, I quattro candidati ai collegi di Palermo: Cenni biografici (Palermo: Lo Bianco, i860). Gramsci extracted this bibliographical information from Vuoli, "Il generale Giacinto Carini," part iz p. 88 n. 2.

§110. France and Italy

i. The quotation from Victor Hugo's political work Histoire d'un crime is taken from the first part of Romeo Vuoli's article, 〃I1 generale Giacinto Carini," Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1383 (November i, 1929): 91.

In Histoire dfun crime, written in 1852 but published only in 1877, Hugo provides a detailed account of Louis Bonaparte's coup from the point of view of a highly critical witness. For an English translation, see History of a Crime: Deposition of a Witness, trans. Huntington Smith (New York: Crowell, 1888).

§111. The Italian Academy

i. The texts of the speeches made by Benito Mussolini and Tommaso Tittoni at the formal inauguration ceremonies of the Accademia dltalia were published in Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1383 (November 1, 1929): 5-6 and 7-14, respectively.

On the Italian Academy, see Notebook 5/ §36, n.

On Tommaso Tittoni, see Notebook 2, §6, n. 1.

§112. Carlo Schanzer, z/Sovranità e giustizia nei rapporti fra gli Stati”

1. Carlo Schanzer, 〃 Sovranità e giustizia nei rapporti fra gli Stati” (Sovereignty and justice in the relations among states). Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1383 (November 1, 1929): 17-32.

On Carlo Schanzer, see Notebook 2/ §120, n. 1.

§113. On Henrik Ibsen

i. Guido Manacorda, Z/I1 pensiero religioso di Enrico Ibsen” (Henrik Ibsen's Religious Thought), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1383 (November if 1929): 58-77.

On Guido Manacorda, see Notebook 1, §72, n. 1.

§115. Niccolò Machiavelli

1. See Niccolò Machiavelli, Lettere (Florence: Società Editrice Rinascimento del Libro, 1929), edited, with an introduction, by Giuseppe Lesca and published in the series "Raccolta nazionale dei classici” (National Collection of Classics)； and Giuseppe Lesca, “Lettere di Niccolò Machiavelli," Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1383 (November x, 1929): 43-57.

2. See Edoardo Al visi, ed., Lettere familiari di N. Machiavelli (Florence: Sansoni, 1883). All the bibliographical data in this note are extracted from Lesca, "Lettere di Niccolò Machiavelli"； see, in particular, p. 43 n. I andp. 56 n. 9.

§116. G.B. nLa banca dei regolamenti internazionali,/

i. See G.B., nLa banca dei regolamenti intemazionali” (International settlements bank), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1384 (November 16, 1929): 231-42.

§117. Argus, "Il disarmo navale, i sottomarini e gli aeroplani^

1. Argus, “Il disarmo navale, i sottomarini e gli aeroplani" (Naval disarmament, submarines, and airplanes)/ Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1384 (November 16, 1929): 227-30.

§118. Stresemann

I, Francesco Tommasini, 〃I1 pensiero e Popera di Gustavo Stresemann,/ (The thought and work of Gustav Stresemann)/ Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1384 (November 16/ 1929): 182-96.

Gustav Stresemann (1878-1929) was chancellor (1923) and foreign. minister (1923-29) of the Weimar Republic.

§119. Encyclopedia of concepts— olitical, philosophical, eta Middle class

i. Like n signor the terms ^galantuomo^ and "civile" maybe translated as "gentleman” but such a rendering would rob them of many of the nuances to which Gramsci is drawing attention. See Gramsci's discussion of the concept of "signore" in Notebook 3, §46.

§120. Catholic cultural nationalism

1. See the unsigned article (in fact written by the Jesuit priest Mario Barbera), ^Religione e filosofia nelle scuole mediez, (Religion and philosophy in the secondary schools). La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (June 1, 1929): 414-27. It calls for ^reinstating the teaching of the perennial philosophy that is called Thomist, and that is also Italian because . .. its clearest tradition is rooted in Italy" (p. 424).

2. Lelio Socini (1525-62), also known as Socino and as Laelius Socinus, studied law at the University of Padua but soon turned his attention to ancient languages and biblical research. A series of encounters with several Italian "heretics" in northern cities (among them Vicenza) sparked his interest in the theological currents of the Reformation. In 1547 he embarked on a voyage through central Europe and visited the centers of the reformist movements. In the course of his travels and his studies, during which he corresponded with a number of major theologians, including Calvin, he started raising questions on issues that were at the core of both orthodox Catholic and Protestant doctrine: the Trinity, predestination, the sacraments, repentance, grace. Socinus also criticized the intolerance of the Calvinists in 1553 when they burned Michael Servetus at the stake for heresy. His views came to be considered heretical by both Catholics and Reformists, the Inquisition confiscated his estate, and Socinus spent the last few years of his life in Zurich. After his death, his nephew, Faustus Socinus (1539-1604), acquired his papers and further elaborated his theological views. Socinianism developed into a theological current of some importance and was especially influential in the growth of Unitarianism.

On Vincenzo Gioberti, see Notebook i, §47, n. 1.

3. On Carlo Pisacane, see Notebook i, §44, n. 5.

4. Le., the philosophical school of thought that derived its inspiration form the work of Giovanni Gentile (see Notebook 1, §15, n. 1).

§121. France

i. This work by André Siegfried is also listed in a set of bibliographic entries on the inside of the back cover of Notebook 2； see the Description of the Manuscript, 1:531. Gramsci also owned and read a different book by Siegfried, which he cites elsewhere in the notebooks, namely, Les Etats-Unis d'aujouid'hui (Paris: Colin, 1928).

On André Siegfried, see Notebook 3, §68, n. 3.

§122. National-popular

1. See Notebook 3, §63.

2. See Le triple démisme de Sun Wen, trans, and ed. Pascal M. D'Elia (Shanghai: Bureau Sinologique de Zi-Ka-Wei, Imprimérie de T^ou-Sè-Wè, 1929). See also the unsigned article published in two parts with slightly different titles: 'll riformatore cinese Suen Uen e le sue teorie politiche e sociali” (The Chinese reformer Sun Yat-sen and his political and social theories), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May 4, 1929): 205-20； and "Le teorie politiche e sociali di Suen Uen” (Sun Yat-sen's politicai and social theories), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (May i8z 1929): 300-314. This same article was also used by Gramsci in his composition of Notebook 5, §51.

On the term ntriple demisme," which is a French rendering of Sun Yat-sen's San Min Chu I (commonly translated into English as "Three Principles of the People), and on different versions of Sun Yat-sen's name, see Notebook 5, §51, n. 1.

On Sun Yat-sen, see Notebook 5, §23, n. 3.

On Pasquale DTlia, see Notebook 5, §51, n. 2.

§123. Renaissance

i. Vittorio Rossi, /'Il Rinascimento,z/ Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1384 (November 16, 1929): 137-50. All the quotations in this note are from Rossi's article； the parenthetical interpolations and emphasis are, of course, Gramsci's.

Vittorio Rossi (1865-1938), a literary historian, taught at various universities including those of Messina, Pavia, Padua (where he also served three years as rector), and Rome. In 1933 he became president of the highly prestigious Lincei Academy. In addition to several important studies on fifteenth- and sixteenth-century authors, he wrote a widely used history of Italian literature and produced a valued critical edition of a volume of Petrarchs Latin letters, Familiari.

2. Le., the autonomous city-states that flourished in medieval Italy.

3. Gramsci had a copy of Henri Pirenne's Les villes du Moyen Age: Essai d'histoùe économique et sociale (Brussels: M. Lamertin, 1927). For an English translation, see Medieval Cities: Their Origins and the Revival of Trade, trans. Frank D. Halsey (Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1946).

4. Ezio Levi collected his articles on the Arab influence in Spain and published them in a single volume, Castelli di Spagna (Milan: Treves, 1931). Gramsci alludes to this volume in Notebook 4, §92.

On Ezio Levi, see Notebook 4, §92, n. 1.

5. On Ludovico Ariosto's masterpiece, Orlando Fuiioso, see Notebook 5, §95, n. 6, and §140, n. 5； on Baldassare Castiglione and his Cortegiano, see Notebook 5, §55, n. 10.

6. Gramsci is echoing the observation of Karl Marx in the opening sentences of The Eighteenth Brumaiie of Louis Bonaparte (1852). See K. Marx and F. Engels, Collected Works (New York: International Publishers, 1979), 11:103: "Hegel remarks somewhere that all facts and personages of great importance in world history occur, as it were, twice. He forgot to add: the first time as tragedy, the second as farce/7

7. On the Strasbourg oath, see also Gramsci's remarks in Notebook 3, §76, and n. 4 of the corresponding Notes to the Text.

8. A late-eleventh-century fresco in the Basilica of St. Clement in Rome depicting three servants being ordered by their master to drag a bound St. Clement along the ground, shows (somewhat in the manner of modern cartoons) the following words being uttered by the irate master: "Fili de le pute traite/, ('Tull, sons of whores"). It is one of earliest-known inscriptions in the Italian vernacular.

9. In the fourteenth century, the more or less democratic system of government in the communes degenerated and was replaced by the signoria, wherein power was wielded by a council of notables. In the fifteenth century, the signoria itself faded away as many a city-state became a principato ruled by a strong individual or powerful family.

10. During his pontificate, which lasted from 1294 to 1303, Pope Boniface VDI made it his mission to reassert the universal supremacy of the papacy. He challenged the autonomy of France and sought to establish temporal dominion over central Italy. In the end his ambitions were thwarted by the many enemies he made； they even held him prisoner for a few days. After the death of Boniface VIII, the fortunes of the papacy plummeted. His successor, Clement V who owed his election to Boniface VIITs major foe, Philip IV of France, moved the papal residence to Avignon, where it remained for over seven decades.

In 1308 Henry, count of Luxembourg, was elected German king and Holy Roman emperor. In 1310 he crossed the Alps into Italy, heading toward Rome for his formal coronation. His principal goal was to bring all of Italy under his rule and to revitalize the empire- He had some important initial successes, but by the time he entered Rome in May 1312 it was clear to him that he had two major forces of resistance to contend with. One was Robert of Anjou, king of Naples and Sicily, and the other was Florence (controlled by the anti-imperial Guelfs) and its allies in Tuscany and Romagna. Although he was able to subdue some of the hostile cities, he was stricken ill and died in 1313 in the course of his military campaigns, leaving Italy almost as fragmented as he first found it. The forces of empire had fared no better than the papacy in the effort to bring Italy under unified rule.

The Emperor Louis TV, known as the Bavarian, attempted to subject Italy to his rule in a campaign that lasted from 1327 to 1328 and ended in failure. Louis TV's rival and successor to the crown of Holy Roman emperor, Charles IV, led an army into Italy in 1354. The following year he received the crown of Lombardy and was formally crowned emperor in Rome, but when he left Italy, the peninsula was as divided and fragmented as it had been before.

The Great Schism" broke out in 1378, following the death of Pope Gregory XI. Urban VI was elected to succeed him in Rome, but within less than a year many cardinals had second thoughts and elected Clement VII, who established himself at Avignon. In subsequent years the situation became more confused, with as many as three rival claims to the papal throne. Stability was restored in 1417/ when the Council of Constance elected Martin V, who returned to Rome in 1421.

11. Antonio Labriolazs unfinished work "Da un secolo alPaltro: Considerazioni retrospettive e presagi” (From one century to the other: Retrospections and foreshadowings) appears in his Saggi intorno alla concezione materialistica della storia, ed. Luigi Dal Pane (Bologna: Cappelli, 1925), of which Gramsci had a copy. The relevant passage is on pp. 45-46； for a translation see Notebook 4/ §6o, n. 3.

12. On Duke Valentino (i.e., Cesare Borgia), see Notebook 5, §5, n. 2.

13. On Cola di Rienzo, see Notebook 3/ §78/ n. 9,

14. I.e., the poetic movement that blossomed in Tuscany during the latter part of the thirteenth century. The phrase "dolce stil novon (z/sweet new style") was coined by Dante； see Purgatorio, canto 24, line 57.

15. The "Sicilian school" of vernacular poetry had its roots in the court of the emperor Frederick II (1194-1250) and his son Manfred. It was not, however, limited to Sicily. Like Frederick himself, the "Sicilian school77 extended its influence to the north of the peninsula, at least as far as Tuscany and Romagna.

Dante writes about the spread of the vernacular from Fredericks court in De vulgari eloquentia (book 1, chap. 12):

For, truly, those illustrious heroes, the emperor Frederick and his honorably born son Manfred, displayed the nobility and rectitude of their minds, as long as Fortune allowed them to, and lived like men, disdaining the life of brutes. Therefore, those who were noble of heart and gifted by God always sought to remain close to the majesty of such great princes, so that in their time whatever the most excellent minds of Italy were able with great effort to produce first shone forth in the realm of these great sovereigns, and because Sicily was the royal seat, it came about that whatever our predecessors wrote in the vernacular was called Sicilian； we, too, are firmly attached to this appellation, and our descendants will not change it.

Pier delle Vigne (ca. 1190-ca. 1249), a man of humble origins, studied in Bologna before entering the service of Frederick IL He attained great distinction as Fredericks private secretary and chancellor. In 1231 he was responsible for drafting the statutes of the kingdom, Constitutiones regni utziusque Siciliae. He eventually fell from favor and died in a Tuscan prison； according to Dante [Inferno, canto 13, lines 52-78), he committed suicide. Pier delle Vigne's surviving writings consist of a substantial body of official letters he had written in Latin and a few poems in the vernacular.

Master Berardo, i.e.z Berardo Caracciolo (ca. 1230-93), born into a well-connected noble family in Naples, was a pontifical notary and diplomat who served under several different popes and wielded considerable influence in the Curia. Berardo also maintained friendly personal relations with a number of royal families. He is the author of a large body of pontifical letters and other official documents composed in medieval Latin； copies of them survive in numerous manuscripts.

16. Frederick ITs son, Heinz, also known as Enzo or Enzio of Hohenstaufen (1220-72), was himself a poet of the Sicilian school, but only a very few examples of his work survive. As king of Sardinia, he led his army in an attack on Bologna in 1249, when he was taken prisoner. He remained imprisoned in Bologna for the rest of his life.

17. See Guido De Ruggiero, /zErasmo e la Riforma” (Erasmus and the Reformation), La Nuova Italia i, no. 1 (January 20, 1930): 12-17. De Ruggiero's article consists of extracts from his book on the Renaissance, the Reformation, and the Counter-Reformation published the same year: Rinascimento, Riforma, Controriformaf 2 vols. (Bari: Laterza, 1930).

On Guido De Ruggiero, see Notebook 4/ §2/ n. 4.

18. Vittorio Rossi, Il Quattrocento, 2d ed. (Milan: Vallardi, 1931).

19. Giuseppe Toffanin, Che cosa fu Fumanesimo: Il Risorgimento della antichità classica nella coscienza degli italiani fra i tempi di Dante e la Riforma (What humanism was: The revival of classical antiquity in the consciousness of Italians between the times of Dante and the Reformation) (Florence: Sansoni, 1929). In a November 23/ 1921, letter, Gramsci asked Tatiana Schucht to order this book for him. His comments on the book in §160 of this notebook lead one to believe that he must have received it and read it.

Giuseppe Toffanin, a professor of literature at the University of Naples, was best known for his interpretation of the Renaissance as a cultural movement that—far from being secular and at odds with the spirit of Catholicism—was bound to culminate in. the revitalization of the Catholic Church that took place in. the Council of Trent. One of Toffanin^s major historical works has been translated into English: see History of Humanism (New York: Las Americas, 1954).

20. See Jacob Burckhardt, Die Kultur der Renaissance in Italien (i860), translated into English as The Civilization of the Renaissance in Italy, trans. S. G. C. Middlemore (New York: Penguin., 1990)； Georg Voigt, Die Wiederbelebung des classischen Alterhums oder das erste Jahrhundert des Humanismus, 2 vols. (Berlin, 1859)； and J. A. Symonds, Renaissance in Italy, 7 vols. (London: Murray, 1897-1900).

§124. Past and present. Certain intellectuals

1. See Notebook 2, §64.

On Raffaele Garofalo, see Notebook i, §126, n. 1.

2. See Raffaele Garofalo, “Le scienze giuridiche nel secolo XIX” (The juridical sciences in the nineteenth century), in the book on nineteenthcentury Italy edited by Jolanda De Blasi, Lltalia e gli italiani del secolo XIX (Florence: Le Moimier, 1930), pp. 407-30. Gramsci had a copy of this volume in prison； it consists of the texts of a series of lectures by prominent intellectuals held at the Lyceum of Florence between 1928 and 1929. The authors included in the volume are Antonio Baldini, Emilio Bodrero, Filippo Bottazzi, Filippo Crispolti, Silvio D'Amico, Jolanda De Blasi, Giuseppe De Robertis^ Alberto De Stefani, Giorgio Antonio Garbasso, Raffaele Garofalo, Domenico Guerri/ Arturo Marpicati, Ugo Ojetti, Ildebrando Pizzetti, Michele Scherillo, Arrigo Solmi, and Nicola Zingarelli. The editor of the volume, Jolanda De Blasi (1888-1964), was president of the Lyceum cultural center. In addition to a number of short stories and some novels, De Blasi wrote a biography of Lady Hamilton and produced Italian prose translations of the Iliad and the Odyssey. She also edited an anthology of literary works by Italian women writers, Le scrittrici italiane dalle origini al 1800 (1930).

In his contribution, “Le scienze giuridiche nel secolo XIX/〃 Garofalo wrote, among other things:

The second half of the last century led us to materialism in philosophy, to a contempt for hierarchy and for every form of authority in politics, to a shameful attitude toward constitutional law . . . and toward all other law!

Our age is witnessing the resurrection of ideals. Thanks to the revival of the worship of ideals, our Motherland is experiencing a marvelous resurgence. Without these ideals we would not have been able to escape the debasement of vile Bolshevism.

It is to the supreme credit of the man who governs us that he shone among the people that mysterious light that comes from on high, and even if that light is far away, it is nonetheless as beneficial as the sidereal glimmering over a dark and unfamiliar road, (p. 428)

Toward the end of his piece, Garofalo recalls that as far back as 1902 he had hoped for the advent of a one-man dictatorship； he then concludes with a paean of praise for Mussolini: "And history is there to show the miracles performed by an individual's work, to show that sometimes one man on his own. can instill new life in people that are half ruined and push them forward along the most difficult paths, because deep within them he makes shine the light of glory, the only thing that, disdainful of historical materialism, has been and will always be capable of stirring and inspiring an entire people!” (p. 430).

3. Gramsci is referring to a speech that Giovanni Gentile delivered in Palermo on March 31, 1924； the text of the speech was incorporated into Gentile's book on Fascism, Che cosa è il fascismo: Discorsi e polemiche (Florence: Vallecchi, 1925), pp. 41-63. In this speech, Gentile stated: "Every force is a moral force, and whatever mode of argument is used— whether it be a sermon or a cudgel—its efficacy cannot be other than that, in the final analysis, it elicits an inner response from a man and persuades him to agree” (pp. 50-51). This position was described at the time as "the philosophy of the cudgel/7 and Benedetto Croce attacked it in a note, "Fissazione filosofica" (Philosophical fixation) that was first published in La Critica 23, no. 4 (July 20, 1925): 252-56, and later included in Croce's book on culture and moral life, Cultura e vita morale, 2d ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1926), pp. 295-96. Gramsci, who had a copy of the second edition of Croce's Cultura e vita morale in prison, discusses this attack on. Gentile by Croce at greater length in Notebook 6/ §m.

On Giovanni Gentile, see Notebook i, §15, n. 1.

4. See Antonio Baldini, Carducci, Pascoli, D,ArLQunzio// in Jolanda De Blasi, edv Eltalia e gli italiani del secolo XIX (Florence: Le Monnier, 193。)，PP- 231-54. The final section of Baldini's contribution is devoted to a consideration of the political views of Carducci and Pascoli from the viewpoint of Fascist ideology.

Antonio Baldini (1889-1962) was the author of a number of books of essays, memoirs, and literary criticism. Early in his career, he belonged to the circle of critics associated with the journal La Ronda. In. 1931 he became editor of Nuova Antologia.

5. On Raffaele Garofalo's attempt to pass legislation that would have raised ground rents, see Notebook 2, §5, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

Gramsci mentions the issue concerning the segregation of prisoners in cells in a January 26/1929/ letter to his brother Carlo: "I must point out to you that next July the new penal code [written by the Fascist minister of justice, Alfredo Rocco] will go into effect and so also the new prison regulations, which probably will change the prisoners' circumstances considerably. ...Certain allusions made in the senate, especially by Senator Garofalo in 工929, according to which the "punitive' nature of prison ought not to be attenuated (even though Garofalo's thesis that referred in particular to segregation in cells was rejected by the government) might indicate the possibility of restrictive measures/7

6. The speech by Giovanni Gentile to which Gramsci refers is entitled “Lavoro e cultura77 (Work and culture) and was delivered at the inauguration of the Scuola di Cultura Sociale (School of Social Culture) in Rome on January 15/ 1922. The text of the speech was later incorporated in Gentile怎 book. Fascismo e cultura (Milan: Treves, 1928), pp. 16-37. Gramsci had a copy of this book in prison.

§125. Types of periodicals. Critical- bibliographical surveys

i. Gramsci had a copy of Adolfo Omodeo?s basic history, intended for the schools, on the history of religion from Greek antiquity to Christianity, Religione e civiltà: Dalla Grecia antica al cristianesimo (Messina: Principato^ 1924)； he had asked for a copy of this book in a June 3, 1929, letter to Tatiana Schucht. Four years later, in a May 8, 1933, letter to Tatiana Schucht, he asked for another book by Omodeo, this one a little book on Jesus, Gesù il Nazoieo (Venice: La Nuova Italia, 1927), which he received shortly before leaving the prison at Turi di Bari for the clinic at Formia. Most probably, Gramsci had been familiar, even prior to his arrest, with some of Omodeozs work on the history of Christianity； in any case, he certainly knew of those writings by Omodeo (other than the ones he owned) that were reviewed or discussed in the publications he received in prison. For example, Omodeo's work is discussed in Benedetto Croce's essay "Intorno alle condizioni presenti della storiografia in Italia, in： La storiografia della filosofia e della religione” (On the present state of historiography in Italy. Part 3: Philosophical and religious historiography) in La Critica 27/ no. 3 (May 2□/ 1929): 161-76. This essay was reprinted in the appendix of Croce's history of nineteenth-century Italian historiography, Storia della storiografia italiana del secolo decimonono/ 2d ed. (Bari: Laterza, 1930), of which Gramsci also had a copy.

On Adolfo Omodeo, who in addition to his studies on the history of religion also produced important works on nineteenth-century Italian history, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 7.

Paul-Louis Couchoud was the general editor of two book series on religion, //Christianisme,/ (mentioned by Gramsci in §1 of this notebook) and 〃Judaism。” both published by Rieder of Paris.

2. See Alessandro Chiappelli, culto di Maria e gli errori della recente critica storica” (The cult of Mary and the errors of recent historical criticism), Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1385 (December i, 1929): 273-88； and Arthur Drews, Die Marienmythe (Jena: E. Diederichs, 1928).

Alessandro Chiappelli (1857-1931) wrote numerous books on a very wide range of subjects, including ancient and modern philosophy, the history of religion； and Renaissance art. He also produced a substantial body of literary criticism.

3. This article by Luigi Salvatorelli is cited in Alessandro Chiappelli's culto di Maria,p. 279 n. 2.

On Luigi Salvatorelli, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 27.

§126. Past and present. The intellectuals: the decline of Mario Missiroli

1. Spectator (pseudonym of Mario Missiroli), "Clemexiceau“ Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1386 (December i6z 1929): 478-99. Gramsci also discusses the contents o£ this article in Notebook 4, §44.

On Mario Missiroli, see Notebook i, §43/ n. 12.

2. See Mario Missiroli, "Sorel e ClemenceauLItalia Letteraria i, no. 37 (December 15, 1929), On this article, see also Notebook 4, §44.

§127. Machiavelli

I. M. Azzalini, 〃La politica, scienza ed arte di stato” (The politics, science, and art of state), in the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section. of Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1386 (December 16,工929): 540-43. As is quite evident, the parenthetical asides within. the passages quoted from Azzalini's short article are Gramsci's.

2. Marsilius of Padua (ca. 1280-ca. 1343), a theologian and political philosopher, is the author of Defensor pads (Defender of the peace), which he completed in Paris in. 1324； it was printed for the first time in Basel in 1522. In.it he set forth a secular concept of the state, arguing that the state has a natural, as opposed to a divine, basis； thus, in his view, the church has no legitimate coercive power and should in fact be subordinate to the state in the secular sphere. The primary responsibility of the state, according to Marsilius, is to maintain its own unity and to preserve law and peaceful coexistence. Furthermore/ Marsilius maintained that the supreme authority in. the church was the general council/ which represented all the faithful and not just the ecclesiastical hierarchy. When his views became known, Marsilius took refuge in the court of King Louis IV of Bavaria to escape papal persecution. He accompanied Louis the Bavarian, during his Italian expedition of 1327-28, which ended in failure, Marsilius, who in the meantime had been excommunicated for heresy, returned with Louis IV to Germany, where he spent the rest of his years. For a translation of Defensor pacisf see Marsilius of Padua: The Defender of Peace, trans. Alan Gewirth, vol. 2 (New York: Columbia University Press, 1956).

3. “Public law" refers to the ensemble of laws that regulate the organization and activities of the state and of governmental entities in. their relations with private citizens and with each other. As is clear from the context, Azzalini uses "public ]aw〃 as a term that is virtually equivalent to ''constitutional law/7

4. See Notebook 5, §123/ n. 9.

5. See, for example, Notebook 5, §123.

6. Ulpian (d. 228) was a famous Roman. jurist under the emperor Caracalla. Extracts from his voluminous legal commentaries are reproduced in and constitute a large portion of the Digest, i.& the second part of the Corpus juris" compiled by the Roman emperor at Constantinople/ Justinian (527-565).

7. For an. English translation from the Sanskrit of Kamandaki's classical verse work on Indic policy, see Kamandakiya Nitisara； or, The Elements of Polity, ed. Manmatha Nath Dutt (Varanasi: Chowkhamba Sanskrit Series Office, 1979).

See Petrarchs letter (in Latin) to Francesco da Carrara on the duties of the prince； it is collected in the volume of epistles by the poet entitled Seniles (book 14, epistle 1). In. Gramsci's time, a separate edition. of this letter by Petrarch was available in. Italian. translation: Lettera di Francesco Petrarca al magnifico Francesco da Carrara, signore di Padova: Sui doveri del principe, trans. Giuseppe Fracassetti (Padua: Società Cooperativa Tipografica, 1922). For an English translation, see Petrarch, Letters of Old Age, trans. Aldo Bernardo, Saul Levin, and Reta Bernardo, 2 vols. (Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press, 1992).

On Giovanni Boterò and his work Della ragion di stato (1589), see Notebook 3, §141, n. 2.

8. On Tommaso Tittoni, see Notebook i, §6, n. 1.

9. Gramsci's source of the extracts he quotes from Henri Bergson's devolution créatnce (1907) is a short article by L. Gessi, "L'arte come conoscenza degli individuali” (Art as knowledge of individuals)z in the "Notizie e commenti” (News and comments) section of Nuova Antologia 64, no. 1384 (November 16, 1929): 536-40； see, especially, p. 537. My source for the quotations was Creative Evolution, trans. Arthur Mitchell (New York: Modern Library, 1944).

§128. Lorianism. Domenico Giuliotti

1. See Notebook 1, §25, and n. 5 in the accompanying Notes to the Text.

2. Gramsci extracted the couple of sentences quoted here from Domenico Giuliottizs introduction to his book Profili di Santi (Profiles of saints) from the version that was published with the title "Santi ed eroi?, (Saints and heroes) in LItalia Letteraria 1, no. 37 (December 15, 1929).

On Giovanni Giuliotti, see Notebook iz §72, n. 1.

§129. Past and present The Catholics and the state

i. The unsigned article (in fact written by the Jesuit priest Enrico Rosa), "Tra 'ratifiche' e 'rettifiche': La parola del Papa” (Between 'ratifications' and 'rectifications': The pope's word), appeared in La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (July 20, 1929): 97-105. It intervened in a controversy that was going on at the time concerning the interpretation of certain parts of the Lateran Pacts. Even before the treaty was formally ratified and signed on June 7, 1929, it was evident that Mussolini and the Vatican had divergent interpretations of the text of the concordat. In his article, Enrico Rosa recalled that Napoleon had violated a concordat and that his military adventunsm ended with his exile on the island of St. Helena. The article was considered an insult and provocation by the Fascist authorities, and they ordered the confiscation of the issue of La Civiltà Cattolica in which it was published.

Z/Tra 'ratifiche' e 'rettifiche' 〃 also contains some remarks concerning the national elections that were held on March 24, 1929, and resulted in a great victory for Mussolini. Specifically, it states: 〃It is obvious that the kinds of results achieved [in the elections], which are quite unusual in the political life of nations, were due for the most part to the universal popularity of the so-called conciliation. It is likewise generally agreed, however, that it is astonishing that the crown said nothing about this in the solemn speech delivered by the king himself at the inauguration of the new legislature, the very same legislature that was to approve the Lateran Accords and implement them."

2. La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (August 3, 1929), published the text of the decree issued by the prefect of Rome on July 23, 1929, ordering the confiscation. of the previous issue of the journal "because of the generally and specifically anti-Italian and anti-Fascist content of the leading article, entitled Tra ratifiche e rettifiche/ "

§130. Encyclopedic notions

i. "Pubblico ufficiale^ describes someone employed in the legislative, judicial, or administrative apparatus. The function of an ''ufficiale dello stato civile" is roughly equivalent to that of a county recorder.

§131. Types of periodicals. A regular column on grammar and linguistics

1. On Emile Littré and Ferdinand Brunot, see Notebook 3, §76, n. 8.

2. See Edmondo De Amicis's book on language, Uidioma gentile (Milan: Treves, 1905 )—of which Gramsci owned a copy in prison—and his collection of occasional pieces, Pagine sparse (Milan: Lombarda, 1874.

On Edmondo De Amicis, see Notebook i, §50, n. 3.

3. On Alfredo Panzini, see Notebook iz §13, n. 1； and on Umberto Fracchia怎 periodical La Fiera Letteranaf see Notebook 1, §102, n. 1.

§132. Past and present

i. See "Cose romane/z (Roman affairs) in the Cronaca contempo-ranea,z (Current events) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (July 20, 1929): 170-72.

Cesare Maria De Vecchi (1884-1959) joined the Fascist movement in Turin in 1919 and quickly emerged as one its most prominent figures. A major and vocal representative of the conservative Catholic and monarchist current within the Fascist Party, De Vecchi was elected to parliament in 1921, and in the following year he played a leading role in the march on Rome. In 1923 he was named governor of Somalia, a post he held for five years, during which he engaged in a number of not very successful military adventures that were meant to reinforce and expand Italy怎 imperial presence in Africa. He was appointed ambassador of Italy to the Vatican after the signing of the Lateran Pacts. Between 1935 and 1936/ De Vecchi served as minister of education； later he became governor of the Dodecanese Islands. He was also a member of the Fascist Grand Council.

§133. Catholic Action. The "Workers' Retreats"

1. "Come il popolo torna a Dio: Lopera dei 'Ritiri Operai7 〃 (How the people turn to god: The "Workers，RetreatsOrganization), in thez/Rivista della stampa” (Review of the press) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (July 20, 1929):工50-58.

2. The edition of Ignatius Loyola怎 Esercizi spirituali (Florence: Libreria Editrice Fiorentina, 1928) that also contains the text of Ignatius Loyola's Autobiography and an introductory essay by Giovanni Papini is mentioned in a different part (p. 149) of the Z/Rivista della stampa" section of the same issue of La Civiltà Cattolica in which the cited article on the Workers' Retreats is published. For English translations of Ignatius Loyola's works, see The Spiritual Exercises of St. Ignatius, trans. Anthony Mottola (Garden City, N.Y.: Image Books, 1964), and The Autobiography of St. Ignatius Loyola, trans. Joseph F. CXCallaghan (New York: Fordham University Press, 1992).

3. The reference to the article 'Ritiri Operai' in Italia” (The，Workers， Retreats7 in Italy) is extracted from "Come il popolo torna a Dio."

4. The book Come il popolo ritorna a Dio, 1909-1929: Lopera dei Ritiri e le Leghe di Perseveranza in Roma in venti anni di vita (How the people are returning to God, 1909-1929: The Retreats Organization and the Leagues of Perseverance in Rome during their twenty years of existence), published by the Workers7 Retreats Organization of Rome in 1929, is the main topic of the article "Come il popolo toma a Dio.〃

§134. Religious movements

i. The reflections in this note may have been triggered by an unsigned article, "Pace per mezzo delle chiese?” (Peace through the churches?), in La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (July 20,1929): 106-15. On the same topic, see also Notebook 5, §17.

§135. The Italian Risorgimento. Lamennais

1. On Hughes-Félicité-Robert de Lamennais, see Notebook 1, §71, n. 1.

2. “Il padre Roothaan e il La Mennais// La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (August 3, 1929): 221-18.

3. Johann Philipp Roothaan (1785-1853), who was born in Amsterdam, joined the Society of Jesus in 1804, when it was still suppressed virtually everywhere except in Russia. Pope Pius VII restored the order in 1814； Russia, on the other hand, banned it within its borders in 1820, compelling Roothaan to move to Switzerland. In 1823 he was sent to Turin to serve as rector of a newly founded college. Roothaan became the twenty-first superior general of the Jesuits in 1829. He revitalized the order, strengthening its adherence to the prmciples of its founder, Ignatius Loyola, and raising the level of intellectual preparation of its members. The number of Jesuits doubled under his leadership； the society had five thousand members at the time of his death.

4. Gramsci was certainly aware of at least two such articles (both unsigned): 〃I1 P. Giovanni Roothaan e gli studi sacri della prima metà del secolo XIX〃 (Father John Roothaan and theological studies during the first half of the nineteenth century). La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (July 20, 1929): 126-34； and 〃La fortuna del La Mennais e le prime manifestazioni di Azione Cattolica in Italia” (The fortunes of Lamennais and the earliest manifestations of the presence of Catholic Action in Italy), La Civiltà Cattolica 81 (October 4/ 1930): 3-19. The second of these two articles is discussed in Notebook 6/ §i88? and Notebook 7, §98.

§ 136. Encyclopedic notions

1. All three words mean "Renaissance" and literally 〃:rebirth." As is clear from the rest of the note, Gramsci is interested in the recurrent use of the prefix (in. English, particularly in words employed to describe the Risorgimento, which literally means revival, rebirth, or reawakening.

2. The phrases Hriscossa nazionale" and ''riscatto nazionale" have often been used in association with. the Italian Risorgimento. These words have acquired many nuances that are difficult to convey through a literal rendering into English. ''Riscossa nazionale/f may be translated as "national reawakening〃 or "recovery" but "riscossa" also means, especially in this context, “revolt" or "insurrection." Furthermore, the adjective “riscosso" means 〃fieed〃 or "liberated." aRiscatto nazionale" is best translated, perhaps, as "national redemption."

3. "Ripiesa" in this context, means "revival" or "renewal."

4. Le., “bom" and "awakened" (or "roused")/ respectively.

5. Le.z "comes to〃 or ^recovers consciousness”； also "frees itself/'

§137. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists. The case of Abbé Tunnel of Rennes

i. See Enrico Rosa SJV EEnciclica MPascendo eil modernismo: Studi e commenti, 2d ed. (Rome: Editrice Civiltà Cattolica, 1909), of which Gramsci had copy in prison. The case of Abbé lurmel is discussed on pp. 300-321.

2. Gramsci came across the reference to Louis Saltet's expose of the Tunnel case in Bulletin de Littératme Ecclésiastique in an unsigned article, “La catastrofe del caso Turmel e i metodi del modernismo critico77 (The catastrophe of the Turmel case and the methods of critical modernism), in La Civiltà Cattolica 81 (December 6, 1930): 434-45 (see especially p. 437). Gramsci deals with this article in detail in Notebook 6, §195, where he also lists the fifteen different pseudonyms used by Abbé Turmel.

§138. Emperor worship

1. Giuseppe Messina's "L'apoteosi delPuomo vivente e il cristianesimo” (Christianity and the apotheosis of a living man) was published in two parts in La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (August 17, 1929): 295-310, and (September 21, 1929): 509-22.

2. Le., Alexander the Great.

3. Messina, "L'apoteosi delPuomo vivente/7 part i, p. 297.

§139. Encyclopedic notions

1. See Notebook 5, §136.

2. Le., ^Restoration/'

3. The Council of Trent was convened by Pope Paul III in 1545 and completed its work in 1563.

§140. Americanism

1. Giuseppe Attilio Fanelli's book LArtigianato: Sintesi di un'economia corporativa (Rome: spes, 1929) sets forth the notion that the system of small industries as operated by the Italian artisan class embodied the basic principles of corporative economics advocated by Fascist ideologues.

2. See the unsigned review-article "Problemi sociali” (Social problems), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (August 17/ 1929): 328-35.

3. Quoted in ibid., p. 329, The parenthesis is Gramsci's.

4. Quoted in ibid., p. 330.

5. Ludovico Ariosto (1474-1533} published the first version of his chivalric romance Orlando Furioso, in forty cantos, in 1516, and the final version, comprising forty-six cantos, in 1532. Torquato Tasso (1544-95), who was strongly influenced by Ariosto's work, composed La Gerusalemme liberata, a heroic poem in twenty cantos on the First Crusade, between 1565 and 1575. The two poems share many technical characteristics, and both were immensely popular.

6. Ludovico Muratori (1672-1750) studied at Modena, where he acquired a profound appreciation of the historical-critical methods of the French Maurists, His research focused primarily on the Middle Ages, and early in his career, when he worked at the Ambrosiana library in Milan, Muratori started publishing selections of texts he had discovered among the manuscripts of the library. His next major project was a collection (accompanied by a basic critical apparatus) of all the chronicles, diaries, and other documents that would enable a reconstruction of Italian history from 500 to 1500. The outcome was a twenty-eight volume work entitled Rerum italicarum sciiptoies (1723-50). At the same time. Muratori was compiling another very important work, a series of studies on the customs and institutions of the Italian Middle Ages, which he published in six volumes under the general title Antiquitates italicae medii aevi (1738-42). For less specialized or more general readers he composed the Annali d'Italia, a twelve-volume work published between 1744 and 1749 in which he attempted to provide a comprehensive and unified history of the Italian peninsula. Muratori was also keenly interested in the moral and cultural issues of his own time, and some of his other writings constitute important critical interventions on those issues. In. some of these writings, and particularly in. Della regolata devozione (On well-ordered devotion), he fought against superstition and sought to promote enlightened moral reform: this work was the main reason that he was accused of Jansenism and incurred the ire of the Jesuits.

Girolamo Tiraboschi (1731-94), a Jesuit, worked for many years in the Este archives in Modena. He produced a number of works pertaining to the history of Modena that were based on his archival researches. Tiraboschizs major work, for which he is primarily remembered, was a comprehensive and extremely erudite history of the literature of the Italian peninsula from antiquity through the seventeenth century, which he started in 1772 and completed a decade later.

Cesare Baronio (1538-1607) had a very successful ecclesiastical career. A follower of Saint Philip Neri he was made cardinal by Pope Clement VII in 1596 and the following year became the Vatican librarian. Baronio^s reputation as a historian. stems from his twelve-volume Annales ecclesiastici, a detailed account of the history of the church from its beginning up to 1198, which is based on an impressive compilation and analysis of archival documentary materials, many of them previously unknown or ignored.

§141. Catholic integralists, Jesuits, modernists

1. “La lunga crisi deìl'Action Fran^aise e sue cause” (The long crisis of Action Fran^aise and its causes). La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (September 7/ 工"9): 423-36

2. The book by the bishop of Agen? Monsignor Sagot du Vauroux, La trop longue crise de FAction Fran^aise (Paris: Bloud, 1929), which consists of an unqualified attack on the French ultraconservative movement, is treated most favorably and at considerable length in "La lunga crisi déil,Action Fran^aise e sue cause.z/

3. "La lunga crisi déììfAction FranQaise/f p. 426.

4. Ibid., p. 423.

5. On Charles Maurras and the Action Fran^aise movement, see Notebook i, §14, n. 1.

6. “La lunga crisi deil'Action Fr血即se,〃 p, 427.

On the Catholic integralists, see Notebook 5/ §iz n. 1.

7. See Notebook 5, §14, and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. is, on Boulin's anti-Jesuit publications,

8. Mariano Rampolla del Tindaro (1843-1913), born in Sicily and ordained priest in 1856, had already accumulated a great deal of experience in the diplomatic affairs of the church by the time Pope Leo XIII made him cardinal and secretary of state in 1887. Rampolla pursued some policies that incurred the wrath of the ultraconservative and intransigent currents within Catholicism. In particular, in the early 1890s he attempted to prepare the ground for a rapprochement between the Holy See and the Italian state by opening indirect channels of communication with the government of Prime Minister Rudin» an effort that proved fruitless. What angered the integralists even more, however, was Rampollai execution of Leo XIIFs policy toward France, a policy that normalized relations between the Holy See and the republic, encouraged the participation of Catholics in the political life of the nation, and effectively marginalized the monarchists while distancing the church from the Action Fran^aise movement and other ultraconservative currents. Furthermore, Austria regarded the Vatican's normalization of relations with France as detrimental not only to its own interests but to the Triple Alliance as a whole:

i.e.z to Italy and Germany as well. For this reason, during the conclave of 1903, when Rampolla was most likely to have been chosen to succeed Leo XIII, Austria took measures to block his election to the papacy.

9. On Leo XIIFs policy of lalliement, see also Gramsci's comments in Notebook 5, §18/ and the corresponding Notes to the Text, especially n. 3.

10. Giuseppe Zanardelli (1826-1903), who had held ministerial positions in several cabinets, was prime minister from 1901 to 1903.

11. See Francesco Salata^ history of the diplomatic relations pertaining to the question of the status of Rome from the time of Cavour to the period of Italy's membership in the Triple Alliance, Per la storia diplomatica della questione romana, vol. i, Da Cavour alla Triplice Alleanza (Milan: Treves, 1929), especially pp. 176-89/ 227-34, and 251-52. Gramsci had a copy of this volume in prison.

12. "La lunga crisi déìlfAction Fsngaise," pp. 427-28. The parenthesis is Gramsci's.

13. On Sillon, see Notebook 5, §1/ n. 5.

14. On Jacques Bainville, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 36.

15. “La lunga crisi àtW!Action Fian^aise/1 p. 428..

16. The parenthetical interpolation is Gramsci's. For additional remarks 011 the conservative Catholic weekly Bede e Ragione (published in Florence)—which Gramsci also mentions in Notebook 5, §11一see Notebook §107.

17. "La lunga crisi dell'Action Fran^aise/f pp. 428-29.

18. Gramsci had a copy of a book by the French Catholic conservative Henri Massis, Defense de VOccident (Paris: Pion, 1927), and he commented on it at some length in one of his letters； see Notebook 5, §89, n.

4. See also Gramsci's comments on Henri Massis in Notebook 6/ §195.

19，On Enrico Rosa's response to the open letter addressed to him by Ugo Ojetti, see Notebook i, §24/ and especially Notebook 5/ §66, and n.i in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

§142. Philosophical novels, utopias, etc.

1. The Jesuits, the last of the major Catholic religious orders to arrive in South America, received permission from King Philip m of Spain to set up missions in Paraguay in 1608. They remained in the country for just over a hundred and fifty years, during which they established thirty missions and developed an efficient, centralized system for administering them. The missions run by the Jesuits became virtually self-contained, planned communities； everything was regulated and thoroughly organized: housing, education, working hours, recreation. From an economic standpoint, at least, the missions (or reductions, as they were called) proved tremendously successful. Their economic success and internal social cohesion also made them relatively autonomous entities, thus rendering them suspect in the eyes of the Spanish colonial authorities. The Jesuits were expelled from Paraguay by order of King Charles III in 1767.

2. In his book II cristianesimo felice della Compagnia di Gesù nel Paraguai, 2 vols. (Venice: G. Pasquali, 1743-49), Lodovico Antonio Muratori documents what he terms the "happy Christianity" practiced in. the Jesuit missions in Paraguay. In all likelihood, Gramsci came across a reference to this work in a short article, martiri delFAmerica meridionale^ (The martyrs in South America), in the "Rassegna della stampa77 (Review of the press) section of La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (September 7, 工929): 43i.

On Lodovico Antonio Muratori, see Notebook 5, §140, n. 6.

3. See Pietro Colletta, Storia del reame di Napoli dal 1734 fino al 182^ voi. i (Capolago: Tipografia Elvetica, 1834), pp. 224-28. Gramsci borrowed this book from the prison library during his period of incarceration in Milan, and he described it as "excellent" in an April 4, 1927； letter to Tatiana Schucht. For an English translation, see History of the Kingdom of Naples: 1734-1825, 2 vols., trans. Susan Horner (Edinburgh: T. Constable, 1858).

In late 1789 the Bourbon king of Naples Ferdinand I established a planned community on the hill of San Leucio near Caserta. The "Codice” or set of organizational rules that was drafted for the community resembled, in many respects, the blueprint for a utopian community. One writer described the planned community as "a socialist colony in Bourbon kingdom/7 In his history of Naples, Colletta states that the "colony" was a great success: its silk products were of the highest quality, and its initial population of just over two hundred quadrupled in forty years.

On Pietro Colletta, see Notebook 4, §62, n. 1.

§143. The international function of Italian intellectuals

1. 〃La politica religiosa di Costantino Magno77 (The religious policy of Constantine the Great), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (September 7, 1929): 412-22.

2. Jules Maurice's Constantin. le Grand: L'origine de la civilisation chrétienne was published by Editions spes of Paris in 1924.

3. Luigi Salvatorelli^ Costantino il Grande (Rome: Formiggini, 1928) was published as volume 103 in the series "Profili” (Profiles). Salvatorelli^ book is cited in "La politica religiosa di Costantino Magno/7 p. 413 n. 2.

On Luigi Salvatorelli, see Notebook 1, §44, n. 27.

§144. Encyclopedic notions

i. On Charles Maurras, see Notebook 1, §14/ n. 1.

§145. Past and present. Primitive and nonprimitive Christianity

1.   novelli B.B. martiri inglesi difensori del primato romano” (The newly beatified English martyrs, defenders of the primacy of Rome), La Civiltà Cattolica 80 (December 21, 1929): 483-94.

2.   novelli B.B. martiri inglesi,p. 485. The emphasis is Gramsci's.

3. Ibid., p. 486. The emphasis is Gramsci's.

§146. Political-military leadership in the war 0/1914

i. Gramsci had a copy (which however is not preserved with his other books) of the Italian translation of a novel by Petr Nikolaevich Krassnoff (more commonly transliterated as Krasnov): DalPaquila imperiale alla bandiera rossa (Florence: Salani, 1929). The novel was also translated into English； see P. N. Krassnoff, From the Two-Headed Eagle to the Red Flag: 1894-1924 4 vols., trans. Eric Law-Gisiko, et aL (Germany: Olga Diakow, 1923).

The prison authorities initially prohibited Gramsci from reading Krassnoff's novel. On August 25,1930, Gramsci wrote to his brother Carlo instructing him to file a petition with the appropriate authorities to allow Gramsci to receive a number of books that had been denied him. Among the books listed by Gramsci in the letter to Carlo is the one by Krassnoff, which he describes as "a novel by the former Cossack general Krassnoff, now a Czarist émigré in Berlin； it is published by Salani side by side with the novels of Carolina Invernizio.^ The letter was withheld by the prison warden at Turi and never reached Carlo. Consequently, in September 1930 Gramsci sent a petition directly to Mussolini. Gramsci's draft of the petition is in the manuscript of Notebook 2； see the Description of the Manuscript, 1:526-27. His petition was granted, and he received the disputed books, as he himself confirmed in a December 1, 1930, letter to Tatiana Schucht.

2. The views of the German general and former head of the Reichswehr, Hans von Seeckt (1866-1936), are mentioned in an article (which has three asterisks in place of the author^ name), "Della guerra e della pace” (On war and peace), in Nuova Antologia 66, no. 1426 (August 16,1931): 409-25； see especially p, 420.

§147. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals

1. Gioacchino Volpe's history of the Middle Ages, Il Medio Evo, was published by Vallecchi in Florence in 1926.

On Gioacchino Volpe, see Notebook 2, §ioo, n. 3.

2. Riccardo Bacchelli, "Le molte vite” (Multiple lives), La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 27 (July i, 1928). The parenthetical exclamations and question mark are obviously Gramsci's.

On Riccardo Bacchelli, see Notebook i? §32, n. 9.

§148. Past and present. Inquiries on youth

I. La Fiera Letteraria conducted an "inquiry" in which it asked a number of intellectuals for their views on contemporary youth. The responses, published in eight separate issues, always under the same title, 〃La nostra inchiesta sulla nuova generazione” (Our inquiry on the new generation), appeared as follows: responses by Alessandro Chiappelli, Ferdinando Pasini, and Alfredo Panzini in 4/ no. 49 (December 1, 1928)7 responses by Antonino Anile, Agostino Lanzillo, Giuseppe Lombardo Radice, Francesco Orestanoz and Luigi Tonelli in 4, no. 50 (December 9, 1928)； responses by Corrado Barbagallo, Emilio Bodrero, Giuseppe Maggiore, and Giovanni Vidari in 4, no. 51 (December 16/ 1928)； responses by Balbino Giuliano and Nicola Zingarelli in 4, no. 52 (December 23, 1928)； responses by Vincenzo Arangio Ruiz, Bindo Chiurlo, and Bernardino Varisco in. 4, supp. to no. 52 (December 30,1928)； response by Francesco Biondolillo in > no. 1 (January 6, 1929； responses by Nicola Festa, Dino Provenzal in 5, no. 2 (January 13, 1929)； and responses by Mario Attilio Levi, Ettore Allodoli, and Cesare Cattaneo in 5, no. 4 (January 27, 1929). An editorial article summarizing and commenting on the results of the inquiry, 〃 Ad inchiesta finita: La gioventù di oggi” (Conclusion of an inquiry: Today's youth), was published in La Fiera Letteraria 5, no. 7 (February 17/ 1929).

In the two passages quoted in this note, the emphases are Gramsci's.

2. Agostino Lanzillo (1886-1952) became active in politics as a revolutionary syndicalist and shared some of the views of Georges Sorel, with whom he had personal contact. He vigorously advocated Italy's intervention in the First World War, at the end of which he joined and played an active role in the earliest Fascist formations. When the Fascists came into power, Lanzillo expressed some important disagreements with official economic policy. Excluded from the inner circles of power, he pursued an academic career as an economist and in 1935 became rector of the Istituto Superiore di Economia e Commercio in Venice,

3. On Giuseppe Lombardo.Radice, see Notebook if §123^ n. 2.

§149. Past and present. Education

1. See three articles by Mario Missiroli that appeared in consecutive issues of the journal/zGli studi classici” (Classical studies), Italia Letteraria i, no. 31 (November 3, 1929)； Z/Lo studio del latinoz, (The study of Latin), Italia Letteraria i, no. 32 (November 10, 1929)； and "Abbasso 1/estetica” (Down with aesthetics), Italia Letteraria i, no. 33 (November 17, 1929).

On. Mario Missiroli, see Notebook i} §43, n. 12.

2. On the reform of the national educational system masterminded by Giovanni Gentile (and commonly referred to as the "riforma Gentilez,), see, inter alia, Notebook 4, §50, nn. 1 and 2, and Notebook 4, §53, n. 6.

3. The parenthesis is Gramsci's.

4. Giuseppe Modugno?s response to Mario Missirolizs articles appeared under the title "Studi classici" {Classical studies) in LItalia Letteraria 2/ no. 8 (February 23/ 1930).

§150. The cosmopolitan function of Italian intellectuals. Risorgimento

1. On Vincenzo Gioberti； see Notebook, §46/ n. 1.

2. Gramsci is alluding to Francesco De Sanctis's portrayal of Italians as "Guicciardinian. men〃 whose individualism rendered them incapable of forming a society and a nation. See De Sanctis's essay "L'uomo del Guicciardini” (The Guicciardinian man) in his Saggi critici, ed. P. Arcari (Milan: Treves, 1924), 3:28-49. This three-volume edition of De Sanctis怎 critical essays was among the works Gramsci had in prison.

3. See Gramsci^ comparisons between the Moderate Party and the Action Party in., among other places, Notebook i, §43 and §44.

§151. Linguistics

1. “La lingua nei tempi di Dante e Vinterpretazione della poesia” (The language in Dante's times and the interpretation of poetry), Giuseppe S. Gargàno's review of Enrico Sicardi's book on the Italian language in Dante, La lingua italiana in Dante (Rome: Casa Editrice Optima, 1929), appeared in. Il Marzocco 34, no. 15 (April 14, 1929). Gramsci also discusses Sicardi怎 book and Gargànoys review in Notebook 4, §82.

2. See Karl Vossler, Positivismus und Idealismus in der Spachwissenschaft (Heidelberg: C. Winter, 1904). Gramsci most probably read the Italian version of this work by Vossler—Positivismo e idealismo nella scienza del linguaggio, trans. V. Gnoli (Bari: Laterza, 1908)—when he was studying linguistics at the University of Turin. From Vossler?s /z aesthetic analysis" of La Fontaine's fable Le corbeau et le renard (on pp. 224-37 of the Italian edition of his work), Gramsci is specifically recalling the following passage (p. 228 of the Italian edition, from which this is translated): 〃 'Tenait en son bee un fromage': others would have said zun morceau de fiomage.1 But what matters here is only quality. The fox wants it precisely because it is cheese. Furthermore/ others, in place of son bee, would have said dans le bee. But by attaching bee to the possessive pronoun (which is quite unusual in French) the author evokes an image of calm and complete possession so that the subsequent loss of the cheese will appear all the more painful." Gramsci is suggesting that Vossler failed to consider that in seventeenth-century French the use of the possessive pronoun was not "quite unusual. 〃

§152. Utopias, philosophical novels, etc.

i. Adolfo Faggi, Erewhon/f II Marzocco 34/ no. 9 (March 3, 1929).

§153. Popular literature

i. This note may have been prompted by Giuseppe Gargàno's article vario atteggiarsi di un poeta dialettale: Ferdinando Russo” (The various masks of a dialect poet: Ferdinando Russo), Il Marzocco 34, no. 9 (March 3/ 工929).

Ferdinando Russo (1866-1927) a Neapolitan fiction writer, journalist, and playwright, is best remembered for his poetry, in which he displayed the richness of expression of the Neapolitan dialect and conveyed vivid images of life in his native city.

§154. Father Bresciani's progeny. Cardarelli and La Ronda

1. See Luigi Russo's short article "Parere su De Sanctis,, (An opinion on De Sanctis) in the z/Commenti e schermaglie” (Comments and debates) section of La Nuova Italia i, no. 10 (October 20, 1930): 432-33.

Vincenzo Cardarelli (1887-1959), a poet, was one of the founders of the literary journal La Ronda, in 1919. Advocating a return to the sobriety and austerity of the classical tradition, he was severely critical of writers he regarded as sentimental and of many important innovative authors of his time, including Gabriele D'Annunzio, Giuseppe Ungaretti, and the futurists. He also expressed negative critical views of De Sanctis and those inspired by him, such as the circle associated with La Voce.

On Luigi Russo, see Notebook 1, §35, n. 2.

2. Vito Fornari(i82i-i 900), a Catholic priest and writer, was a purist and an advocate of classical propriety. He attained prominence during the post-1848 period of reaction. His writings include I/arte del dire (1857), in which he expounded an orthodox, rigidly classical theory of rhetoric and poetics, and a three-volume workDella vita di Gesù Cristo (1869-93)―on the universal and transhistorical significance of Christ's presence in the world.

On Francesco De Sanctis, see Notebook iz §96, n. 3.

3. On the Crusca Academy and its dictionary, see Gramsci's comment in Notebook 3, §145, and the corresponding Notes to the Text.

4. There is no evidence that Gramsci read Lorenzo Montano's booklet Il perdigiorno (The idler), but he certainly read Montano's preface to it, which was published under the title "Agli amici della Ronda” (To My Friends of La Ronda) in La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 28 (July 1,1928). Gramsci also must have read the comments on the book made by Giovanni Titta Rosa in his article "Gigante di letture. VH: Montano" (Days of reading. VII: Montano), La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 44 (October 28, 1928).

Lorenzo Montano was the pseudonym used by Danilo Lebrecht (1893-1958), a poet, prose writer, and scholar of seventeenth- and eighteenth-century culture. Montano was a frequent contributor to La Ronda.

§155. Father Brescianfs progeny

i. ,zPer un'unione Letteraria europea77 (For a European literary union), La Fiera Letteraria 4, no. 37 (September 9/ 1928).

§156. Folklore

i. Gramsci's source of information on Ermolao Rubieri's classification of popular songs is an article by Giuseppe Gargano, “Definizioni e valutazioni di poesia popolare^ (Definitions and assessments of popular poetry), Il Marzocco 34, no. 18 (May 5, 1929).

Ermolao Rubieri (1818-79), a political activist who participated in the uprisings of 1848 and in later revolutionary activities inspired by the movement for the liberation and unification of Italy, also served as a member of parliament for some years. In 1876 he retired from political life to devote himself to writing and research. In addition to historical plays and some other political-historical works, he wrote a history of popular poetry in Italy, Storia della poesia popolare italiana (1877).

§157» Sicily

1. Gramsci extracted all the information and quotations used in this note from the segment of Bottai怎 essay on Verga (which he wrote for the specialized review Studi Vezghiani] that was published in LItalia Letteraria i, no. 28 (October 13, 1929), under the title "Un saggio di Giuseppe Bottai su Verga politico77 (An essay by Giuseppe Bottai on Verga's politics).

Giuseppe Bottai (1895T959), a founding member of the Fascist Party, was elected to parliament in 1921； the following year he commanded a column of Blackshirts during the march on Rome. From early on, Bottai had a special interest in journalistic, editorial, and cultural activities. In 1923 he launched Critica Fascista^ other journals he founded included Archivio di Studi Corporativi and Primato. He also established the School of Corporative Studies at the University of Pisa. Bottai became a member of the Fascist Grand Council in 1926, and he held important ministerial positions during the Fascist dictatorship: he was minister of corporations from 1929 to 1932 and minister of education from 1936 to 1943. He was the architect of the School Charter of 工939, a reform of the national educational system (especially at the primary level) that was meant to enable the schools to help forge 〃the new Fascist man."

On the novelist Giovanni Verga, see Notebook i, §43, n. 28.

2. On Francesco Crispi and his politics, see Notebook i, §43, n. 10.

3. Nunzio Nasi (1850-1935), a popular politician and member of parliament from Trapani in Sicily, held his first ministerial position in the cabinet of Luigi Pelloux. Later, Prime Minister Giuseppe Zanardelli named him minister of education, a post he held between 1901 and 1903. Following the fall of Zanardelli^ government, Nasi was accused of fiscal mismanagement during his tenure as minister. An inquiry was launched, and his enemies in parliament (among them, the prime minister Giovanni Giolitti) had enough votes to strip him of parliamentary immunity and authorize a criminal investigation into his affairs. Nasi was put on. trial and in 1908 was sentenced to eleven months in prison. His Trapani constituents, who believed Nasi to be a victim of political persecution, reelected him to parliament several times and held public demonstrations when he was barred from returning to his seat in the Chamber of Deputies.

§158. Lorianism, Altimetry, good morals, and intelligence

1. Ludovico Zuccolo's little-known work II Belluzzi o La Città felice (Belluzzi； or, The happy city) was reprinted by the Bologna firm, Zanichelli, in 1929, in its series "Curiosità letterarie” (Literary curiosities) under the general editorship of Amy Bernardy.

Ludovico Zuccolo (1568-1630), a political thinker, spent nine years at the court of Urbino and is known to have traveled to Venice and Spain. He is remembered primarily for the theory of the state that he expounded in his work Della ragion di Stato (1621), wherein he argued that politics constitute an autonomous, amoral sphere. Croce described him as one of 〃the true continuers of Machiavelli.

2. On Loria's "theory" of altimetry, see Notebook ix §25, andnn. 2 and 4 in the corresponding Notes to the Text.

3. The source of the information and quotations in this note一and of the hypothesis that Zuccolo's La Repubblica di Evandria (The Republic of Evandria) was influenced by Thomas More's Utopia and was the basis for Zuccolo^ later work II Belluzzi—is an article by Giuseppe Gargàno: Z/Un utopista di senso pratico: Il Belhizzi di Ludovico Zuccolo,? (A utopian with a practical sense: Ludovico Zuccolozs II Belluzzi}, Il Marzocco 35, no. 5 (February 2, 1930).

§159. Risorgimento. The first Italian facobins

i. The information in this note is garnered from an article by Arturo Pompeati: "Cultura e poesia nelPltalia napoleonica^ (Culture and poetry in Napoleonic Italy), Il Marzocco 35, no. 5 (February 2, 1930).

Giulio Natali (1875-1965), the author of Cultura e poesia in Italia nell'età napoleonica, a book on poetry and culture in Italy during the Napoleonic era published as part of Sten's "Studii e Saggi" (Studies and Essays) series, was professor of Italian literature in Rome and later in Catania. A specialist in eighteenth- and nineteenth-century Italian literature and cultural history, Natali published numerous books, including one on the life and thought of Francesco Lomonaco, La vita e il pensiero di Francesco Lo Monaco (19x2).

Francesco Lomonaco (1772-1810) studied medicine in. Naples and was strongly influenced by the ideas of Condillac. He was a member of the Jacobin leadership that helped establish the Parthenopean republic in 1779. When the republic collapsed, he fled to France, where he presented the minister of war, Carnot, with the Rapporto sulle segrete cagioni e su7 principali avvenimenti della catastrofe napoletana (Report on the hidden causes and the main events of the Neapolitan. catastrophe), in which he denounced the Bourbons for their brutality but also severely criticized the French military leaders for abandoning the Neapolitan republicans. In the conclusion of his report, Lomonaco asserted that Italy needed not only to gain independence but also to become a single, unified country. Lomonaco returned to Italy, and in 1805 he started teaching at the military school in Pavia. His writings include several volumes of biographies of famous Italians.

§160. Renaissance

1. Giuseppe Toffanin's Che cosa fu ^umanesimo: Il Risorgimento della antichità classica nella coscienza degli italiani fra i tempi di Dante e la Riforma (What humanism was: The revival of classical antiquity in the consciousness of Italians between the times of Dante and the Reformation) was published in Florence in 1929 by Sansoni in its series ^Biblioteca Storica del Rinascimento” (Historical Library of the Renaissance).

Gramsci asked for a copy of this book (cited earlier in this same notebook) in a November 23/ 1931, letter to Tatiana Schucht. See Notebook 5, §i^3/ n. 19.

2. The Italian word used here is riscossa/' a word Gramsci specifically discusses in Notebook 5/ §136.

3. Toffanin, Che cosa fu ^umanesimo, pp. 134-35.

4. On Vittorio Rossi's article, Rinascimento,,z Nuova Antologia 64/ no. 1384 (November 16/ 1929): 137-50, see Notebook 5, §123.

5. See Giuseppe Toffanin^ books on the end of humanism. Fine delPv.-manesimo (Turin: Bocca, 1920), and on the sixteenth century, Il Cinquecento (Milan: Vallardi, 1928).

§161. Encyclopedic notions. "Ascaro”

i. ifAscarof, (both singular and plural) in Italian, like "askari" in English, is a somewhat derogatory term that literally refers to an indige-

nous African soldier or policemen in the employ of a colonial administration. In Italy the term was applied figuratively to members of small political parties or groups that served as auxiliaries of the big parties.

2. "Crumiro" in Italian is used contemptuously in precisely the same sense as the English "scab〃： i.e.z a strikebreaker.

1

read with great interest Professor Cosmo's letter that you have copied for me. My impression is quite complex. I would regret it very

2

much if Professor Cosmo even remotely suspected that I entertained

3

an opinion that might cast doubt on his rectitude, the dignity of his

4

character, and his sense of duty. From the last pages of his Vita di

5

Dante [Life of Dante] it appears that the author himself is a fervent believer in Catholicism. I had connected this impression with the fact that Cosmoz together with Gerosa, has compiled an anthology of

6

Latin writers of the church's early centuries for a Catholic publishing house, and I had thought that Cosmo had converted. I certainly

7

did not think that this conversion was at all "opportunisticmuch less venal, as unfortunately has happened with many important intellectuals； indeed, Gerosazs fervent Catholicism, as I well remember, was tinged with Jansenism rather than Jesuitism. Yet this fact displeased me. When I was Cosmo's student, I did not agree with him on many things, of course, although at the time I had not fully defined my position, quite apart from my affection for him. But it seemed to me that both myself and Cosmo, like many other intel-
